IDENTITY  THEFT 

S.  HRG.  109–1089 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JUNE  16,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

61–846 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 16, 2005  ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Allen  .....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Burns  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Ben Nelson  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Bill Nelson  ...........................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................
....

Prepared statement of Hon. Hardy Myers, Attorney General of Oregon 

WITNESSES 

Feinstein, Hon. Dianne, U.S. Senator from California  .........................................
Harbour, Hon. Pamela Jones, Commissioner, Federal Trade Commission  ........
Hooley, Hon. Darlene, U.S. Representative from Oregon 
....................................
Leary, Hon. Thomas B., Commissioner, Federal Trade Commission  ..................
Leibowitz, Hon. Jon, Commissioner, Federal Trade Commission 
.......................
Majoras, Hon. Deborah Platt, Chairman, Federal Trade Commission  ...............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Schumer, Hon. Charles E., U.S. Senator from New York  ....................................
Sorrell,  Hon.  William  H.,  Vermont  Attorney  General;  President,  National 
Association of Attorneys General  ........................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Swindle, Hon. Orson, Commissioner, Federal Trade Commission  ......................

Boxer, Hon. Barbara, U.S. Senator from California, prepared statement  ..........
Dorgan, Hon. Byron L., U.S. Senator from North Dakota, prepared statement 
Lautenberg, Frank R., U.S. Senator from New Jersey, prepared statement 
.....

APPENDIX 

Page 
1 
24 
2 
2 
2 
23 
3 
23 
1 
54 

7 
35 
10 
34 
36 
25 
27 
4 

12 
13 
33 

58 
57 
59 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

IDENTITY  THEFT 

THURSDAY,  JUNE  16,  2005 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  in  room  SR– 
253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Gordon  H.  Smith,  pre-
siding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator  SMITH.  Ladies  and  gentlemen,  we  welcome  you  to  this 

hearing of the Senate Commerce Committee. 

I thank our witnesses for being here today. Today’s hearing takes 
place  against  the  backdrop  of  one  of  the  most  rapidly  growing 
crimes  in  America,  identify  theft.  We’ll  hear  from  the  Federal 
Trade  Commission  today  that  over  ten  million  Americans  are  vic-
timized  by  identity  thieves  every  year.  These  numbers  translate 
into losses of over $55 billion per year, averaging over $10,000 sto-
len per fraudulent incident. 

In  2005  alone  there  were  at  least  43  known  incidents  of  data 
breaches potentially affecting over 9 million individuals. In my own 
State of Oregon, we rank ninth in the Nation for fraud complaints 
and identity theft. These breaches range from sloppy recordkeeping 
and  security  procedures  by  companies  to  extremely  sophisticated 
online thefts by computer hackers. 

Last  month,  this  Committee  held  a  hearing  on  the  recent  data 
breaches  at  ChoicePoint,  Inc.,  and  LexisNexis,  and  methods  used 
by  private  industry  to  prevent  future  data  breaches.  At  today’s 
hearing, the Committee will hear testimony concerning the current 
treatment of data broker services under existing state and Federal 
privacy laws, as well as proposals of public solutions to mitigate fu-
ture data breaches and identity theft. 

Protecting  sensitive  information  is  an  issue  of  great  importance 
for  all  Americans.  Consumers  should  have  confidence  when  they 
share  their  information  with  others  that  their  information  will  be 
protected.  At  the  same  time,  the  ability  of  legitimate  companies  to 
access  personal  information  certainly  does  facilitate  commerce  and 
continues to benefit consumers. 

Data broker companies perform important commercial and public 
functions  through  their  ability  to  quickly  and  securely  access  con-
sumer data. Following today’s hearing, I will be introducing legisla-
tion with my colleagues of this Committee. The principles of our bi-
partisan effort will include, one, a national obligation for companies 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

to  have  a  security  procedure  in  place  to  safeguard  sensitive  and 
personal information, and, two, a balanced breach notification trig-
ger  to  inform  consumers  when  real  risks  of  identity  theft  are  at 
stake.  We  need  to  make  sure  that  this  legislation  strikes  the  right 
balance  to  ensure  the  continued  existence  of  the  critical  services 
while  ensuring  security  of  personal  information  to  prevent  its  mis-
use and subsequent breaches and thefts. 

I’d  also  like  to  pay  a  particular  welcome  to  one  of  my  fellow  Or-
egonians,  Congresswoman  Darlene  Hooley,  who  is  here  to  share 
her  thoughts  with  us  today.  She  has  been  a  great  leader  on  this 
issue in the House of Representatives, and I appreciate, especially, 
her coming across the Hill to be with us today. 

Before  we  turn  to  our  first  panel,  it’s  my  pleasure  to  turn  the 
mike over to the Ranking Member of this Committee, Senator Dan-
iel Inouye. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator  INOUYE.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  com-

unanimous consent that it be placed in the record. 

Senator SMITH. Without objection. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:] 

mend you for conducting this hearing. 

I  have  a  statement,  but  you’ve  covered  it  adequately.  I’d  ask 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Data  breach  and  identity  theft  is  a  serious  problem  that  this  Committee  is  com-
mitted  to  addressing.  A  2003  Federal  Trade  Commission  survey  report  found  that 
during  a  1-year  period  nearly  10  million  Americans—or  roughly  4.6  percent  of  the 
domestic adult population—were victimized by identity thieves. Public opinion polls 
consistently find strong support among Americans for privacy rights to protect their 
personal information. 

The FTC and others have been working diligently to come up with a Federal legis-
lative  solution  to  protect  America’s  consumers  from  the  data  breaches  that  lead  to 
identity theft. 

Any  solution  must  include  a  provision  that  notifies  consumers  of  data  breaches 
so  that  they  can  protect  themselves  from  the  misuse  of  their  personal  information. 
In addition, consumers deserve to have certain rights in their dealings with the in-
formation industry, and to have those rights protected by their government. 

Senator  Bill  Nelson  has  undertaken  a  tremendous  amount  of  work  on  this  issue, 
and  I  appreciate  his  interest  and  guidance.  We  are  looking  forward  to  working  in 
bipartisan  friendship  with  Chairman  Stevens  and  Senator  Smith  to  produce  a  bill 
that  serves  American  consumers  and  allows  them  to  take  advantage  of  our  great 
marketplace without fear. 

Senator  SMITH.  Senator  Burns,  do  you  have  an  opening  state-

ment? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CONRAD BURNS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MONTANA 

Senator BURNS. I do, and I shall be brief, Mr. Chairman. 
I want to thank you and Senator Stevens for setting this hearing 
up  today,  and  I  want  to  congratulate  you  for  all  the  hard  work 
you’ve done on this issue. I don’t think there’s anybody in the coun-
try  that  I  don’t  talk  to  that  doesn’t  fear  identity  theft.  We’ve  had 
all kinds of news articles and information on identity theft and how 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

it has harmed them with regard to credit cards and multiple other 
situations. It’s timely. 

And  it  is  something  that  we’ve  been  dealing  with  here  on  this 
Committee  a  long  time,  all  the  way  back  to  wherever  we  started 
to become really aware how big Internet commerce is and the dan-
gers  that  were  out  there  through  the  encryption  debate,  security 
and  safety  debates,  and  through  spam  and  ham  and  everything 
else—we went through all of that—and yet we still have—problems 
keep  cropping  up  about  the  shortfalls  that  we  have  been  guilty  of 
here  in  protecting  people’s  security  and,  of  course,  their  privacy. 
And  privacy  is  utmost  in  the  minds  of  a  lot  of  people.  They  have 
a right to be concerned, and they’re very angry about this situation. 
I look forward to hearing the witnesses today. I also would—after 
these  witnesses  we  can  draw  some  sort  of  a  conclusion  that  there 
might  be  legislation;  and,  if  there  is,  I  will  be  very  supportive  of 
what  Senator  Smith  and  the  rest  of  the  people  in  this  Committee 
do, and would hope that we have some sort of input. 

But  we’ve  also  got  to  be  careful  on  this  issue,  because  we  sure 
could  throw  the  baby  out  with  the  bath  water.  There’s  a  very  fine 
line.  The  services  that  data  brokers  provide  help  make  business 
more  efficient,  they  keep  costs  low  for  all  Americans  across  a  wide 
range  of  services,  from  mortgage  rates  to  online  shopping  and  a 
wide range of financial services. So, we need to make sure that we 
preserve the positive uses of this data, as well. 

And, of course, I look forward to working with you and the rest— 
and  the  balance  of  the  Members  of  this  Committee,  because  it  is 
timely, it is necessary, and we’ve got to do it right. 

Thank you. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Senator Burns. 
Senator Nelson? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator BILL NELSON. Mr. Chairman, thank you for holding this 

hearing, and thank you for your personal interest. 

One  of  the  bills  that  is  in  front  of  us,  Mr.  Chairman,  is  the  bill 
that  Senator  Schumer  and  I  have  filed.  The  hearing  is  timely,  be-
cause  we  just  had  another  example  of  missing  records,  to  the  tune 
of  3.9  million  records.  We  don’t  know  if  it’s  identity  theft,  but  it’s 
certainly  subject  to  identity  theft,  because  they  are  now  missing. 
And  if  you  add  up  all  of  the  records  that  have  been  lost,  missing, 
or  stolen,  starting  back  with  ChoicePoint,  which  is  the  Georgia 
company  that  first  came  to  light  because  of  a  California  law  that 
said  that  the  people  whose  records  were  missing  had  to  be  noti-
fied—that was just a few months ago—in that short period of time, 
8.8 million people’s records are missing. 

Now,  if  this  isn’t  an  eye-opening  threat  to  Americans’  privacy, 
then  I  don’t  know  what  is.  And  it’s  not  only  the  individual  threats 
and how to go about getting your identity back that Senator Schu-
mer and I address in this legislation, but look at the national secu-
rity implications, look at what a terrorist can do, in trying to steal 
someone’s  identity.  And,  if  that’s  not  enough,  look  at  the  threat  to 
electronic  commerce.  Consumers  are  losing  trust  in  our  system  of 
electronic  commerce,  especially  when  they  learn  about  these  huge 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

unsecured  data  warehouses,  and  suddenly  their  information  is 
missing.  And  now  you  will  find  that  identity  theft  is  the  number- 
one skyrocketing consumer fraud. 

So, I believe, Mr. Chairman, that the Congress needs to act now. 
That’s the timely manner. And I want to thank you again for hold-
ing this hearing. 

Senator  SMITH.  Thank  you,  Senator  Nelson.  We  look  forward  to 
sharing ideas with you on how to make a good bill better, if we can. 
And,  in  that  spirit,  we  welcome  our  colleague,  Senator  Schumer 
here,  and  we’ll  ask  you  to  go  first,  and  then  my  fellow  statesman, 
Congresswoman Darlene Hooley. 

Senator Schumer? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CHARLES E. SCHUMER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW YORK 

Senator  SCHUMER.  Well,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  want  to 
thank  you,  Chairman  Stevens,  and  Ranking  Member  Inouye  for 
having  this  hearing,  and  more  importantly  is  the  general  interest 
that this Committee has shown in this very important issue. 

I’d  like  to  commend  my  colleague,  Senator  Feinstein,  who  I  be-

lieve will be coming—— 

Senator SMITH. She has just arrived. 
Senator SCHUMER.—as well. Oh. 
Senator SMITH. Welcome, Senator Feinstein. 
Senator SCHUMER. See, I didn’t even know you were in the room. 
Senator  SMITH.  I’m  very  pleased  she  got  the  memo  about—this 

Senator FEINSTEIN. Yes. 
Senator SMITH. So, I’m not the only one looking like an ice cream 

is Seersucker day. 

salesman here. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  SCHUMER.  Well,  I’d  like  to  comment  on  my  National 

Seersucker Day Resolution that—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  SCHUMER.  Anyway,  I  want  to  thank  you,  and  I  want  to 
thank  Senator  Feinstein  for  her  leadership  on  this  issue,  as  well. 
Identity theft is just everywhere. And the number of people who 
call every one of our offices for advice, just to express their outrage, 
is growing and growing and growing. It’s, of course, natural. Tech-
nology has allowed us to transfer information quickly, and, Senator 
Burns is right, it’s an important part of the economy, and we don’t 
want  to  stop  it.  But,  at  the  same  time,  given  all  the  new  tech-
nology,  it  makes  information  about  people,  which  used  to  be  just 
proprietary—it  makes  it  valuable.  These  days,  information  about 
people  is  as  valuable  as  gold,  and  it  ought  to  be  treated  that  way. 
We  don’t  transport  gold  the  way  we  transport  a  crate  of  oranges, 
and we shouldn’t transport people’s identities, people’s information, 
the way we transport a crate of oranges. We don’t store it the same 
way.  We  have  Fort  Knox.  Well,  we  ought  to  store  this  information 
in a different way. 

The  bottom  line  is  very  simple,  Mr.  Chairman.  What  bank  rob-
bery was to the Depression Era, identity theft is to the Information 
Age.  But,  in  a  sense,  identity  thieves  are  even  worse  than  bank 
robbers,  because  they  not  only  steal  your  money,  they  steal  your 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

time,  your  sense  of  security,  and  your  peace  of  mind.  That’s  what 
the  thieves,  the  identity  thieves,  do.  And  unless  Congress,  compa-
nies, and consumers take action, this is an epidemic that threatens 
to spiral out of control. 

Senator  Nelson  and  I  believe  that  Congressional  action  must  be 
quick,  but  it  also  must  be  comprehensive.  If  you  plug  one  part  of 
the  loophole,  the  identity  thieves  are  going  to  find  another  way  to 
do  it.  That’s  what  the  technology  allows  them  to  do,  all  this—all 
of  us,  in  the  Information  Age.  And  I’m  glad  to  say  that  identity 
theft is not a partisan issue—it’s not a Democratic issue, a Repub-
lican  issue—it’s  a  nonpartisan  consumer  and  economic  crisis,  and 
there’s  no  excuse  for  Congress  failing  to  act  in  a  bipartisan  way. 
The legislation that Senator Nelson and I have introduced offers 
a  truly  comprehensive  solution.  Instead  of  just  adding  another 
square  to  the  current  patchwork  quilt  of  regulations,  our  bill  pro-
vides a real security blanket for the American consumer. To really 
tackle identity theft, our bill takes an aggressive approach in three 
areas. 

One,  empowering  consumers.  The  average  consumer,  it’s  esti-
mated—by  the  FTC—who’s  a  victim  of  identify  theft,  spends  175 
hours  restoring  their  credit  information  and  their  credit  integrity. 
That  is  more  than  four  40-hour  workweeks.  So,  people,  who  are 
busy  with  their  jobs,  with  their  families,  with  life’s  joys  and  life’s 
trials,  have  to  then  take  a  huge  amount  of  time  to  try  and  restore 
their good name back, even though they did nothing wrong. So, we 
empower consumers, and give them more rights there. 

Second,  we  protect  our  most  personal  information.  We  say,  to 
people who carry this information, ‘‘You have a new special respon-
sibility.  You  can’t  just  say,  ‘‘Well,  it  wasn’t  my  fault;  we  were  just 
doing what we did years ago.’’ What they did 10 years ago was not 
good enough 5 years ago, and what they did 5 years ago is not good 
enough for today. 

And, finally, what we do is, we try to make sure that consumers 
are  empowered.  And  let  me  describe  that.  We  make  companies,  of 
course,  tell  consumers  when  their  information  has  been  breached. 
We also require companies to tell them if the company plans to sell 
sensitive  personal  information  they  collect.  So,  consumers  can 
make  intelligent  decisions  about  whom  to  trust.  When  you  buy 
something,  if  somebody’s  going  to  use  all  your  information,  you 
should  have  a  right  to  say,  ‘‘I  don’t  want  to  buy  it  here.  I  want  to 
go  somewhere  else,  where  they  won’t  sell  the  information  about 
me.’’ We protect the information. 

We believe an ounce of prevention is worth a pound of cure. And 
our  bill  makes  prevention  a  centerpiece  of  the  effort  against  iden-
tity  theft.  We  establish  procedures  for  the  FTC  to  require  compa-
nies  to  authenticate  those  who  try  to  buy  sensitive  personal  infor-
mation  from  them,  to  stop  situations  where  companies  like 
ChoicePoint,  for  example,  sell  their  personal  information  to  iden-
tity-theft rings posing as legitimate businesses. 

We also insist that every company that stores sensitive informa-
tion take reasonable steps to protect it, a simple minimum require-
ment. The Federal Trade Commission recently applauded this pro-
vision because of its potential, in their words, to reduce the risk of 
identity theft. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

All  companies  who  keep  sensitive  personal  information  need  to 
take  responsibility.  They  need  to  guard  our  identities  as  if  they 
were  gold,  because,  in  the  hands  of  identity  thieves,  they  are  gold. 
We  also  intend—we  are  now  adding  an  additional  provision  to 
our  bill  to  deal  with  the  transportation  or  storage  of  sensitive  per-
sonal  information.  What  we’ve  learned  from  what  happened  at 
Citigroup  is  that  we  need  standards  when  that  information  is 
transported.  You  can’t  just  treat  it  like  you’re  transporting  any 
good, because it’s too valuable, it’s too important; and, therefore, we 
require  standards,  in  terms  of  transportation,  depending  on  how 
much  information  and  how  valuable  it  is,  and  we  also  encourage 
encryption, so that, even if it’s stolen, this identity thief is not able 
to use it. 

Right now, we have a better chance of tracking down a lost book 
from Amazon than some banks have had in tracking down millions 
of sensitive records lost in transit. That has to stop. 

And, finally, helping victims. Our bill tries to provide relief to the 
millions  of  Americans  each  year  who  fall  victim  to  identity  theft. 
We  create  an  Office  of  Identity  Theft,  within  the  FTC,  which  will 
serve  as  a  one-stop  shop.  When  a  consumer’s  identity  is  stolen, 
they can call and say, ‘‘Help me. How do I deal with all the various 
things that I have to deal with because of that?’’ 

So,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  encourage  every  company  in  America,  and 
especially  in  my  State  of  New  York,  to  do  a  top-to-bottom  review 
of  its  procedures  for  handling  consumers’  sensitive  personal  infor-
mation  to  stave  off  more  incidents  where  information  is  exposed. 
We can—companies can do that even before any legislation passes, 
and help their customers and help themselves. 

In  conclusion,  Mr.  Chairman—I  see  the  yellow  light  is  on—iden-
tity  theft  is  a  serious  issue  that  deserves  real  comprehensive  ac-
tion.  I  hope  this  Committee  will  give  the  Schumer-Nelson  bill  the 
consideration that we believe it deserves. 

Thank  you  for  your  interest  and  the  opportunity  to  testify.  And 
I  apologize,  I’ll  have  to  excuse  myself,  because—they’re  buzzing 
me—we  have  a—I  need  to  make  a  quorum  in  the  Judiciary  Com-
mittee. 

Senator SMITH. Why don’t you stick around? 
[Laughter.] 
Senator SCHUMER. I’ll come back. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator FEINSTEIN. Ulterior motive. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator SMITH. No, we understand, Senator Schumer. 
Senator  SCHUMER.  It’s  to  make  a  quorum.  That’s  good  for  you. 
Senator SMITH. Oh, OK. OK. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator SCHUMER. How I vote may not be, but my quorum pres-

[Laughter.] 
Senator  SMITH.  Senator  Feinstein,  I  had  announced  Congress-

woman Hooley, but does your schedule permit—— 

Senator  FEINSTEIN.  If  there—I,  also,  am  on  Judiciary.  If  he 

ence is. 

makes the quorum—— 

Senator SMITH. Is that all right—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

Senator FEINSTEIN.—I will stay—— 
Senator SMITH.—with you, Congresswoman Hooley? 
Senator FEINSTEIN.—for a while. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you. 
Senator Feinstein? 
Senator FEINSTEIN. Thank you. 
For me? All right, thank you. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DIANNE FEINSTEIN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 

hear? 

Senator  FEINSTEIN.  I’m—can’t  see  over  the  table.  This  is  a  first 
for  me.  I’m  tall,  but  this  chair—if  you  don’t  mind,  I’ll  just  move 
one. 

Mr. Chairman, I—and Ranking Member Inouye and Members on 
both  sides—I’ve  been  working  on  this  issue  for  over  3  years  now. 
It has to do, really, with privacy. And I think most people don’t un-
derstand—— 

Senator BURNS. Senator, could you pull that up so everybody can 

Senator  FEINSTEIN.  Sorry.  I  think—my  low  voice?  Yes.  I  think 
most  people  don’t  understand  that  virtually  everything  they  buy, 
do—when they buy from a catalog, when they buy insurance, when 
they  buy  a  car,  when  they  mortgage  a  home,  when  they  get  a 
loan—that  all  of  that  data  is  collated,  and  it  has  become  big  busi-
ness.  It’s  sold  by  banks  to  their  affiliates.  Citibank,  I  believe,  sells 
to thousands of different businesses, all this data. And its database 
companies  have  developed  programs  which  compile  this  data  and 
then sell it out. 

Well,  identity  theft  has  become  the  largest-growing  crime  in 
America,  with  ten  million  victims.  It’s  bigger  than  all  of  the  theft 
and  burglary  in  history  was,  in  terms  of  loss.  And  nobody  knows 
that their identity has been compromised. 

I’ve  presented  three  bills.  One  is  a  notification  bill,  which  is  in 
Judiciary,  and  I’d  like  to  have  you  take  a  look  at  it.  Essentially, 
it says that when a database is breached, the data company must, 
within  a  reasonable  period  of  time,  alert  the  consumer  that  their 
data  has  been  breached  and  tell  them  how  to  take  the  necessary 
steps to keep their credit intact. 

Notification  is  really  important.  Over  the  past  2  years,  there 
have  been  34  major  data  breaches.  Just  this  morning,  the  FDIC, 
the  second  Federal  agency,  had  its  database  breached,  with  people 
illegally,  now,  joining  credit  bureaus  with  data  from  that  breach. 
Over  the  past  2  years,  approximately  18,393,180  people  in  this 
country  have  been  exposed  or  affected  by  identity  theft.  Last  year, 
the total cost to individuals and businesses from this theft, believe 
it or not, was $52.6 billion. It is huge. 

Let  me  give  you  a  few  examples.  CitiFinancial,  earlier  this 
month,  announced  that  a  box  of  computer  tapes  with  unencrypted 
account information for 3.9 million customers had been lost in ship-
ment.  Look  at  the  value  of  that  loss.  Somebody  picks  it  up,  they 
can  go  to  Paris  and  sit  there  and  assume  other  people’s  identities. 
They  can  be  in  Chicago  and  rip  somebody  off  in  San  Diego.  It  is 
an insidious kind of opening. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

The  Bank  of  America  announced  they  lost  tapes  containing  1.2 
million  Federal  employees.  ChoicePoint,  145,000.  Both  the  Cali-
fornia  and  Colorado  Departments  of  Health  had  laptops  stolen, 
which  jeopardized  personal  information  of  25,000  residents.  And 
the  list  goes  on  and  on.  DSW,  LexisNexis,  the  University  of  Cali-
fornia  system,  Boston  College,  HSBC,  Ameritrade,  Department  of 
Justice, and now FDIC. 

California,  in  2003,  was  the  first  state  to  require  notification  in 
the  event  of  a  data  breach.  Now,  I  believe  that  that  bill  is  really 
responsible  for  the  notice  that’s  now  being  given  throughout  the 
United  States,  and  that  if  it  had  not  been  for  the  California  law, 
we  may  well  not  be  privy  to  all  of  the  breaches  we  are  aware  of 
today.  So,  California  began  a  trend,  and  we’re  now  seeing  other 
states seeing the notification—the necessity of notification laws. 

At present, the states are out ahead of the Congress. States like 
Arkansas,  Georgia,  Indiana,  Montana,  North  Dakota,  and  Wash-
ington  State  are  moving.  Now,  this  creates  problems,  because  dif-
ferent states are going to have different laws. 

Now, earlier this year I introduced a second version of my earlier 
bill—and we’re still working on it—and this would require the Fed-
eral  Government  or  a  business  notify  individuals  when  there  has 
been  a  breach  that  involves  Social  Security  numbers,  driver’s  li-
censes, or state identification numbers, and financial account infor-
mation. The bill would require that notice be sent out, without un-
reasonable  delay,  by  mail  or  e-mail.  It  would  allow  for  exceptions 
to  notice  for  law  enforcement  and  national  security  purposes.  It 
would  impose  civil  penalties  for  failures  to  notify,  such  as  $1,000 
per  individual  whose  personal  data  was  compromised,  or  not  more 
than $50,000 per day while the failure to notify continues. It would 
allow  individuals  to  place  an  extended  fraud  alert  on  their  credit 
report  to  protect  themselves.  And  it  would  allow  state  attorneys 
general to protect the interests of residents in their state when the 
Federal  Government  or  businesses  fail  to  notify  individuals  of  a 
breach. 

Now,  there  are  some  contentious  issues  that  I’ve  found  that  I 

want to make you aware of. 

The  first  is  the  issue  of  preemption,  whether  preemption  should 
be a floor or a ceiling. The consumer groups believe that the states 
should  have  the  right  to  enter  this  area,  as  well.  And  that  comes 
directly into conflict with the concept of one uniform law all across 
the United States. We’re trying to work that out. 

Second,  exactly  what  triggers  notice  to  be  given  to  individuals, 
and  striking  a  balance  between  over-notification  and  inadequate 
notice in dealing with companies—that has become a problem. 

And,  finally,  whether  alternative  notification  procedures  or  so- 
called  safe-harbor  provisions—the  California  bill  had  a  safe-harbor 
provision.  Consumer  groups  do  not  like  a  safe-harbor  provision. 
Businesses  will  adamantly  oppose  anything  without  a  safe-harbor 
provision.  So,  we  are  trying  to  work  out  a  safe-harbor  provision 
that  protects  individuals  against  identity  theft  in  certain  situa-
tions. 

We also have a bill that would do something on the privacy issue. 
Senator Schumer spoke of it. I mean, consider this. Our Social Se-
curity number and driver’s license are the two major breeder docu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

ments that are there. Falling into the wrong hands, they allow peo-
ple  all  kinds  of  access.  In  the  wrong  hands,  that’s  fraudulent  ac-
cess; but, nonetheless, it happens. Personal financial data and per-
sonal  health  data,  I  think,  used  for  commercial  purposes  without 
the individual’s assent or even knowledge, I believe, is wrong. 

Now,  California  passed  a  law  having  to  do  with  this.  The  banks 
and  insurance  companies  supported  it.  Then  when  I  tried  to  do  it 
here,  the  same  law,  they  came  back  and  opposed  it,  and  killed  it. 
So,  we’re  fighting,  in  this  whole  arena,  big  interests  out  there 
who  make  a  lot  of  money  on  these  databases  and  don’t  want  the 
public to receive a notice that says, ‘‘We sell your data, as indicated 
here. May we have your permission to do so, yes or no?’’ They don’t 
want  to  do  that.  So,  that  is  a  significant  issue  as  identity  theft 
reaches epic proportions. 

And  the  last  point,  and  the  last  bill  that  we’ve  worked  on  now 
for  5  years,  and  it  would  seem  so  simple—it  has  gone  to  Finance, 
it  runs  into  trouble  with  Finance  staff—and  that  is  protection 
through  the  redaction  of  Social  Security  numbers  on  public  docu-
ments. And, also, both of these documents, driver’s license and So-
cial  Security,  being  sold  through  the  Internet,  where  you  can  buy 
somebody’s number for $12 or $15. 

These  are  huge  questions  that  this  new  Internet  technology,  as 
well  as  database  technology,  presents  to  the  Congress.  I  think,  be-
cause  of  the  excruciating  pain  caused,  in  terms  of  the  loss  of  iden-
tity  to  so  many  people,  the  inordinate  cost  of  this,  that  Congress 
really has a major issue before it. 

So, I’d like to just put into your record, if I might, my three bills 
on the subject that you could take a look at and, obviously, do with 
what you wish. 

Senator SMITH. We’ll receive those without objection, and we ap-
preciate  so  much  your  concern  about  the  issue,  Senator  Feinstein. 
A  point  of  clarification  for  me,  and  perhaps  my  colleagues.  In 
your view, why did the banks support the legislation in California, 
but oppose it nationally? 

Senator  FEINSTEIN.  I’ve  had  conversations  with  CEOs  on  this 
subject.  And  one  of  the  things,  banks  are  buying  more  industries, 
and  they  want  to  be  able  to  share  this  information  with  those  in-
dustries.  So,  there  is  a  question  of  liaison,  there  is  a  question  of 
transmitting  data  within  those  industries.  Now,  what  happens  is, 
with—you have data breaches which is happening. This is exposing 
literally tens of millions of people. And it’s all without their knowl-
edge. So, this has added an additional dimension. 

The bill that I’m speaking of, that you just asked about, Senator 
Smith, actually was before we knew about these database breaches. 
The  database  breaches,  I  think,  gives  more  momentum  to  my— 
we’ll see, because there are powerful interests. 

Senator SMITH. Well, thank you for your interest in this very im-
portant  legislation,  and  we’ll  look  forward  to  working  with  the 
ideas  in  your  bill,  and  perhaps  ultimately  incorporating  many,  or 
most, into a Committee bill. 

Senator FEINSTEIN. Thanks very much, I appreciate it. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you. 
Senator FEINSTEIN. Thank you. 
Senator SMITH. Congresswoman Hooley, the mike is yours. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

STATEMENT OF HON. DARLENE HOOLEY, 

U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM OREGON 

Ms.  HOOLEY.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Smith.  And  I  really  appre-
ciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  in  front  of  you.  Thanks  to  all  the 
Committee Members and Ranking Member Inouye. 

I  am  one  of  millions  of  former  credit-card  fraud  victims  and  a 
Member  of  the  House  Financial  Services  Committee,  and  I’ve  had 
a  long  interest  in  protecting  consumers  from  potential  identity 
theft.  I’m  delighted  that  you’re  working  on  this,  that  you’re  going 
to introduce a bill on this, and I hope it is as comprehensive as you 
can make it. 

When I started on this issue about 6 years ago, there were thou-
sands of victims of identity theft. Today, there are over ten million 
victims  of  identity  theft,  and  it  is  growing.  This  is  a  way  to  steal 
your  money  without  putting  a  gun  to  your  head.  They  can  do  it 
over  the  Internet  and  through  computers.  It  represents  a  funda-
mental  threat  to  our  e-commerce,  to  our  overall  economy  and, 
frankly,  to  our  homeland  security.  We  are  no  longer  facing  just 
hobby hackers; these are skilled criminals. ID theft is big business. 
It is imperative that Congress and the private sector work together 
to make certain that sensitive personal information is protected. 

Congress,  last  year,  with  the  passage  of  the  FACT  Act,  provided 
landmark  consumer  protections,  including  free  annual  access  to 
credit  reports.  We  know  that  if  people  know  what’s  on  their  credit 
report,  they  will  take  some  responsibility  to  make  sure  that  credit 
report is accurate. We have to build on that success. 

We  all  know  that  there  were  recent  high-profile  data-security 
breaches.  You’ve  heard  all  about  them  from  the  other  two  Mem-
bers. And what that does is undermine the public confidence in the 
data-security  practices  of  U.S.  companies  that  have  exposed  mil-
lions  of  consumers  to  potential  fraud  and  identity  theft.  Theft  of 
thousands  of  consumer  files  from  companies  like  ChoicePoint  and 
LexisNexis  illustrate  how  broadly  our  private  information  is  col-
lected and sold without our knowledge or consent, and how vulner-
able  these  private  databases  are  to  both  traditional  and  high-tech 
forms of theft. 

There  are  many  consumers  who  think,  ‘‘Oh,  I’ve  kept  tight  con-
trol over my personal and financial information,’’ but they can still 
be  a  victim  of  identity  theft,  because  companies  that  seek  to  profit 
from  their  personal  information  may  have  inadequate  security 
standards, or businesses may fall victims to criminal activities. 

With  respect  to  data  breaches,  there  are  immediate  steps.  First 
of all, data brokers should be required to operate by the same infor-
mation-sharing  standards  and  consumer  protections  as  consumer- 
reporting agencies. Because credit reports contain confidential per-
sonal  information,  the  Fair  Credit  Report  Act  only  allows  an  indi-
vidual’s credit report to be released to certain people for clearly de-
fined  purposes.  FCRA  requires  that  consumer-reporting  agencies 
certify the purpose for which the report is being obtained, and that 
that  report  will  not  be  used  for  any  other  purpose.  Despite  har-
boring  similar  sensitive  personal  information,  data  brokers  cur-
rently face no such restrictions. 

Second,  Congress  should  impose  data-security  obligations  and 
standards on data brokers and consumer-reporting agencies as the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

Gramm-Leach-Bliley  Act  requires  of  regulated  financial  institu-
tions. 

Third,  Congress  should  establish  uniform  requirements  for  data 
brokers,  consumer-reporting  agencies,  and  financial  institutions  to 
notify consumers. And, again, I think, in all of your bills, there are 
notification  procedures,  and  that  has  to  be  a  balance.  Congress 
should  include  in  such  a  notice  the  date  of  the  breach,  specific  in-
formation  that  was  acquired,  the  actions  being  taken  by  the  con-
sumer-reporting  agencies,  financial  institution,  or  data  broker,  an 
explanation  of  how  a  consumer  may  obtain  a  copy  of  their  con-
sumer  report  free  of  charge,  and  how  they  may  place  fraud  alert 
on  their  consumer  reports  to  discourage  unauthorized  use,  and  a 
toll-free  number  where  consumers  can  obtain  additional  informa-
tion  about  the  security  breach  and  their  options  to  protect  their 
consumer file. 

Finally, Congress must place greater responsibility on retail mer-

chants to protect their customer payment account information. 

By  accomplishing  these  initial  goals,  Congress  will  provide  con-
sumers  with  the  protections  they  deserve,  and  provide  the  clarity 
and  uniformity  that  industry  needs  in  order  to  service  their  cus-
tomers. 

In  addition,  there  are  a  whole  host  of  identity-theft  proposals 
that I think warrant further examination and vigorous debate, and 
I’m  just  going  to  go  through  a  very  quick  list.  One,  people  have 
talked  about—I  think  it  needs  to  be  examined—an  Office  of  ID 
Theft Czar at the FTC, or elsewhere. You need more money in the 
Department  of  Justice  and  Secret  Service  to  investigate  and  pros-
ecute perpetrators of mass ID fraud. I think you need to allow con-
sumers  to  protect  their  consumer  file  with  optional  credit  freezes, 
encourage  industry  and  consumer  use  of  a  second-factor  authen-
tication,  effective  Federal  legislation  to  combat  the  practice  of 
phishing and pharming—and that’s with a ‘‘p,’’ and not an ‘‘f ’’—ex-
plore effective biometric technology; and, last, but not least, I think 
you  have  to  seriously  look  at  methamphetamine.  There  is  an  in-
credibly  close  alliance  between  meth  use  and  ID  theft.  And  if  you 
don’t  go  on  the  track  of  trying  to  stop  methamphetamines,  it  will 
only help identity theft grow. 

Thank  you  again,  very  much,  for  this  opportunity  to  testify  in 

front of the Committee. 

Senator  SMITH.  Thank  you  very  much,  Darlene.  And  I  want  to 
highlight—what  you  just  said  as  your  last  point,  and  that  is  the 
linkage  between  methamphetamines  and  identity  theft.  Many  of 
the  crimes  that  are  committed  by  methamphetamine  users  relate 
to  identity  theft  because  of  the  kinds  of  resources  and  information 
that they are able to glean from this practice. So, it has an implica-
tion  well  beyond  just  someone’s  finances.  Sometimes  they’re  being 
put  in  touch  without  their  notice  or  knowledge,  with  some  pretty 
shady characters peddling one of the worst of the drugs in our soci-
ety, that is truly becoming a plague across our whole country. 

Thank you very much. 
Ms. HOOLEY. You’re welcome. Thank you. 
Senator SMITH. Appreciate your being here. 
I have been asked by several Members of the Committee to allow 
Mr.  Sorrell,  the  President  of  the  National  Association  of  Attorneys 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

General,  to  testify  very  briefly,  before  the  FTC,  because  his  state-
ment is short and the Committee has a few questions for him. The 
normal  protocol  is  for  the  FTC  to  testify  first,  but  I’m  asking  for 
the indulgence of the Committee to allow this to occur. 

So, Mr. Sorrell, if you will come forward, we’ll receive your testi-

mony. 
STATEMENT  OF  HON.  WILLIAM  H.  SORRELL,  VERMONT 
ATTORNEY  GENERAL;  PRESIDENT,  NATIONAL  ASSOCIATION 
OF ATTORNEYS GENERAL 
Mr.  SORRELL.  Thank  you,  Senator  Smith,  members  of  the  Com-
mittee.  I  appreciate  your  giving  me  the  opportunity  to  appear  be-
fore you today to speak on these important issues. 

I am currently the President of the National Association of Attor-
neys  General,  but  I  have  not  consulted  with  all  of  my  colleagues 
about  the  substance  of  my  testimony.  I’m  confident  that  most,  if 
not  all,  would  agree  with  the  sentiments  that  I  will  express  today, 
and have expressed in my prepared, or filed, testimony. But please 
let me testify as the Attorney General of Vermont today. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you. You’re welcome. 
Mr. SORRELL. And I assume, Senator, that my pre-filed testimony 

will be made part of the record. 

tion. Hearing none, so ordered. 

Senator  SMITH.  We’ll  include  it  in  the  record,  if  there’s  no  objec-

Mr. SORRELL. And if you’d allow me, Senator, I didn’t know that 
Seersucker  suits  were  allowed  attire  today,  and—I  have  one,  and 
I don’t find many opportunities in Vermont to wear it, so I’m sorry 
I didn’t get that information. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  SMITH.  We’ve  adopted  it,  above  the  Mason-Dixon  Line, 

at the urging of our southern colleagues. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  SMITH.  And  thank  you,  Senator  Nelson,  for  wearing 

yours today. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator SMITH. And Senator Snowe, from Maine, absolutely. 
Mr.  SORRELL.  As  our  culture  changes,  the  way  we  go  about  our 
commerce  changes,  not  only  for  legitimate  businesses,  but  those 
scam-artists  and  thieves  who,  maybe  in  the  past,  broke  into  our 
homes  to  steal  our  jewelry,  our  televisions,  our  computers,  our 
stereos, or whatever. But the reality is—and we, as individuals, we 
lock  our  doors,  we  lock  our  cars,  we  park  in  well-lit  areas,  we  try 
to  protect  ourselves—but  the  reality  is  that,  quite  apart  from  our 
cash  assets  and  other  valuables—is  that,  as  our  economy  has 
changed,  our  truly  valuable  assets  are  frequently  not  our  posses-
sions,  but  our  access  to  credit.  And  we  can’t  lock  our  doors  in  the 
same  way  to  protect  ourselves  from  those  who  want  to  access  our 
credit or to, in this information and electronic age, to withdraw the 
assets  that  we  have  with  financial  institutions.  And,  frankly,  con-
sumers  need  government  help  to  allow  us  to  figuratively  lock  our 
doors  and  protect  ourselves  from  identity  theft.  We’ve  heard  the 
earlier  testimony  today—I’m  sure  we’ll  hear  more  from  the  Com-
mission—about,  you  know,  ten  million  Americans  victimized  by 
identity  theft,  the  number  of  hours  that  it  takes  to  try  to  regain 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

your  good  name  when  you’re  the  victim  of  identity  theft.  And,  you 
know,  it’s  like  the  crime  that  keeps  victimizing  you.  As  you  try  to 
access  credit  after  someone  has  assumed  your  identity,  and 
scammed  either  you  individually  or  businesses  to  the  tune  of  $50 
billion a year in a crime that is continuing to escalate. 

And  so,  we  do  need  government  assistance  to  protect  our  per-
sonal information. And I think we all owe a debt of gratitude to the 
legislators  of  California  for  enacting  their  security-breach  notifica-
tion  law.  But  for  the  existence  of  the  law—I  don’t  think  we  would 
be focused as much today as we are, but for the California law and 
the  ChoicePoint  and  then  the  subsequent  disclosures,  which  seem 
to be escalating in numbers and volume of records and individuals 
affected.  It’s  almost  a  daily,  certainly  a  weekly,  occurrence  of  new 
security breaches coming to the fore. 

The  states  have  followed  California’s  lead.  And  a  handful  of 
states  have  passed  their  own  security-breach  laws.  Many  other 
state  legislators  are  considering  doing  the  same.  We  believe,  and 
strongly  encourage,  that  there  be  a  Federal  security-breach  notifi-
cation  law.  At  the  same  time,  we  remain  concerned  that  what  is 
done  federally  remain  a  floor,  and  not  a  ceiling.  Similar  to  what 
you  did  with  the  Gramm-Leach-Bliley  legislation,  several  years 
back,  where  you  adopted  a  national  opt-out  standard  for  financial 
institutions,  banks,  insurance  companies  to  traffic  in  our  personal 
information,  you  allowed  states,  if  they  wished,  to  go  further. 
Vermont  was  one  of  the  states  that  took  advantage  of  your  lack  of 
preemption;  and  so,  a  more  protective  standard  of  opt-in  standard 
is the law in Vermont. And for those who feel that there has to be 
one standard, we can’t have these patchwork quilt—a quilt of regu-
lations—the  Vermont  economy  has  not  suffered.  Banks,  financial 
institutions,  and  insurance  companies  have  continued  to  come  into 
Vermont since the more protective opt-in standard has been imple-
mented.  So,  we  ask  for  a  Federal  law,  notification  law,  a  floor,  not 
a ceiling. 

Similarly,  we  ask  you  to  enact  a  Federal  unified,  one-place  pro-
gram to regulate data brokers. Again, that is a floor, and not a ceil-
ing.  We  ask  you  to  strengthen  the  so-called  safeguard  rules  under 
Gramm-Leach-Bliley  to  require  definitive  minimum  standards— 
minimum  standards—for  information  security  and  ensure  that 
these rules are written broadly enough to cover data brokers. And, 
finally, we just ask you to recognize the important role of state leg-
islatures  and  state  regulators  and  enforcement  authorities  in  the 
development  of  laws  in  this  area  of  security  breaches  and  security 
freeze legislation. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Sorrell follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF WILLIAM H. SORRELL, VERMONT ATTORNEY GENERAL; 

PRESIDENT, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF ATTORNEYS GENERAL 

I. Introduction 

Chairman  Stevens,  Co-Chairman  Inouye,  and  honorable  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee,  I  am  William  H.  Sorrell,  Attorney  General  of  the  State  of  Vermont  and 
President  of  the  National  Association  of  Attorneys  General.  I  very  much  appreciate 
the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  security  breaches  relating  to 
personal information of consumers and to discuss my recommendations for address-
ing some of the problems in this area. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

The  public  has  become  aware  of  numerous  incidences  of  security  breaches  in  the 
past  2  months  as  a  result  of  California’s  innovative  security  breach  notification 
laws.  These  security  breaches  expose  millions  of  consumers  to  potential  identity 
theft, a serious and rapidly growing crime that now costs our Nation $50 billion per 
year.  I  make  the  following  recommendations  to  address  the  problems  of  security 
breaches: 

tective state laws. 

empt more-protective state laws. 

• Enact a Federal security breach notification law that doesn’t preempt more-pro-
• Enact a unified Federal program for regulation of data brokers that doesn’t pre-
• Strengthen  the  Gramm-Leach-Bliley  ‘‘Safeguards  Rules’’  to  require  definitive 
minimum standards for information security, and ensure that these rules cover 
data brokers. 
• Recognize  the  important  role  of  state  legislative  and  law  enforcement  efforts, 

particularly in developing security freeze laws. 

II. The Growth of Security Breaches 

Over  the  past  several  months,  consumers,  law  enforcement  officials,  and  policy-
makers have learned about a rising incidence of security breaches at private compa-
nies  and  public  institutions  that  have  exposed  consumers’  personal  information  to 
unauthorized third parties. Separately, these breaches involve the personal informa-
tion in tens of thousands, hundreds of thousands, and even millions of records about 
consumers nationwide. 
A. Numerous Serious Incidences of Security Breaches Have Occurred Since 2002 

Nine known incidences of serious security breaches have occurred in the past few 

years. It is instructive to examine each one in some detail. 

• Ford  Motor  Credit:  In  2002,  three  individuals  were  arrested  for  downloading 
credit  reports  on  more  than  30,000  consumers,  and  then  selling  the  credit  re-
ports  to  street  criminals  who  emptied  the  victims’  bank  accounts  and  opened 
credit  cards  in  their  names.  The  scheme  centered  on  an  employee  of  Teledata, 
a  company  that  provides  credit  reports  to  banks  and  other  lenders.  The  em-
ployee  stole  the  passwords  and  codes  of  Teledata  clients,  such  as  Ford  Motor 
Company,  in  order  to  download  credit  reports  from  the  three  major  credit  re-
porting  agencies.  Over  a  10-month  period,  the  password  and  code  for  Ford 
Motor  Credit  alone  was  used  to  download  13,000  credit  reports  from  just  one 
credit reporting agency, Experian. Losses were originally calculated at $2.7 mil-
lion, but were expected to rise significantly in the weeks after the arrest.1 
• Acxiom:  In  2003,  the  records  of  an  unknown  number  of  consumers  were  stolen 
from Acxiom, a commercial data broker based in Little Rock, Arkansas. Hackers 
were able to download the passwords of 300 business accounts on Acxiom’s sys-
tem, costing the company $5.8 million in losses.2 
• ChoicePoint: In February 2005, ChoicePoint notified 144,000 consumers nation-
wide  that  their  personal  data  may  have  been  accessed  by  ‘‘unauthorized  third 
parties’’ posing as small-business customers. ChoicePoint, an Atlanta-based data 
broker and specialty credit reporting agency with databases that contain 19 bil-
lion  public  records  about  consumers  and  businesses,  reported  that  identity 
thieves  created  as  many  as  50  fake  companies  that  posed  as  customers  and 
gained access to consumer data.3 The Los Angeles, California, Sheriff’s Depart-
ment  estimates  that  the  number  of  consumers  whose  personal  data  has  been 
compromised is in the millions.4 
• Bank  of  America:  Also  in  February  2005,  Bank  of  America  announced  that  it 
lost  computer  back-up  tapes  containing  personal  information,  including  names 
and  Social  Security  numbers  (SSNs),  relating  to  1.2  million  Federal  workers. 
The  tapes  had  been  lost  2  months  earlier  in  December  2004.  Bank  of  America 
received  permission  from  its  Federal  regulators  to  notify  consumers  about  the 
security problem in mid-February.5 
• DSW Shoe Warehouse: On March 8, 2005, DSW Shoe Warehouse announced the 
theft  of  credit  card  information,  including  account  numbers  and  customer 
names, relating to customers at more than 100 of its 175 stores. The theft took 
place  over  a  three-month  period  beginning  in  early  December  2004.  The  theft 
was  originally  reported  to  affect  ‘‘more  than  100,000’’  consumers.  On  April  18, 
2005, DSW disclosed that the number of affected consumers was 1.4 million, 10 
times  as  many  as  originally  reported.  DSW  is  a  subsidiary  of  Retail  Ventures, 
Inc., based in Columbus, Ohio.6 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

• LexisNexis:  On  March  10,  2005,  LexisNexis  owner  Reed  Elsevier  PLC  an-
nounced  that  records  of  about  32,000  consumers  were  accessed  and  com-
promised  when  intruders  used  log-ins  and  passwords  of  a  few  legitimate  cus-
tomers  to  obtain  access  to  a  database  of  public  records.  The  records  included 
names,  addresses,  SSNs,  and  driver’s  license  numbers.  The  breach  occurred  at 
Boca  Raton,  Florida-based  Seisint,  a  data  broker  recently  purchased  by  Reed 
Elsevier  and  integrated  into  LexisNexis.  Seisint  stores  millions  of  personal 
records about consumers nationwide.7 On April 12, 2005, LexisNexis announced 
that an additional 280,000 consumers nationwide had been affected by other se-
curity breaches of Seisint data over the past 2 years.8 
• Boston College: In late March 2005, Boston College notified 106,000 alumni that 
a  hacker  had  gained  access  to  a  computer  database  containing  their  personal 
information. College officials stated that they had to tell the affected alumni liv-
ing  in  California  about  the  theft  due  to  California’s  notification  law.  The  offi-
cials therefore decided to tell alumni who live in other states, too, to help them 
limit their exposure to identity theft.9 
• University of California: On April 1, 2005, University of California-Berkeley offi-
cials  announced  that  a  laptop  computer  containing  information  about  98,000 
students  and  alumni  had  been  stolen  a  month  earlier.  The  information,  includ-
ing  names,  SSNs,  and  in  some  instances  birth  dates  and  addresses,  was 
unencrypted, although the laptop was password-protected. This breach followed 
another incident at UC-Berkeley in September 2004 in which a hacker obtained 
the  names,  SSNs,  and  other  identifying  information  belonging  to  600,000  peo-
ple.10 
• San  Jose  Medical  Group:  On  April  8,  2005,  the  San  Jose  (California)  Medical 
Group  notified  nearly  185,000  current  and  former  patients  that  their  financial 
and  medical  records  might  have  been  exposed  following  the  theft  of  computers. 
The theft occurred after the group copied patient and financial information from 
its  secure  servers  to  two  local  PCs  as  part  of  a  patient  billing  project  and  the 
group’s year-end audit.11 
• Ameritrade:  On  April  19,  2005,  Ameritrade  reported  that  account  information 
relating  to  as  many  as  200,000  customers  may  have  been  lost  when  a  package 
containing tapes with back-up information on customers’ accounts went missing. 
A shipping company Ameritrade uses misplaced the tapes.12 
• HSBC/Ralph  Lauren:  On  April  13,  2005,  the  British  financial  firm  HSBC  an-
nounced  that  criminals  may  have  obtained  access  to  credit  card  information  of 
at  least  180,000  consumers  who  used  MasterCard  credit  cards  to  make  pur-
chases  at  Polo  Ralph  Lauren  Corp.  The  circumstances  that  led  to  the  breach 
have  remained  murky.  Although  the  letter  sent  by  HSBC  told  affected  con-
sumers that the financial firm was ‘‘unaware of any fraudulent activity on your 
account,’’ HSBC advised consumers to replace their credit cards.13 
• Time Warner: On May 3, 2005, Time Warner announced that a cooler-sized con-
tainer of computer tapes containing personal information about 600,000 current 
and  former  employees  was  lost  by  data-storage  company  Iron  Mountain,  Inc., 
based  in  Boston,  apparently  during  a  truck  ride  to  a  data-storage  facility.  The 
lost  tapes  contained  the  names  and  SSNs,  as  well  as  other  data,  about  85,000 
current and over 500,000 former employees dating to 1986.14 
• Bank of America, Commerce Bank, PNC Bank, and Wachovia: On May 23, 2005, 
Hackensack, New Jersey, police announced that bank employees may have sto-
len financial records of 700,000 customers of four banks: Charlotte, North Caro-
lina-based Bank of America and Wachovia, Cherry Hill, New Jersey-based Com-
merce Bank, and PNC Bank of Pittsburgh. The bank employees sold the finan-
cial records to collection agencies, according to the police.15 
• CitiFinancial:  On  June  6,  2005,  CitiFinancial,  the  consumer  finance  division  of 
Citigroup,  Inc.,  said  that  computer  tapes  containing  personal  data  relating  to 
3.9 million U.S. customers had been lost by shipper UPS. The data included ac-
count information, payment histories, and SSNs.16 

Several  conclusions  can  be  drawn  from  a  review  of  these  events.  Hackers  and 
identity  thieves  employ  both  high-tech  means  for  stealing  passwords  and  other  log- 
in  information  to  access  consumers’  personal  information,  as  evidenced  by  the 
LexisNexis and Acxiom breaches, as well as low-tech techniques to breach informa-
tion  systems,  as  evidenced  by  the  ChoicePoint  incident.  Other  security  breaches, 
such  as  those  experienced  by  CitiFinancial,  Time  Warner,  and  HSBC,  reveal  gaps 
in  offline  handling  of  personal  information,  including  trucking,  air  transport,  and 
other  traditional  logistical  systems.  In  addition,  although  the  pace  of  disclosures 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

about these breaches has accelerated over the past few months, it is safe to presume 
that  breaches  have  been  occurring  regularly  over  the  past  several  years.  What  has 
changed  is  not  the  existence  of  the  problem,  but  rather  the  public’s  awareness  of 
it. 
B.  The  Public  Has  Learned  About  These  Breaches  As  a  Result  of  California’s 

Security Breach Notification Laws 

On  July  1,  2003,  California’s  security  breach  notification  laws  went  into  effect. 
These laws require businesses and California public institutions to notify the public 
about  any  breach  of  the  security  of  their  computer  information  system  where 
unencrypted  personal  information  was,  or  is  reasonably  believed  to  have  been,  ac-
quired  by  an  unauthorized  person.17 California’s  laws  require  that  the  notice  be 
given  without  unreasonable  delay  and  consistent  with  the  legitimate  needs  of  law 
enforcement,  who  can  request  a  delay  in  notification  if  the  notice  would  impede  a 
criminal investigation of the incidence.18 ‘‘Personal Information’’ is defined as an in-
dividual’s  first  name  or  first  initial  and  last  name  in  combination  with  any  one  or 
more  of  the  following  data  elements,  when  either  the  name  or  the  data  element  is 
not encrypted: 

• Social Security number. 
• Driver’s license number or California Identification Card number. 
• Account number, credit or debit card number, in combination with any required 
security  code,  access  code,  or  password  that  would  permit  access  to  an  individ-
ual’s financial account.19 

The California law allows a business or public institution to satisfy the notice re-
quirement in several ways: written notice through the mail; electronic notice in con-
formity  with  the  Federal  Electronic  Signatures  Act; 20 substitute  notice  through  e- 
mail,  website  publication,  and  major  statewide  news  media  if  more  than  500,000 
consumers are affected; or in conformity with the business’s or institution’s own no-
tification  system,  if  it  meets  the  timeliness  requirements  of  the  California  security 
breach notification laws.21 

California’s  unique  and  innovative  laws  in  this  area  have  ensured  awareness  of 
the  growing  problem  of  data  leaks  that  are  plaguing  our  Nation’s  businesses  and 
public institutions. 
III. The Effect of Security Breaches 

Identity  theft,  already  a  growing  problem,  is  likely  to  grow  even  more  rapidly  as 
a  result  of  security  breaches.  These  data  leaks  expose  consumers  to  the  threat  of 
identity  theft  by  the  criminals  who  gain  access  to  consumers’  personal  information. 
MSNBC  has  noted  that  in  the  six-week  period  from  mid-February  through  early 
April,  the  rash  of  data  heists  has  exposed  more  than  two  million  U.S.  consumers 
to  possible  identity  theft.22 Since  that  time,  an  additional  4.6  million  U.S.  con-
sumers  and  employees  have  been  exposed  to  possible  identity  theft,  bringing  the 
total  number  of  consumers  affected  by  data  heists  in  2005  to  6.6  million  U.S.  con-
sumers and employees. 

Current  estimates  of  the  incidence  of  identity  theft  in  the  United  States  are  dis-
turbingly high. According to a survey released in January 2005 by Javelin Strategy 
& Research, about 9.3 million U.S. adults were victims of identity theft between Oc-
tober 2003 and September 2004.23 

Even though the vast majority of victims of identity theft do not report the crime 
to law enforcement authorities or credit bureaus,24 the reported incidence of identity 
theft has grown dramatically. The Federal Trade Commission reported in February 
2005  that  the  number  of  identity  theft  complaints  submitted  to  its  Consumer  Sen-
tinel  database  has  grown  from  161,896  in  2002  to  246,570  in  2004,25 representing 
a  growth  rate  of  more  than  50  percent  in  2  years.  Victims’  information  is  misused 
to  perpetrate  financial  fraud  in  the  vast  majority  of  cases:  fraud  involving  credit 
cards, checking and savings accounts, and electronic funds transfers represented 46 
percent  of  the  complaints  in  2004.26 Out  of  the  50  Metropolitan  Statistical  Areas 
that  have  generated  the  greatest  number  of  complaints  relative  to  population,  six 
are in California, four are in Texas, three each in of New York, Ohio, Pennsylvania, 
and Wisconsin, and two are in Illinois.27 Arizona victims of identity theft have filed 
the  largest  number  of  complaints  relative  to  population,  followed  by  Nevada,  Cali-
fornia, Texas, Colorado, Florida, New York, Washington, Oregon, and Illinois.28 

Identity  theft  has  a  deeply  negative  impact  on  our  Nation’s  economy.  According 
to  a  survey  published  by  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  in  September  2003,  the 
total  cost  of  identity  theft  approaches  $50  billion  per  year,  with  victims  bearing 
about  $5  billion  of  the  losses  and  businesses  bearing  the  remaining  $45  billion. 29 
The  average  loss  from  the  misuse  of  a  victim’s  personal  information  is  $4,800,  but 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

for  victims  who  had  new  credit  card  and  other  accounts  opened  in  their  name,  the 
average loss is $10,200. 30 Overall, victims spent almost 300 million hours resolving 
problems  relating  to  identity  theft  in  1  year,  with  almost  two-thirds  of  this  time— 
194  million  hours—spent  by  victims  who  had  new  credit  card  and  other  accounts 
opened in their name. 31 
IV. Consumers’ and State Officials’ Concerns about Security Breaches 

The  recent  rash  of  information  heists  has  had  several  important  effects  on  the 
state  and  local  level.  Consumers  have  expressed  concern  about  their  current  level 
of knowledge of security breaches and what they realistically can do if they become 
a  victim.  State  Attorneys  General  and  other  state  and  local  officials  have  taken  ac-
tion in a number of areas to resolve these concerns. 
A. Consumers Across the Nation Want to Receive Notice of Security Breaches 

The  citizens  of  California  have  received  notice  of  security  breaches  as  a  result  of 
their  state’s  innovative  law.  Consumers  in  the  remaining  49  states,  the  District  of 
Columbia, and the territories want the same right to receive notice when their per-
sonal information is accessed in an unauthorized manner. Unfortunately, in the ab-
sence  of  other  state  laws  or  a  Federal  minimum  standard,  consumers  in  the  other 
states  have  not  consistently  received  notices  in  the  recent  spate  of  incidences. 
LexisNexis  sent  notices  on  a  voluntary  basis  to  affected  consumers  nationwide. 
ChoicePoint  originally  sent  notices  only  to  California  residents;  only  after  receiving 
letters  from  the  Attorneys  General  of  numerous  states  did  ChoicePoint  expand  its 
notification  process  to  include  potentially  affected  consumers  in  all  states. 32 The 
Ohio  Attorney  General  was  forced  to  file  suit  against  DSW,  Inc.,  because  the  com-
pany  had  not  provided  individual  notice  to  half  of  the  consumers—approximately 
700,000 out of 1.4 million—affected by the security breach it experienced. 33 

In  addition  to  haphazard  notification,  the  paucity  of  regulation  in  this  area  has 
led to another problem. The notices that were actually received by consumers came 
in  envelopes  from  ‘‘ChoicePoint.’’  Consumers  have  no  idea  who  ChoicePoint  is  be-
cause  consumers  typically  have  no  business  relationship  with  ChoicePoint.  We 
learned  of  instances  where  consumers  tossed  out  the  notification  letters  without 
opening them, on the assumption that the letters were another unsolicited offer for 
a credit card or some other piece of junk mail. 

Rapid  and  effective  notice  of  a  security  breach  is  an  important  first  step  to  lim-
iting  the  extent  of  harm  that  may  be  caused  by  identity  theft.  The  Federal  Trade 
Commission  reports  that  the  overall  cost  of  an  incident  of  identity  theft,  as  well  as 
the  harm  to  the  victims,  is  significantly  smaller  if  the  misuse  of  the  victim’s  per-
sonal  information  is  discovered  quickly. 34 For  example,  when  the  misuse  was  dis-
covered within 5 months of its onset, the value of the damage was less than $5,000 
in  82  percent  of  the  cases.  When  victims  did  not  discover  the  misuse  for  6  months 
or  more,  the  value  of  the  damage  was  $5,000  or  more  in  44  percent  of  the  cases. 
In  addition,  new  accounts  were  opened  in  less  than  10  percent  of  the  cases  when 
it  took  victims  less  than  a  month  to  discover  that  their  information  was  being  mis-
used,  while  new  accounts  were  opened  in  45  percent  of  cases  when  6  months  or 
more elapsed before the misuse was discovered. 35 

To  ensure  that  citizens  across  the  Nation  receive  adequate  notice  about  security 
breaches,  this  past  spring  28  states  considered  legislation  modeled  on  California’s 
law. 36 As of today, six states—Arkansas, Georgia, Indiana, Montana, North Dakota, 
and  Washington  State—enacted  security  breach  notification  laws  this  session. 37 
Legislatures in two additional states—Illinois and North Carolina—have passed se-
curity  breach  notification  bills,  but  these  bills  have  not  yet  been  signed  into  law. 
B.  After  Learning  About  a  Breach  of  Their  Personal  Information,  Consumers  Want 
to  Review  Their  Credit  Reports  to  Determine  if  They  Are  Victims  of  Identity 
Theft 

The 2003 amendments to the Federal Fair Credit Reporting Act 38 gave consumers 
the right to receive a free copy of their credit report once every 12 months, following 
the example previously set by 7 states that require credit reporting agencies to pro-
vide  free  reports  to  their  citizens. 39 However,  because  the  FTC  allowed  the  nation-
wide  credit  reporting  agencies  to  stagger  the  implementation  of  the  national  free 
credit report, consumers in the Southern states—Alabama, Arkansas, Florida, Geor-
gia,  Kentucky,  Louisiana,  Mississippi,  Oklahoma,  South  Carolina,  Tennessee,  and 
Texas—were  not  able  to  order  their  free  reports  under  Federal  law  until  June  1, 
2005.  And  consumers  in  the  Eastern  states—Connecticut,  Delaware,  Maine,  Mary-
land,  Massachusetts,  New  Hampshire,  New  Jersey,  New  York,  North  Carolina, 
Pennsylvania,  Rhode  Island,  Vermont,  Virginia,  and  West  Virginia,  as  well  as  the 
District  of  Columbia,  Puerto  Rico,  and  all  U.S.  territories—are  not  able  to  order 
their  free  reports  under  Federal  law  until  September  1,  2005. 40 As  a  result,  many 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

citizens  have  been  unable  to  see  their  credit  report  for  free  during  this  time  of 
heightened  anxiety  over  possible  identity  theft,  causing  great  frustration  in  the 
Eastern and Southern states. 

In  addition,  in  those  Eastern  and  Southern  states—like  Vermont—that  already 
require credit reporting agencies to provide free credit reports under state law, con-
sumers  have  been  confused  and  frustrated  because  the  credit  reporting  agencies 
have  not  adequately  adjusted  their  systems  to  enable  consumers  in  these  states  to 
easily  access  their  free  report  under  state  law.  Many  consumers  in  Vermont  at-
tempted  to  obtain  their  free  report  under  Vermont  law  after  learning  about  the 
ChoicePoint  and  other  security  breaches,  only  to  be  told—incorrectly—by  the  credit 
bureaus’ voice-mail systems that they were not eligible for a free credit report. 
C. Consumers Want to Control Access to Their Credit Reports so That Identity Theft 

does not Occur 

The  2003  amendments  to  the  Federal  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act  also  gave  con-
sumers the right to place a ‘‘fraud alert’’ on their credit reports for at least 90 days, 
with extended alerts lasting for up to 7 years in cases where identity theft occurs. 41 
Yet many states are considering enacting stronger measures to assist consumers in 
combating  the  rapidly  escalating  outbreak  of  security  breaches. 42 Two  states,  Cali-
fornia and Texas, allow consumers to place a ‘‘security freeze’’ on their credit report. 
A security freeze allows a consumer to control who will receive a copy of his or her 
credit  report,  thus  making  it  nearly  impossible  for  criminals  to  use  stolen  informa-
tion  to  open  an  account  in  the  consumer’s  name. 43 Security  freeze  provisions  will 
become  effective  in  2  weeks—on  July  1,  2005—in  two  additional  states,  Louisiana 
and Vermont. 44 

Although  the  credit  bureaus  argue  that  security  freezes  are  overkill  and  cause 
consumers  more  harm  than  good,  many  members  of  the  business  community  in 
Vermont  supported  implementation  of  our  security  freeze  law  enacted  last  year. 
Overall,  consumer  advocates  and  many  State  Attorneys  General  believe  that  secu-
rity  freeze  laws  are  one  of  the  most  effective  tools  available  to  stop  the  harm  that 
can  result  from  data  heists.  Twenty  states  considered  security  freeze  bills  this  past 
spring. 45 As  of  today,  three  of  these  states  enacted  the  measure:  Colorado,  Maine, 
and Washington. 46 The legislatures in Connecticut and Illinois also passed security 
freeze bills, but these bills have not yet been signed into law. 
V. Recommendations on Addressing the Problem of Security Breaches 

I  recommend  that  this  Committee  take  several  actions  to  address  the  security 
breach  problem,  with  its  concomitant  potential  effect  on  the  increased  incidence  of 
identity  theft.  The  recommendations  center  on  enactment  of  better  Federal  laws  to 
address  the  problem,  while  allowing  the  states  to  continue  to  perform  their  vital 
functions in assisting consumers and creating additional innovative solutions. 

1.  Enact  a  Federal  Security  Breach  Notification  Law:  Enact  a  Federal  law  re-
quiring  notice  of  security  breaches  in  appropriate  circumstances.  Allow  states 
to  enact  laws  that  are  more  protective  of  consumers,  thus  ensuring  that  states 
can continue devising additional innovative solutions to this issue. 
2. Enact a Federal Program for Regulation of Data Brokers: Enact a Federal law 
to  regulate  data  brokers  in  a  manner  similar  to  regulation  of  credit  reporting 
agencies.  Currently,  the  regulation  of  data  brokers  comes  under  a  scattered 
mixture  of  Federal  laws,  including  the  Federal  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act,  the 
Gramm-Leach-Bliley  Act  (GLBA), 47 and  a  few  other  laws,  and  arguably  these 
laws do not cover all the practices of data brokers. In developing a unified Fed-
eral  regulatory  scheme  for  data  brokers,  only  preempt  state  laws  to  the  extent 
that they are less protective of consumers. 
3. Strengthen the ‘‘Safeguards Rules’’: Enact a Federal law that will strengthen 
the  GLBA  Safeguards  Rules  issued  by  the  Federal  financial  regulators  and  the 
Federal Trade Commission. 48 Currently, these rules require the covered institu-
tions  to  develop  a  written  information  security  plan  that  describes  their  pro-
grams to protect customer information, and to maintain reasonable security for 
customer  information.  The  rules  were  intended  to  provide  flexibility  to  account 
for each covered institution’s size, complexity, scope of activities, and sensitivity 
of  information  handled.  However,  in  light  of  the  recent  wave  of  security 
breaches, we believe that more definitive minimum standards of information se-
curity  should  be  required,  and  that  the  Safeguards  Rules  should  be  expanded 
to more clearly cover data brokers. 
4.  Recognize  the  Important  Role  of  State  Legislative  and  Investigative  Efforts: 
States  are  providing  key  additional  protections  for  consumers.  Security  breach 
notification laws in California, Arkansas, Georgia, Indiana, Montana, North Da-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

kota,  and  Washington  State  and  security  freeze  laws  in  California,  Louisiana, 
Texas,  Vermont,  Colorado,  Maine,  and  Washington  State,  are  important  exam-
ples of the critical role the states play in developing innovative solutions to the 
complex problems presented by data breaches. In addition, State Attorneys Gen-
eral  and  local  law  enforcement  are  playing  critical  roles  in  the  investigations 
surrounding security breaches that have been disclosed to date. State and local 
law enforcement officials are cooperating with their Federal counterparts to in-
vestigate and prosecute the perpetrators, and to determine if there were defects 
in  security  systems  that  may  have  allowed  the  breaches  to  occur.  Congress 
should  recognize  these  vital  functions  provided  by  state  and  local  authorities, 
and ensure that these functions are not preempted. 

Thank you for giving me the opportunity to testify on this important subject. 

ENDNOTES 

1 Debaise  &  Dreazen,  Federal  Prosecutors  Break  Ring  of  Identity  Thieves,  Wall 
Street  Journal,  Nov.  26,  2002,  available  at  http://online.wsj.com/PA@VJBNA4R/ 
articlelprint/0,,SB1038249179137636588,,00.html. 

2 UDDOJ,  ‘‘Milford  Man  Pleads  Guilty  to  Hacking  Intrusion  and  Theft  of  Data 
Cost  Company  $5.8  Million,’’  Dec.  18,  2003,  available  at  http://www.usdoj.gov/ 
criminal/cybercrime/baasPlea.htm. 

3 Sullivan,  Data  base  Giant  Gives  Access  to  Fake  Firms;  Choicepoint  Warns  More 
Than  30,000  They  May  be  at  Risk,  MSNBC.com,  Feb.  14,  2005,  available  at 
http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/6969799/print/1/displaymode/1098/;  ChoicePoint: 
More  ID  theft  warnings,  CNN/Money,  Feb.  17,  2005,  available  at  http:// 
money.cnn.com/2005/02/17/technology/personaltech/choicepoint/. 

4 Perez & Brooks, For Big Vendor of Personal Data, A Theft Lays Bare the Down-

side, Wall Street Journal, May 3, 2005, at A1. 

5 Carrns,  Bank  of  America  Missing  Tapes  with  Card  Data,  Wall  Street  Journal, 

Feb. 28, 2005, at B2. 

6 Credit  Information  Stolen  From  DSW  Stores,  AP,  Mar.  8,  2005,  available  at 

http://biz.yahoo.com/ap/050308/dswlcreditlcardsl4.html?printer=1; DSW 
Alerts  Customers  of  Credit  Card  and  Other  Purchase  Information  Security  Issues, 
DSW,  Mar.  8,  2005,  available  at  http://www.dswshoe.com/ccpressrelease/pr/ 
index.html; DWS data theft larger than predicted, USA Today, Apr. 19, 2005. 

7 El-Rashidi,  LexisNexis  Owner  Reports  Breach  of  Customer  Data,  Wall  Street 

Journal, Mar. 10, 2005, at A3. 

8 ‘‘LexisNexis Concludes Review of Data Search Activity, Identifying Additional In-
stances  of  Illegal  Data  Access,’’  Apr.  12,  2005,  available  at  http://www.lexis 
nexis.com/about/releases/0789.asp. 

9 Bank  &  Conkey,  New  Safeguards  For  Your  Privacy,  Wall  Street  Journal,  Mar. 

24, 2005, at D1. 

10 Fischer  &  Krupnick,  UC  informs  people  of  data  security  breach,  Contra  Costa 
Times,  Apr.  1,  2005,  available  at  http://www.contracostatimes.com/mld/cctimes/ 
newslocal/states/california/counties/alamedalcounty/citieslneighborhoods/ 
berkeley/11284658.htm. 

11 Kawamoto,  Medical  Group:  Data  on  185,000  People  was  Stolen,  Apr.  8,  2005, 

available at http://www.nytimes.com/cnet/CNETl2100–7349l3–5660514.html. 

12 Ameritrade loses customer account info, CNN, Apr. 19, 2005. 
13 Sidel & Conkey, Security Breach Hits Credit Cards; HSBC Notifies 180,000 Peo-
ple Who Shopped at Ralph Lauren; Other Banks May Be Affected, Wall Street Jour-
nal, Apr. 14, 2005, at D1. 

14 Angwin & Bank, Time Warner Alerts Staff to Lost Data; Files for 600,000 Work-

ers Vanish During Truck Ride, Wall Street Journal, May 3, 2005, at A3. 

15 Bank data Theft Could Hit Nearly 700,000, AP, May 23, 2005. 
16 Citi  Notifies  3.9  Million  Customers  of  Lost  Data,  MSNBC,  June  7,  2005,  avail-

able at http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/8119720. 

17 Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.29 and 1798.82. 
18 Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.82(a) and (c); Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.29(a) and (c). 
19 Id. at 1798.82(e) and 1798.29(e). 
20 15 U.S.C.A. § 7001. 
21 Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.82(g) and (h); Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.29(g) and (h). 
22 Sullivan,  Is  Your  Personal  Data  Next?  Rash  of  Data  Heists  Points  to  Funda-

mental ID Theft Problem, MSNBC, Apr. 4, 2005. 

23 Saranow  &  Leiber,  Freezing  Out  Identity  Theft,  Wall  Street  Journal,  Mar.  15, 

24 Synovate,  Federal  Trade  Commission—Identity  Theft  Survey  Report,  Sept. 
2003,  at  9,  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/2003/09/synovatereport.pdf.  Only 
about 25 percent of all victims report the crime to local police or to a credit bureau. 

2005, at D1. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

The  victims  of  the  most  serious  form  of  identity  theft,  involving  ‘‘new  accounts  and 
other frauds,’’ report the crime to law enforcement authorities only 43 percent of the 
time, and to credit reporting agencies 37 percent of the time. Id. 

25 National and State Trends in Fraud & Identity Theft, January–December 2004, 
FTC,  Feb.  1,  2005,  at  9,  available  at  http://www.consumer.gov/idtheft/stats.html. 

26 Id. at 10. 
27 Id. at 13. 
28 Id. at 14. 
29 Synovate,  Federal  Trade  Commission—Identity  Theft  Survey  Report,  Sept. 

30 Id. 
31 Id. 
32 See,  e.g.,  ‘‘ChoicePoint  to  Notify  Vermont  Consumers  Affected  by  Security 
Breach,’’  Vermont  Attorney  General  press  release,  Feb.  24,  2005,  available  at 
http://www.atg.state.vt.us/display.php?pubsec=4&curdoc=881. 

33 State  of  Ohio  v.  DSW,  Inc.,  Case  No.  05CVH06–6128  (Franklin  Cty,  OH,  June 

34 Synovate,  Federal  Trade  Commission—Identity  Theft  Survey  Report,  Sept. 

2003, at 6. 

6, 2005). 

2003, at 8. 

35 Id. 
36 According to the National Conference of State Legislatures, the following states 
are considering ‘‘breach of information’’ legislation: Alaska, Arizona, Arkansas, Colo-
rado,  Georgia,  Florida,  Illinois,  Indiana,  Maryland,  Michigan,  Minnesota,  Missouri, 
Montana,  New  Jersey,  New  York,  North  Carolina,  North  Dakota,  Ohio,  Oregon, 
Pennsylvania,  Rhode  Island,  South  Carolina,  Tennessee,  Texas,  Virginia,  Wash-
ington,  and  West  Virginia.  See  2005  Breach  of  Information  Legislation,  National 
Conference  of  State  Legislatures,  Apr.  1,  2005,  available  at  http://www.ncsl.org/ 
programs/lis/CIP/priv/breach.htm.  In  addition,  Massachusetts  in  also  considering 
a security breach bill. See, e.g., Mass. S.B. 184 (2005). 

37 Ark.  Code  Ann.  §§ 4–110–102  to  108;  Fla.  Stat.  ch.  817.5681;  Ga.  Code  Ann. 
§§ 10–1–910  to  912;  Ind.  Code  § 4–1–11;  Mont.  Code  Ann.  § 31–3–115;  N.D.  Cent. 
Code § 51–30–01 to 07; Wash. Rev. Code § 42.17. 

38 Pub. L. No. 108–159 (2003). 
39 See  15  U.S.C.A.  § 1681t(b)(4),  grandfathering  in  the  state  provisions  allowing 
free  reports  in  Colorado,  Georgia,  Maine,  Maryland,  Massachusetts,  New  Jersey, 
and Vermont. 

40 See  ‘‘Facts  for  Consumers:  Your  Access  to  Free  Credit  Reports,’’  FTC,  available 

at http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/conline/pubs/credit/freereports.htm. 

41 See 15 U.S.C.A. § 1681c–1. 
42 See  Saranow  &  Lieber,  Freezing  out  Identity  Theft,  Wall  Street  Journal,  Mar. 

15, 2005, at D1. 

43 See Cal. Civ. Code § 1785.11.2 (California); V.T.C.A., Bus. & C. § 20.034 (Texas). 
44 See LSA–R.S. § 9:3571.1 (Louisiana); 9 V.S.A. § 2480b (Vermont). 
45 According to the National Conference of State Legislatures, the following states 
are  considering  security  freeze  legislation:  Colorado,  Connecticut,  Hawaii,  Illinois, 
Indiana,  Kansas,  Kentucky,  Maine,  Maryland,  Missouri,  Nevada,  New  Jersey,  New 
Mexico,  New  York,  Oregon,  Pennsylvania,  South  Carolina,  Utah,  and  Washington. 
See Consumer Report Security Freeze Legislation 2005 Session, National Conference 
of  State  Legislatures,  Mar.  8,  2005,  available  at  http://www.ncsl.org/programs/ 
banking/SecurityFreezel2005.htm.  In  addition,  Massachusetts  is  considering  a  se-
curity freeze bill. See, e.g., Mass. S.B. 184 (2005). 

46 Colo. Rev. Stat. §§ 12–14.3–106.6 to 106.9 (effective July 1, 2006); Me. Rev. Stat. 
Ann. tit. 10, §§ 1313–DC to E (effective Feb. 1, 2006); Wash. Rev. Code § 19.182 (ef-
fective July 24, 2005). 

47 Title  V  of  the  Gramm-Leach-Bliley  Act,  15  U.S.C.  §§ 6801–09,  and  its  imple-
menting  privacy  rule,  Privacy  of  Consumer  Financial  Information,  16  C.F.R.  Part 
313. 

48 GLBA  requires  Federal  and  state  regulators  of  financial  institutions  to  issue 
‘‘safeguards rules’’. See 15 U.S.C. § 6801(b). The Federal banking agencies, state in-
surance authorities, and the Federal Trade Commission all issued comparable safe-
guards  rules.  See,  e.g.,  Interagency  Guidelines  Establishing  Standards  for  Safe-
guarding  Customer  Information,  66  Fed.  Reg.  8,  616–8,  641  (Feb.  1,  2001).  The 
FTC’s Safeguards Rule is found at 16 C.F.R. Part 314. 

Senator  SMITH.  Thank  you  very,  very  much  for  your  presence 
and your testimony, and we will take into consideration, obviously, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

the  things  you’re  requesting.  As  a  former  state  legislator,  many  of 
us, we appreciate that. 

Mr. SORRELL. Thank you, Senator. 
Senator SMITH. Senator Burns have a—— 
Senator BURNS. Mr. Chairman? 
Senator SMITH.—any of my colleagues have a question? 
Senator  BURNS.  Thank  you.  I  just  want  to  ask  a  question.  Like 
in  Vermont  and  states,  when  we  talk  about  people  who  collate— 
in other words, your data brokers—that used to be termed, I think, 
years  ago,  as  their  own  credit  bureaus.  They  were  licensed,  they 
were bonded, they took the information that was given to them by 
institutions on records, and that could only be accessed by permis-
sion of the person, along with the institution desiring the informa-
tion. Are we headed in that direction, where all data brokers would 
have  to  be  licensed  and  bonded  and  go  through  that  procedure  to 
be  a  legitimate  broker,  number  one?  And,  number  two,  anybody 
that  does  that  outside  of  that  would  be  in  an  illegal  business— 
we’re  trying  to  figure  out  how  do  we  get  a  handle  on  this,  because 
by  the  time  you’re  notified,  your  information  might  be  passed  on 
to  four  or  five  other  parties  before  you  can  do  anything  about  it. 
And  the  biggest  damage  that  we  suffer  is  our  credit.  Once  your 
credit  is  destroyed,  it  takes  forever—if  it  can  be  restored—it’s  a 
very difficult thing. 

Mr.  SORRELL.  I  think  that  there’s  a  balance  here.  Because  if  we 
look  at  the  way  the  economy  functioned  in  the  days  of  the  credit 
bureaus,  that  was  something  that  you  could  fairly  readily  get  a 
handle  on,  and  it  was  an  important  piece,  but  a  relatively  small 
piece  of  the  overall  functioning  of  commerce.  Now,  in  the  Informa-
tion Age, with the ability to collect more information and to trans-
mit  more  information  much  more  efficiently  and  effectively,  quick-
ly,  than  was  ever  the  case,  I  would—and,  speaking  for  myself— 
want  to  take  a  hard  look  at  the  negative  impacts  on  the  economy 
if you were to have specific individual registration of everyone that 
would fit under the umbrella definition of a data broker. Depending 
on how broad that definition is, you’d need a huge, potentially, reg-
ulatory operation to register and enforce. That’s why, I think, that 
creating safeguards that clearly affect and control all those that are 
in the data-broker—fit under that definition, with minimum stand-
ards  for  any  companies  that  are  collecting  this  personal  informa-
tion that we’re talking about today, of what they would need to do, 
as a minimum, to lock that door to protect that consumer informa-
tion, makes sense. The specific registration of each individual data 
broker, I don’t, frankly, know, Senator, how many people would fit 
under that category, and I’m reluctant to—— 

Senator BURNS. Well—— 
Mr. SORRELL.—say we should do it. 
Senator  BURNS.  Well,  we  probably  couldn’t  define,  but  I  finally 
figured out, though, that the only way, on identity theft—and espe-
cially  with  the  credit  and  credit  cards—maybe  we  should  take  our 
credit cards and maintain a balance in our credit cards that would 
be almost to our limit—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator BURNS. My wife does a good job of that. 
[Laughter.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

Senator  BURNS.  So  that  they—no  fraud  could  be  committed.  In 
other  words,  they  wouldn’t  be  accepted.  But  it  is  the  most  fearful 
thing,  I  think,  in  my  state  about  people,  and—because  it  has  hap-
pened—and you just hear horror stories with regard to that. 

Mr.  SORRELL.  One  of  the  things  that  certain  of  the  states—Cali-
fornia, Texas, Louisiana, Vermont, and a couple of other states now 
have  enacted  is  to  use  security  freeze  legislation,  which  allows  the 
individual consumer to communicate with the credit agencies—that 
all of the banks look to check your credit, to see whether to extend 
credit  to  you—allow  you  to  put  a  freeze  on  your  credit  reports 
and—so  that  outside  companies  cannot  access  your  credit  unless 
you  specifically  give  permission.  You’re  allowed,  under  state  stat-
ute,  to  so-called  ‘‘thaw’’  this,  so  that  if  you’re  going  for  a  mortgage 
or  a  car  loan,  that  the  potential  lender  will  be  able  to  access  your 
record. 

Senator SMITH. Senator Nelson had a brief question, as well. 
Senator BILL NELSON. Mr. Attorney General, you have described 
your  preference  to  approach  this  problem  in  many  of  the  elements 
of the legislation that’s been filed by several of the Members of this 
Committee.  And  you  also  recommend  that  the  regulation  of  these 
data  information  brokers  be  similar  to  the  way  that  we  regulate 
the  credit  reporting  agencies,  without  all  the  mumbo-jumbo  of  the 
licensing and all of that stuff. 

In  addition  to  what  you’ve  already  said,  what—you  would  cer-
tainly  embrace  the  concept  of  having  one-stop  shopping,  where, 
identity theft, somebody has a place to go. 

Mr. SORRELL. Yes. 
Senator BILL NELSON. How about in the overall picture of home-
land security, having an Assistant Secretary of Cybersecurity with-
in the Department of Homeland Security? 

Mr.  SORRELL.  Well,  I  think  I  understand  what  you’re  asking.  I 

think—it sounds like it makes sense to me, Senator. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  And,  clearly,  tightening  up  on  the  com-

mercial usage of Social Security numbers. 

Mr. SORRELL. Yes. I think that that’s critical. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  Do  you  embrace  the  concept  that  we  take 
the model of the California law, notification, and apply that nation-
ally? 

Mr.  SORRELL.  Yes,  I  do,  but  with  the  ability,  if  states  wished,  to 
go further, to be more protective of their citizens, to allow them to 
do that. Yes, sir. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  Absolutely,  I  agree  with  you  that  this 
ought  to  be  a  floor  upon  which  the  states  can  build  and  be  more 
creative. 

Mr. SORRELL. Thank you much. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  How  about  the  concept  of  utilizing  the 
Federal  Trade  Commission  as  the  place  of  the  Office  of  Identity 
Theft? 

Mr.  SORRELL.  I  don’t  pretend  to  be  fully  versed  on  all  the  nu-
ances  of  the  different  Federal  regulatory  bodies,  but  that  makes 
sense to me, from my knowledge. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  It  is  the  place  that  governs  the  credit  re-

porting agencies. 
OK, thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

Senator SMITH. Thank you, Senator Nelson. 
Attorney  General  Sorrell,  thank  you  for  your  presence  and  your 

testimony today. 

Mr. SORRELL. Thank you much. 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Mr. Chairman, can I say one— 
Senator SMITH. Oh. 
Senator PRYOR.—very briefly? And that is, I served with General 
Sorrel  when  I  was  the  Attorney  General  in  my  state—fine  person, 
fine  Attorney  General,  fine  public  servant.  And  I  think  this  Com-
mittee would really benefit from his thoughts, not just on this, but 
a  number  of  other  subjects,  because  he  has  really  committed  his 
professional  life  to  try  to  make  his  state,  and,  in  some  ways,  the 
Nation,  better  for  consumers  and  for,  really,  the  marketplace.  And 
so,  he  has  been  a  real  leader  on  this.  So,  I  hope  we’ll  take  his 
words to heart and consider what he has to say. 
Senator SMITH. We’ll do that, Senator Pryor. 
Senator Ben Nelson apparently has a question, too. 

STATEMENT OF HON. E. BENJAMIN NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEBRASKA 
Senator BEN NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
And,  Mr.  Attorney  General,  I  have  a  natural  inclination  to  sup-
port  states’  rights  and  the  right  of  the  state  to  protect  public 
health, welfare—in this case, the identity of its citizens. There was 
a  point  made  by  Senator  Feinstein  that  there’s  a  real  question 
about preemption here and whether or not there’s a conflict where, 
if we permit every state to do a patchwork quilt of regulation and/ 
or  legislation,  that  it  will  adversely  affect  commerce,  that  it  may 
not  facilitate  simply  identity  theft  protection,  at  the  risk  of  harm-
ing commerce. And she also said to me—I think it’s very optimistic 
on  her  part,  and  I  hope  it  will  be—it’ll  come  to  pass—and  that  is 
that  they’re  trying  to  work  out  the  whole  question  of  preemption 
to  permit  the  states  to  be  able  to  protect  at  some  level,  but  also 
recognize the interstate aspects of this. 

Could  you  give  us  maybe  just  a  little  bit  more  of  your  opinion 

about what you think that might consist of—— 

Mr. SORRELL. Well, I—— 
Senator  BEN NELSON.—and  whether  it’s  possible.  I  certainly 

hope that it is. 

Mr.  SORRELL.  I  think  it  is  possible,  Senator.  I  hear  the  argu-
ments  that  we  can’t  have  this  patchwork  quilt  of  different  regula-
tions, but the reality is, as I talked about, as the commerce changes 
this  really  is  a  global  economy  now.  And  so,  we  have  many,  many 
different  countries  that  have  their  own  rules  and  regulations.  We 
certainly, in the environmental arena, have different rules and reg-
ulations at the state level, that companies that do business nation-
ally and internationally must abide by when they’re doing business 
in an individual state. And they’re—and the beauty of the informa-
tion that we gather now is that, for many companies, they are look-
ing  to  market  to  you,  as  an  individual.  They  collect  information 
about  you,  your  income  level.  They  collect  data  from  other  places 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

about your buying habits. And it’s a niche-niche-niche market. And 
so,  the  companies  that  are  able  to  figure  out  what  you,  individ-
ually,  might  want,  and  to  market  to  you,  can  certainly  program 
their  computers  to  trigger  different  regulation—give  notice  of  dif-
ferent regulation provisions or standards at a different—certain zip 
code levels, or whatever. 

So,  I  am  not  one  who  buys  the  argument  that  we’re  going  to 
throw a wrench into the works of commerce by allowing states that 
wish  to  go  forward  to  do—go  further—to  do  so.  And  I  gave  the  ex-
ample  of  what  Vermont  has  done  to  better  protect  our  consumers 
under Gramm-Leach-Bliley legislation that you’ve enacted. 

Senator BEN NELSON. Thank you. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you very much. 
Senator ALLEN. Mr. Chairman, may I ask—— 
Senator SMITH. Yes. 
Senator ALLEN.—the Attorney General a question? 
Senator SMITH. Sure. 

STATEMENT OF HON. GEORGE ALLEN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM VIRGINIA 

Senator  ALLEN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you  for  hold-

ing this hearing. 

Attorney  General,  thank  you  for  being  here.  And  the  fact  that 
some  states,  such  as  you  all,  are  acting  on  this  shows  there’s  a 
need  for  us  to  strengthen  existing  laws.  In  a  somewhat  analogous 
situation  in  dealing  with  spyware,  there  are  some  of  us,  including 
the  Chairman  of  the  Committee,  who  recognize  this,  similar  to 
spyware, is not just in this country, it’s national, it’s international. 
There  should  be  a—and  the  way  I’m  looking  at  it  is,  have  a  na-
tional  standard.  On  spyware,  and  possibly  also  on  this  issue  here, 
of  breach  of  data,  or  data  mining,  and  so  forth,  have  a  national 
standard, tough standard, give assistance to the FTC to enforce it, 
but also allow the states attorneys general to also enforce that law. 
That’s  another  level  of  enforcement.  And  could  you  share  with  us 
what  your  view  would  be?  Let’s  assume  we  have  a  national  stand-
ard, but allow you and others, attorneys general in the country, to 
enforce  it,  with  proper  enhanced  penalties  for  those  who  are 
breaching  or  committing  these  sort  of  frauds.  What  would  your 
view be of that? 

Mr. SORRELL. We, right now, have the ability to protect our con-
sumers  against  some  of  these  issues  with  data  brokers.  For  exam-
ple, through our state consumer-protection laws, unfair and decep-
tive  practices.  Giving  us—having  a  Federal  standard  set,  and  giv-
ing  the  individual  states  the  ability  to  enforce  that  standard,  we 
would welcome that. The reality is, with the numbers, and the bur-
geoning  numbers,  of  those  perpetrating  these  crimes  of  identity 
theft,  the  numbers  of  victims—numbers  of  perpetrators,  it  will  be 
very  difficult  for  the  Federal  authorities,  alone,  to  try  to  catch  all 
the  bad  guys,  and  we  would  welcome  the  opportunity  to  have  the 
authority to help in that effort. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Great,  thank  you.  Thank  you,  Attorney  General. 
Mr. SORRELL. Thank you. 
Senator ALLEN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

Senator  SMITH.  Thank  you,  Attorney  General.  We  appreciate 

your presence. 

Mr. SORRELL. Thank you much. 
Senator  SMITH.  We  will  now  call  to  the  dais  the  Federal  Trade 
Commission.  We  are  grateful  for  their  patience.  And  the  first 
panel—or,  this  panel  will  consist  of  the  Honorable  Deborah 
Majoras,  Federal  Trade  Commission  Chairman;  the  Honorable 
Orson  Swindle,  Commissioner;  the  Honorable  Thomas  B.  Leary, 
Commissioner;  the  Honorable  Pamela  Jones  Harbour,  also  a  Com-
missioner;  and  the  Honorable  Jon  Leibowitz,  recently  put  on  the 
Commission. 

I  don’t  know  whether  my  colleagues  saw  it,  but  I’ll  include  it  in 
the record, a story in the Washington Post this morning, which be-
gins,  ‘‘Thousands  of  current  and  former  employees  at  the  Federal 
Deposit  Insurance  Corporation  are  being  warned  that  their  sen-
sitive personal information was breached, leading to an unspecified 
number of fraud cases.’’ That’s our challenge—to stop that. 

I would also like to note and thank Commissioner Swindle for his 
service  to  the  FTC.  Mr.  Swindle  is  leaving  the  FTC  at  the  end  of 
the month, and this will be his last time appearing before the Com-
mittee.  It’s  well  known  by  many  of  us  that  Commissioner  Swindle 
has  a  distinguished  military  career,  along  with  his  service  to  pro-
tect  consumers  at  the  FTC.  And,  sir,  we  thank  you  for  your  public 
service. 

Commissioner SWINDLE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator SMITH. Madam Chairman? 

STATEMENT OF HON. DEBORAH PLATT MAJORAS, CHAIRMAN, 

FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION 

Chairman  MAJORAS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  members  of  the 
Committee. I am Deborah Majoras, Chairman of the Federal Trade 
Commission. 

My fellow Commissioners and I appreciate the opportunity to ap-
pear before you today as we work to ensure the safety and security 
of  consumers’  personal  information.  The  views  expressed  in  the 
written testimony represent the views of the Commission. Our oral 
presentations  and  responses  to  your  questions  reflect  our  own 
views,  and  do  not  necessarily  reflect  the  views  of  the  Commission 
or any individual Commissioner. 

Advances  in  commerce,  computing,  and  networking  have  trans-
formed  the  role  of  consumer  information.  New  technologies  allow 
businesses  to  offer  consumers  a  wide  range  of  products  and  pay-
ment options, greater access to credit, and faster transactions. But 
with these benefits come some concerns about privacy and security 
of  consumer  sensitive  information  and,  in  particular,  the  threat  of 
identity theft, which we’ve heard so much about this morning, and 
which  my  colleague,  Commissioner  Harbour,  will  address  in  more 
detail. 

Several  current  laws  protect  consumer  sensitive  information,  de-
pending  on  how  that  information  is  collected  and  how  it  is  used. 
Both  the  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act  and  the  Gramm-Leach-Bliley 
Act, for example, address access to, and the security of, such infor-
mation in specific contexts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

The  Commission  has  brought  five  cases  against  companies,  such 
as Microsoft and Eli Lilly, challenging the failure to maintain ade-
quate data-security procedures. In each of these cases, the Commis-
sion alleged that the business misrepresented their privacy or secu-
rity procedures, in violation of section 5 of the FTC Act. 

Today,  I  am  announcing  that  the  Commission  has  brought  and 
settled its sixth action in this area, this one against BJ’s Wholesale 
Club, a Fortune 500 company with over $6 billion in annual sales. 
For  the  first  time,  we  allege  that  inadequate  data  security  can  be 
an unfair business practice under section 5. This action should pro-
vide  clear  notice  to  the  business  community  that  failure  to  main-
tain  reasonable  and  appropriate  security  measures,  in  light  of  the 
sensitivity  of  the  information,  can  cause  substantial  consumer  in-
jury and may violate the FTC Act. 

Our complaint alleges that BJ’s stored personal information from 
customers’  credit  and  debit  cards  on  computers  at  its  stores,  even 
without  a  legitimate  business  reason  for  doing  so,  and  then  failed 
to take appropriate steps to secure this information. The complaint 
alleges that, as a result, the customer data that BJ’s left unsecured 
ended up on counterfeit copies of cards that were used to make sev-
eral million dollars in fraudulent purchases. Federal law limits con-
sumers’  liability  for  unauthorized  use  of  the  credit  or  debit  card 
numbers.  In  this  case,  after  the  fraud  was  discovered,  banks  can-
celed  and  reissued  thousands  of  credit  and  debit  cards,  and  have 
turned to BJ’s to cover the cost of the identity theft and corrective 
actions.  According  to  SEC  filings,  as  of  May  2005,  the  amount  of 
outstanding claims was approximately $13 million. Our settlement 
requires  BJ’s  to  establish  a  comprehensive  and  rigorous  informa-
tion  security  program,  and  to  obtain  regular  security  assessments 
of that program from a qualified independent auditor. 

Recent security breaches, such as that alleged in BJ’s and all the 
others  we’ve  discussed  here  this  morning,  raise  questions  about 
whether  companies  that  maintain  sensitive  personal  information 
are taking adequate steps to protect it. 

My colleague to my right, Commissioner Swindle, will discuss the 

Commission’s efforts to promote greater information security. 

As  detailed  in  our  written  testimony,  as  this  Committee  is  con-
sidering  whether  to  enact  new  procedures  for  sensitive  consumer 
data—protections  for  sensitive  consumer  data,  several  measures 
should be considered. 

First,  Congress  should  consider  whether  companies  that  main-
tain  sensitive  consumer  information  should  be  required  to  imple-
ment  reasonable  security  procedures.  Any  such  requirement  could 
be  patterned  after  the  Commission’s  Safeguards  Rule  under  GLB. 
The Safeguards Rule provides a strong, but flexible, requirement to 
make  sure  that  information  is  maintained  securely.  It  recognizes 
that  security  is  an  ongoing  process,  and  not  a  set  of  technical 
standards. Currently, the Safeguards Rule applies only to customer 
information  collected  by  financial  institutions.  I  believe  the  same 
principles embodied in that rule makes sense for other entities that 
maintain sensitive information. 

Second, Congress should consider whether to require firms to no-
tify  consumers  if  sensitive  information  about  them  has  been 
breached  in  a  way  that  creates  a  significant  risk  of  identity  theft. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

Obviously,  many  people  agree  that  prompt  notice  in  appropriate 
circumstances  can  help  consumers  avoid  or  mitigate  identity  theft. 
At  the  same  time,  however,  requiring  notices  for  security  breaches 
that pose little or no risk may create confusion, even panic, and im-
pose  unnecessary  costs.  For  example,  consumers  may  cancel  credit 
cards  or  place  fraud  alerts  on  their  credit  files  even  if  such  meas-
ures  are  not  needed  and,  not  to  mention,  may  suffer  from  unwar-
ranted  worry  and  stress.  Perhaps  more  importantly,  if  notices  are 
sent  too  often,  consumers  will  become  numb  to  them  and  will  fail 
to pay attention. 

Formulating the right balance is difficult, and there are different 
notices  that  could  be  considered.  One,  of  course,  is,  in  effect,  pro-
mulgated by the Federal banking agencies, and another is in effect 
in California. And we think both of those deserve a close look. 

If  Congress  decides  to  enact  a  national  breach  requirement,  it 
might  consider  authorizing  the  FTC  to  conduct  a  rulemaking  to 
specify  a  standard  that  best  meets  the  needs  of  consumers. 
Through  a  rulemaking,  we  could  examine  the  different  standards 
that  have  already  been  operating  and  determine  how  well  they 
have worked. 

A third area for consideration is possible restrictions on the sell-
ing of Social Security numbers. My colleague, Commissioner Leary, 
will address Social Security numbers in greater detail. 

And, finally, given the globalization of the marketplace, effective 
law  enforcement  against  security  breaches  will  require  effective 
cross-border efforts. Accordingly, the Commission recommends that 
Congress  enact  cross-border  fraud  legislation,  which  my  colleague, 
Commissioner Leibowitz, will discuss in more detail. 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Commission,  thank  you  for 
your  attention  and  for  the  opportunity  to  be  here.  And  I  welcome 
any questions you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Chairman Majoras follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DEBORAH PLATT MAJORAS, CHAIRMAN, 

FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION 

I. Introduction 

Mr. Chairman, I am Deborah Platt Majoras, Chairman of the Federal Trade Com-
mission.1 My  fellow  Commissioners  and  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  be-
fore you today as we work to ensure the safety and security of consumers’ personal 
information. 

As  we  have  testified  previously,  advances  in  commerce,  computing,  and  net-
working  have  transformed  the  role  of  consumer  information.  Modern  consumer  in-
formation  systems  can  collect,  assemble,  and  analyze  information  from  disparate 
sources,  and  transmit  it  almost  instantaneously.  Among  other  things,  this  tech-
nology allows businesses to offer consumers a wider range of products, services, and 
payment options; greater access to credit; and faster transactions. 

Efficient  information  systems—data  that  can  be  easily  accessed,  compiled,  and 
transferred—also  can  lead  to  concerns  about  privacy  and  security.  Recent  events 
validate  concerns  about  information  systems’  vulnerabilities  to  misuse,  including 
identity theft. 
II. Background 

One particular focus of concern has been ‘‘data brokers,’’ companies that specialize 
in the collection and distribution of consumer data. Data brokers epitomize the ten-
sion  between  the  benefits  of  information  flow  and  the  risks  of  identity  theft  and 
other  harms.  Data  brokers  have  emerged  to  meet  the  information  needs  of  a  broad 
spectrum  of  commercial  and  government  users.2 The  data  broker  industry  is  large 
and  complex  and  includes  companies  of  all  sizes.  Some  collect  information  from 
original sources, both public and private; others resell data collected by others; and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

many do both. Some provide information only to government agencies or large com-
panies,  while  others  sell  information  to  smaller  companies  or  the  general  public  as 
well.  The  amount  and  scope  of  the  information  that  they  collect  varies  from  com-
pany  to  company,  and  many  offer  a  range  of  products  tailored  to  different  markets 
and  uses.  These  uses  include  fraud  prevention,  debt  collection,  law  enforcement, 
legal  compliance,  applicant  authentication,  market  research,  and  almost  any  other 
function  that  requires  the  collection  and  aggregation  of  consumer  data.  Because 
these databases compile sensitive information, they are especially attractive targets 
for identity thieves. 

Identity theft is a crime that harms both consumers and businesses. A 2003 FTC 
survey  estimated  that  nearly  10  million  consumers  discovered  that  they  were  vic-
tims  of  some  form  of  identity  theft  in  the  preceding  12  months,  costing  American 
businesses  an  estimated  $48  billion  in  losses,  and  costing  consumers  an  additional 
$5  billion  in  out-of-pocket  losses.3 The  survey  looked  at  the  two  major  categories  of 
identity  theft:  (1)  the  misuse  of  existing  accounts;  and  (2)  the  creation  of  new  ac-
counts in the victim’s name. Not surprisingly, the survey showed a direct correlation 
between  the  type  of  identity  theft  and  its  cost  to  victims,  in  both  the  time  and 
money spent resolving the problems. For example, although people who had new ac-
counts  opened  in  their  names  made  up  only  one-third  of  the  victims,  they  suffered 
two-thirds of the direct financial harm. The ID theft survey also found that victims 
of  the  two  major  categories  of  identity  theft  cumulatively  spent  almost  300  million 
hours—or  an  average  of  30  hours  per  person—correcting  their  records  and  reclaim-
ing  their  good  names.  Identity  theft  causes  significant  economic  and  emotional  in-
jury, and we take seriously the need to reduce it. 

As detailed in our recent testimony on this subject,4 there are a variety of existing 
Federal  laws  and  regulations  that  address  the  security  of,  and  access  to,  sensitive 
information that these companies maintain, depending on how that information was 
collected  and  how  it  is  used.  For  example,  the  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act  (FCRA) 5 
regulates  credit  bureaus,  any  entity  or  individual  who  uses  credit  reports,  and  the 
businesses that furnish information to credit bureaus.6 The FCRA requires that sen-
sitive  credit  report  information  be  used  only  for  certain  permitted  purposes.  The 
Gramm-Leach-Bliley  Act  (GLBA) 7 prohibits  financial  institutions  from  disclosing 
consumer  information  to  non-affiliated  third  parties  without  first  allowing  con-
sumers  to  opt  out  of  the  disclosure.  GLBA  also  requires  these  businesses  to  imple-
ment  appropriate  safeguards  to  protect  the  security  and  integrity  of  their  customer 
information.8 

In  addition,  Section  5  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  Act  (FTC  Act)  prohibits 
‘‘unfair  or  deceptive  acts  or  practices  in  or  affecting  commerce.’’ 9 Under  the  FTC 
Act, the Commission has broad jurisdiction to prohibit unfair or deceptive practices 
by a wide variety of entities and individuals operating in commerce. Prohibited prac-
tices  include  deceptive  claims  that  companies  make  about  privacy,  including  claims 
about  the  security  they  provide  for  consumer  information.10 To  date,  the  Commis-
sion has brought five cases against companies for deceptive security claims.11 These 
actions alleged that the companies made explicit or implicit promises to take reason-
able  steps  to  protect  sensitive  consumer  information,  but  because  they  allegedly 
failed  to  take  such  steps,  their  claims  were  deceptive.  The  consent  orders  settling 
these  cases  have  required  the  companies  to  implement  appropriate  information  se-
curity  programs  that  generally  conform  to  the  standards  that  the  Commission  set 
forth in the GLBA Safeguards Rule. 

In addition to deception, the FTC Act prohibits unfair practices. Practices are un-
fair if they cause or are likely to cause consumers substantial injury that is neither 
reasonably  avoidable  by  consumers  nor  offset  by  countervailing  benefits  to  con-
sumers or competition.12 The Commission has used this authority to challenge a va-
riety of injurious practices that threaten data security.13 

As  the  Commission  has  testified  previously,  an  actual  breach  of  security  is  not  a 
prerequisite  for  enforcement  under  Section  5;  however,  evidence  of  such  a  breach 
may  indicate  that  the  company’s  existing  policies  and  procedures  were  not  ade-
quate.14 It is important to note, however, that there is no such thing as perfect secu-
rity,  and  breaches  can  happen  even  when  a  company  has  taken  every  reasonable 
precaution.15 

Despite the existence of these laws, recent security breaches have raised questions 
about  whether  data  brokers  and  other  companies  that  collect  or  maintain  sensitive 
personal information are taking adequate steps to ensure that the information they 
possess  does  not  fall  into  the  wrong  hands,  as  well  as  about  what  steps  should  be 
taken  when  such  data  is  acquired  by  unauthorized  individuals.  Vigorous  enforce-
ment  of  existing  laws  and  business  education  about  the  requirements  of  existing 
laws and the importance of good security can go a long way in addressing these con-
cerns. Nonetheless, recent data breaches have prompted Congress to consider legis-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

lative  proposals,  and  the  Commission  has  been  asked  to  comment  on  the  need  for 
new legal requirements. 
III. Increasing Consumer Information Security 

The  Commission  recommends  that  Congress  consider  whether  companies  that 
hold sensitive consumer data, for whatever purpose, should be required to take rea-
sonable  measures  to  ensure  its  safety.  Such  a  requirement  could  extend  the  FTC’s 
existing GLBA Safeguards Rule to companies that are not financial institutions. 

Further,  the  Commission  recommends  that  Congress  consider  requiring  compa-
nies  to  notify  consumers  when  the  security  of  this  information  has  been  breached 
in  a  manner  that  creates  a  significant  risk  of  identity  theft.16 Whatever  language 
is  chosen  should  ensure  that  consumers  receive  notices  when  they  are  at  risk  of 
identity  theft,  but  not  require  notices  to  consumers  when  they  are  not  at  risk.  As 
discussed  below,  the  goal  of  any  notification  requirement  is  to  enable  consumers  to 
take  steps  to  avoid  the  risk  of  identity  theft.  To  be  effective,  any  such  requirement 
must  provide  businesses  with  adequate  guidance  as  to  when  notices  are  required. 
In addition, many have raised concerns about misuse of Social Security numbers. 
It is critical to remember that Social Security numbers are vital to current informa-
tion  flows  in  the  granting  and  use  of  credit  and  the  provision  of  financial  services. 
In addition, private and public entities routinely have used Social Security numbers 
for  many  years  to  access  their  voluminous  records.  Ultimately,  what  is  required  is 
to  distinguish  between  legitimate  and  illegitimate  collection,  uses,  and  transfers  of 
Social Security numbers. 

Finally,  law  enforcement  activity  to  protect  data  security  is  increasingly  inter-
national  in  nature.  Given  the  globalization  of  the  marketplace,  an  increasing 
amount of U.S. consumer information may be accessed illegally by third parties out-
side the United States or located in offshore databases. Accordingly, the Commission 
needs new tools to investigate whether companies are complying with U.S. legal re-
quirements to maintain the security of this information, and cross-border fraud leg-
islation  would  give  the  Commission  these  tools.  For  that  reason,  the  Commission 
recommends that Congress enact cross-border fraud legislation to overcome existing 
obstacles  to  information  sharing  and  information  gathering  in  cross-border  inves-
tigations and law enforcement actions.17 

For  example,  if  the  FTC  and  a  foreign  consumer  protection  agency  are  inves-
tigating  a  foreign  business  for  conduct  that  violates  both  U.S.  law  and  the  foreign 
country’s law, current law does not authorize the Commission to share investigative 
information with the foreign consumer protection agency, even if such sharing would 
further  our  own  investigation.  New  cross-border  fraud  legislation  could  ease  these 
restrictions,  permit  the  sharing  of  appropriate  investigative  information  with  our 
foreign counterparts, and give us additional mechanisms to help protect the security 
of U.S. consumers’ data whether it is located abroad or in the United States. 
A. Require Procedures To Safeguard Sensitive Information 

One  important  step  to  reduce  the  threat  of  identity  theft  is  to  increase  the  secu-
rity of certain types of sensitive consumer information that could be used by identity 
thieves to misuse existing accounts or to open new accounts, such as Social Security 
numbers,  driver’s  license  numbers,  and  account  numbers  in  combination  with  re-
quired  access  codes  or  passwords.18 Currently,  the  Commission’s  Safeguards  Rule 
under  GLBA  requires  financial  institutions  to  implement  reasonable  physical,  tech-
nical,  and  procedural  safeguards  to  protect  customer  information.  Instead  of  man-
dating  specific  technical  requirements  that  may  not  be  appropriate  for  all  entities 
and  might  quickly  become  obsolete,  the  Safeguards  Rule  requires  companies  to 
evaluate the nature and risks of their particular information systems and the sensi-
tivity  of  the  information  they  maintain,  and  to  take  appropriate  steps  to  counter 
these  threats.  They  also  must  periodically  review  their  data  security  policies  and 
procedures  and  update  them  as  necessary.  The  Safeguards  Rule  provides  a  strong 
but flexible framework for companies to take responsibility for the security of infor-
mation  in  their  possession,  and  it  reflects  widely  accepted  principles  of  information 
security,  similar  to  those  contained  in  the  Organization  for  Economic  Cooperation 
and  Development’s  Guidelines  for  the  Security  of  Information  Systems  and  Net-
works.19 

Currently,  the  Safeguards  Rule  applies  only  to  ‘‘customer  information’’  collected 
by ‘‘financial institutions.’’ 20 It does not cover many other entities that may also col-
lect, maintain and transfer or sell sensitive consumer information. Although we be-
lieve  that  Section  5  already  requires  companies  holding  sensitive  data  to  have  in 
place procedures to secure it if the failure to do so is likely to cause substantial con-
sumer  injury,  we  believe  Congress  should  consider  whether  new  legislation  incor-
porating  the  flexible  standard  of  the  Commission’s  Safeguards  Rule  is  appropriate. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

B. Notice When Sensitive Information Has Been Breached 

30 

Unfortunately,  even  if  the  best  efforts  to  safeguard  data  are  made,  security 
breaches  can  still  occur.  The  Commission  believes  that  if  a  security  breach  creates 
a significant risk of identity theft or other related harm, affected consumers should 
be notified. Prompt notification to consumers in these cases can help them mitigate 
the  damage  caused  by  identity  theft.  Notified  consumers  can  request  that  fraud 
alerts  be  placed  in  their  credit  files,  obtain  copies  of  their  credit  reports,  scrutinize 
their monthly account statements, and take other steps to protect themselves. 

The challenge is to require notices only when there is a likelihood of harm to con-
sumers.  There  may  be  security  breaches  that  pose  little  or  no  risk  of  harm,  such 
as  a  stolen  laptop  that  is  quickly  recovered  before  the  thief  has  time  to  boot  it  up. 
Requiring a notice in this type of situation might create unnecessary consumer con-
cern and confusion. Moreover, if notices are required in cases where there is no sig-
nificant  risk  to  consumers,  notices  may  be  more  common  than  would  be  useful.  As 
a result, consumers may become numb to them and fail to spot or act on those risks 
that  truly  are  significant.  In  addition,  notices  can  impose  costs  on  consumers  and 
on businesses, including businesses that were not responsible for the breach. For ex-
ample,  in  response  to  a  notice  that  the  security  of  his  or  her  information  has  been 
breached, a consumer may cancel credit cards, contact credit bureaus to place fraud 
alerts  on  his  or  her  credit  files,  or  obtain  a  new  driver’s  license  number.  Each  of 
these actions may be time-consuming for the consumer, and costly for the companies 
involved and ultimately for consumers generally. 

Currently  there  are  two  basic  approaches  in  place  that  are  used  to  determine 
when  notices  should  be  triggered.  The  first  is  the  bank  regulatory  agency  stand-
ard.21 Under  that  standard,  notice  to  the  Federal  regulatory  agency  is  required  as 
soon as possible when the institution becomes aware of an incident involving unau-
thorized  access  to  or  use  of  sensitive  customer  information.  In  addition,  notice  to 
consumers  is  required  when,  based  on  a  reasonable  investigation  of  an  incident  of 
unauthorized  access  to  sensitive  customer  information,  the  financial  institution  de-
termines that misuse of its information about a customer has occurred or is reason-
ably possible.22 

The  second  approach  is  found  in  the  California  notice  statute.23 Under  that  ap-
proach, all businesses are required to provide notices to their consumers when a de-
fined set of sensitive data, in combination with information that can be used to iden-
tify the consumer, has been or is reasonably likely to have been acquired by an un-
authorized  person  in  a  manner  that  ‘‘compromises  the  security,  confidentiality,  or 
integrity of personal information.’’ 24 

The  California  ‘‘unauthorized  acquisition’’  approach  to  requiring  consumer  notice 
does  not  compel  notice  in  every  instance  of  improper  access  to  a  database.  Instead, 
it  allows  businesses  some  flexibility  to  determine  when  a  notice  is  necessary,  while 
also providing a fairly objective standard against which compliance can be measured 
by  the  broad  range  of  businesses  subject  to  the  law.  Under  guidance  issued  by  the 
California  Office  of  Privacy  Protection,  a  variety  of  factors  can  be  considered  in  de-
termining  whether  information  has  been  ‘‘acquired,’’  such  as:  (1)  indications  that 
protected  data  is  in  the  physical  possession  and  control  of  an  unauthorized  person 
(such  as  a  lost  or  stolen  computer  or  other  device);  (2)  indications  that  protected 
data has been downloaded or copied; or (3) indications that protected data has been 
used  by  an  unauthorized  person,  such  as  to  open  new  accounts.25 One  issue  that 
is  not  directly  considered  is  what  action  to  take  in  cases  in  which,  prior  to  sending 
consumer  notification,  the  business  already  has  taken  steps  that  remedy  the  risk. 
For example, one factor to consider in deciding whether to provide notice is whether 
the  business  already  has  canceled  consumers’  credit  card  accounts  and  reissued  ac-
count numbers to the affected consumers. 

We have growing experience under both models to inform consideration of an ap-
propriate  national  standard.  Because  formulating  any  standard  will  require  bal-
ancing  the  need  for  a  clear,  enforceable  standard  with  ensuring,  to  the  extent  pos-
sible,  that  notices  go  to  consumers  only  where  there  is  a  risk  of  harm,  we  believe 
that  if  Congress  decides  to  enact  a  notice  provision,  the  best  approach  would  be  to 
authorize the FTC to conduct a rulemaking under general statutory standards. The 
rulemaking  would  set  the  criteria  under  which  notice  would  be  required  for  data 
breaches  involving  non-regulated  industries.  The  rulemaking  could  address  issues 
such  as  the  circumstances  under  which  notice  is  required,  which  could  depend  on 
the  type  of  breach  and  risk  of  harm,  and  the  appropriate  form  of  notice.  This  ap-
proach  would  also  allow  the  Commission  to  adjust  the  standard  as  it  gains  experi-
ence with its implementation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C. Social Security Numbers 

31 

Social  Security  numbers  today  are  a  vital  instrument  of  interstate  commerce. 
With  300  million  American  consumers,  many  of  whom  share  the  same  name,26 the 
unique  9-digit  Social  Security  number  is  a  key  identification  tool  for  business.  As 
the  Commission  found  in  last  year’s  data  matching  study  under  FACTA,  Social  Se-
curity  numbers  also  are  one  of  the  primary  tools  that  credit  bureaus  use  to  ensure 
that  the  data  furnished  to  them  is  placed  in  the  right  file  and  that  they  are  pro-
viding  a  credit  report  on  the  right  consumer.27 Social  Security  numbers  are  used 
in locator databases to find lost beneficiaries, potential witnesses, and law violators, 
and to collect child support and other judgments. Social Security number databases 
are  used  to  fight  identity  fraud—for  example,  they  can  confirm  that  a  Social  Secu-
rity  number  belongs  to  a  particular  loan  applicant  and  is  not  stolen.28 Without  the 
ability  to  use  Social  Security  numbers  as  personal  identifiers  and  fraud  prevention 
tools,  the  granting  of  credit  and  the  provision  of  other  financial  services  would  be-
come riskier and more expensive and inconvenient for consumers. 

While Social Security numbers have important legitimate uses, their unauthorized 
use  can  facilitate  identity  theft.  Identity  thieves  use  the  Social  Security  number  as 
a key to access the financial benefits available to their victims. Currently, there are 
various Federal laws that place some restrictions on the disclosure of specific types 
of information under certain circumstances. The FCRA, for example, limits the pro-
vision  of  ‘‘consumer  report’’  information  to  certain  purposes,  primarily  those  deter-
mining  consumers’  eligibility  for  certain  transactions,  such  as  extending  credit,  em-
ployment,  or  insurance.  GLBA  requires  that  ‘‘financial  institutions’’ 29 provide  con-
sumers  an  opportunity  to  opt  out  before  disclosing  their  personal  information  to 
third  parties,  outside  of  specific  exceptions,  such  as  for  fraud  prevention  or  legal 
compliance.30 Other  statutes  that  limit  information  disclosure  include  the  privacy 
rule under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996,31 which 
applies  to  health  care  providers  and  other  medical-related  entities,  and  the  Drivers 
Privacy  Protection  Act,32 which  protects  consumers  from  improper  disclosures  of 
driver’s license information by state motor vehicle departments. 

While  these  laws  provide  important  privacy  protections  within  their  respective 
sectors, they do not provide comprehensive protection for Social Security numbers.33 
For example, disclosure of a consumer’s name, address, and Social Security number 
may be restricted under GLBA when the source of the information is a financial in-
stitution,34 but in many cases the same information can be purchased on the Inter-
net  from  a  non-financial  institution.  The  problem  of  how  to  strengthen  or  expand 
existing protections in ways that would not interfere with the beneficial uses of So-
cial Security numbers is challenging. 

Although  the  Commission  has  extensive  experience  with  identity  theft  and  the 
consumer credit reporting system, restrictions on disclosure of Social Security num-
bers  could  have  a  broad  impact  on  areas  where  the  Commission  does  not  have  ex-
pertise.  These  areas  include  public  health,  criminal  law  enforcement,  and  anti-ter-
rorism efforts. Moreover, efforts to restrict disclosure of Social Security numbers are 
complicated by the fact that among the primary sources of Social Security numbers 
are  the  public  records  on  file  with  many  courts  and  clerks  in  cities  and  counties 
across  the  Nation.  Regulation  or  restriction  of  Social  Security  numbers  in  public 
records thus poses substantial policy and practical concerns. 

Ultimately, what is required is to distinguish between legitimate and illegitimate 
collection,  uses,  and  transfers  of  Social  Security  numbers.  The  Commission  would 
appreciate the opportunity to work with Congress to further evaluate the costs and 
benefits to consumers and the economy of regulating the collection, transfer, and use 
of Social Security numbers. 
IV. Conclusion 

New  information  systems  have  brought  benefits  to  consumers  and  businesses 
alike.  Never  before  has  information  been  so  portable,  accessible,  and  flexible.  In-
deed,  sensitive  personal  financial  information  has  become  the  new  currency  of  to-
day’s  high  tech  payment  systems.  But  with  these  advances  come  new  risks,  and 
identity  thieves  and  other  bad  actors  have  begun  to  take  advantage  of  new  tech-
nologies  for  their  own  purposes.  As  the  recent  focus  on  information  security  has 
demonstrated, Americans take their privacy seriously, and we must ensure that the 
many  benefits  of  the  modern  information  age  are  not  diminished  by  these  threats 
to consumers’ security. The Commission is committed to ensuring the continued se-
curity of consumers’ personal information and looks forward to working with you to 
protect consumers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

ENDNOTES 

32 

1 This written statement reflects the views of the Federal Trade Commission. Our 
oral  statements  and  responses  to  any  questions  you  may  have  represent  the  views 
of individual Commissioners and do not necessarily reflect the views of the Commis-
sion. 

2 For  more  information  on  how  consumer  data  is  collected,  distributed,  and  used, 
see  generally  Government  Accountability  Office,  Private  Sector  Entities  Routinely 
Obtain and use SSNs, and Laws Limit the Disclosure of this Information (GAO–04– 
11) (2004); Government Accountability Office, Social Security Numbers: Use is Wide-
spread  and  Protections  Vary,  Testimony  Before  the  House  Subcommittee  on  Social 
Security,  Committee  on  Ways  and  Means  (GAO–04–768T)  (statement  of  Barbara  D. 
Bovbjerg, June 15, 2004); Federal Trade Commission, Individual Reference Services: 
A  Report  to  Congress  (December  1997),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/1997/ 
12/irs.pdf). The Commission also has held two workshops on the collection and use 
of consumer information: ‘‘Information Flows, The Costs and Benefits to Consumers 
and  Businesses  of  the  Collection  and  Use  of  Consumer  Information,’’  was  held  on 
June  18,  2003;  and  ‘‘The  Information  Marketplace:  Merging  and  Exchanging  Con-
sumer Data,’’ was held on March 13, 2001. An agenda, participant biographies, and 
a  transcript  for  these  workshops  are  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/work-
shops/infoflows/030618agenda.html  and  http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/workshops/info 
mktplace/index.html, respectively. 

3 Federal  Trade  Commission,  Identity  Theft  Survey  Report  (Sept.  2003),  available 

at http://www.ftc.gov/os/2003/09/synovatereport.pdf. 

4 See,  e.g.,  Statement  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  Before  the  Subcommittee 
on  Financial  Institutions  and  Consumer  Credit,  Committee  on  Financial  Services, 
U.S.  House  of  Representatives,  on  Enhancing  Data  Security:  The  Regulators’  Per-
spective 
(May  18,  2005),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2005/05/data 
brokertest.htm. 

5 15 U.S.C. §§ 1681–1681x. 
6 Credit bureaus are also known as ‘‘consumer reporting agencies.’’ 
7 15 U.S.C. §§ 6801–09. 
8 The  FTC’s  Safeguards  Rule  implements  GLBA’s  security  requirements  for  enti-
ties  under  the  FTC’s  jurisdiction.  See  16  C.F.R.  pt.  314  (‘‘GLBA  Safeguards  Rule’’). 
The Federal banking regulators also have issued comparable regulations for the en-
tities under their jurisdiction. 

9 15 U.S.C. § 45(a). 
10 Deceptive  practices  are  defined  as  material  representations  or  omissions  that 
are  likely  to  mislead  consumers  acting  reasonably  under  the  circumstances. 
Cliffdale Associates, Inc., 103 FTC 110 (1984). 

11 Petco Animal Supplies, Inc. (FTC Docket No. C–4133) (Mar. 4, 2005); MTS Inc., 
d/b/a  Tower  Records/Books/Video  (FTC  Docket  No.  C–4110)  (May  28,  2004); 
Guess?, Inc. (FTC Docket No. C–4091) (July 30, 2003); Microsoft Corp. (FTC Docket 
No.  C–4069)  (Dec.  20,  2002);  Eli  Lilly  &  Co.  (FTC  Docket  No.  C–4047)  (May  8, 
2002).  Documents  related  to  these  enforcement  actions  are  available  at  http:// 
www.ftc.gov/privacy/privacyinitiatives/promiseslenf.html. 

12 15 U.S.C. § 45(n). 
13 These include, for example, unauthorized charges in connection with ‘‘phishing,’’ 
which are high-tech scams that use spam or pop-up messages to deceive consumers 
into disclosing credit card numbers, bank account information, Social Security num-
bers, passwords, or other sensitive information. See FTC v. Hill, Civ. No. H 03–5537 
(filed  S.D.  Tex.  Dec.  3,  2003),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2004/03/ 
phishinghilljoint.htm;  FTC  v.  C.J.,  Civ.  No.  03–CV–5275–GHK  (RZX)  (filed  C.D. 
Cal. July 24, 2003), available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/2003/07/phishingcomp.pdf. 
14 See  Statement  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  Before  the  House  Sub-
committee on Technology, Information Policy, Intergovernmental Relations, and the 
Census, Committee on Government Reform (Apr. 21, 2004) at 5, available at http:// 
www.ftc.gov/os/2004/04/042104cybersecuritytestimony.pdf. 

15 Id. at 4. 
16 Commissioner  Harbour  is  concerned  about  the  use  of  the  term  ‘‘significant’’  to 
characterize  the  level  of  risk  of  identity  theft  that  should  trigger  a  notice  to  con-
sumers. 

17 The  U.S.  Senate  passed  cross-border  fraud  legislation  last  year  by  unanimous 

consent: S. 1234 (‘‘International Consumer Protection Act’’). 

18 The  FTC  also  would  seek  civil  penalty  authority  for  its  enforcement  of  these 
provisions. A civil penalty is often the most appropriate remedy in cases where con-
sumer redress is impracticable and where it is difficult to compute an ill-gotten gain 
that should be disgorged from a defendant. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

19 FTC  Commissioner  Orson  Swindle  led  the  U.S.  delegation  to  the  OECD  Com-
mittee  that  drafted  the  2002  OECD  Security  Guidelines.  See  Organization  for  Eco-
nomic Cooperation and Development, Guidelines for the Security of Information Sys-
tems  and  Networks:  Toward  a  Culture  of  Security  (July  25,  2002),  available  at 
http://www.oecd.org/document/42/0,2340,enl2649l34255l15582250l1l1l1 
l1,00.html. 

20 Under  GLBA,  a  ‘‘financial  institution’’  is  defined  as  an  entity  that  engages  in 
one  or  more  of  the  specific  activities  listed  in  the  Bank  Holding  Company  Act  and 
its  implementing  regulations.  See  15  U.S.C.  § 6809(3).  These  activities  include  ex-
tending credit, brokering loans, financial advising, and credit reporting. 

21 See  Interagency  Guidance  on  Response  Programs  for  Unauthorized  Access  to 
Customer  Information  and  Customer  Notice,  70  Fed.  Reg.  15,736–54  (Mar.  29, 
2005). 

22 Under the guidance, this determination can be made by the financial institution 

in consultation with its primary Federal regulator. 

23 Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.82. 
24 Id. at § 1798.82(d). 
25 These factors are discussed in the California Office of Privacy Protection’s publi-
cation, Recommended Practices on Notification of Security Breach Involving Personal 
Information,  at  11  (Oct.  10,  2003),  available  at  http://www.privacy.ca.gov/rec-
ommendations/secbreach.pdf. 

26 According  to  the  Consumer  Data  Industry  Association,  14  million  Americans 

have one of ten last names, and 58 million men have one of ten first names. 

27 See Federal Trade Commission, Report to Congress Under Sections 318 and 319 
of the Fair and Accurate Credit Transactions Act of 2003 at 38–40 (Dec. 2004), avail-
able at http://www.ftc.gov/reports/facta/041209factarpt.pdf. 

28 The Federal Government also uses Social Security numbers as an identifier. For 
example,  HHS  uses  it  as  the  Medicare  identification  number,  and  the  IRS  uses  it 
as  the  Taxpayer  Identification  Number.  It  also  is  used  to  administer  the  Federal 
jury  system,  Federal  welfare  and  workmen’s  compensation  programs,  and  the  mili-
tary  draft  registration.  See  Social  Security  Administration,  Report  to  Congress  on 
Options  for  Enhancing  the  Social  Security  Card  (Sept.  1997),  available  at 
www.ssa.gov/history/reports/ssnreportc2.html. 

29 See supra n.20 (defining financial institution). 
30 GLBA protects some, but not all Social Security numbers held by financial insti-
tutions.  It  does  not,  for  example,  cover  Social  Security  numbers  in  databases  of  So-
cial  Security  numbers  furnished  by  banks  to  credit  bureaus  under  the  Fair  Credit 
Reporting Act (i.e., so-called ‘‘credit header’’ information) prior to the GLBA Privacy 
Rule’s July 2001 effective date. 

31 45  C.F.R.  pts.  160  and  164  (implementing  Sections  262  and  264  of  the  Health 

Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104–191). 

32 18 U.S.C. §§ 2721–25. 
33 The  Commission  may,  however,  bring  enforcement  actions  under  Section  5  of 
the  Federal  Trade  Commission  Act  against  entities  whose  privacy  or  security  prac-
tices are unfair or deceptive. 

34 See supra n.30 (discussing limitations of GLBA protection). 

Senator SMITH. Thank you, Chairman Majoras. 
I think we’ll go to Commissioner Swindle. 

STATEMENT OF HON. ORSON SWINDLE, COMMISSIONER, 

FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION 

Commissioner SWINDLE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman and members 
of  the  Committee.  And  I  also  thank  you  very  much  for  your  com-
ments and the courtesies that have been shown to me by this Com-
mittee,  its  Members,  and  its  staff.  It  has  really  been  a  pleasure 
working  with  you,  as  well  as  with  the  Federal  Trade  Commission. 
Information security is a complex and huge issue involving many 
challenges,  such  as  database  intrusions,  theft  of  sensitive  informa-
tion, viruses, and phishing. And recent headlines in the news have 
certainly  brought  into  dramatic  focus  the  need  for  data  security. 
The  FTC  has  been  actively  involved  in  promoting  the  importance 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

of  information  security.  And,  personally,  information  security  has 
been a passion of mine for several years. 

The FTC has held workshops with representatives from industry, 
from  Congress,  consumer  groups,  government  agencies,  and  inter-
national  organizations  in  an  effort  to  educate  ourselves,  as  well  as 
others, about the issues, and to explore possible solutions to secur-
ing  electronic  data.  We  also  have  taken  law  enforcement  action 
against  companies  failing  to  keep  promises  that  they  would  keep 
consumers’  personal  information  secure.  In  addition,  the  FTC  has 
focused  on  educating  businesses  and  consumers  about  the  impor-
tance of information security. 

Security  begins  with  people,  each  individual  being  aware  of  the 
risk and the importance of doing their part to keep information se-
cure.  We  simply  must  establish  a  culture  of  security  in  this  coun-
try, and—as was mentioned earlier, this is a global economy—and, 
therefore,  the  world,  where  security  awareness  and  the  best  prac-
tices  become  a  subconscious,  yet  reliable,  aspect  of  our  daily  lives. 
Despite recent security-breach revelations, it is important to rec-
ognize  that  many  businesses  are  making  progress  and  improving 
information  security.  On  the  other  hand,  it’s  quite  obvious  many 
businesses do not appear to have raised the issue of information se-
curity to the CEO/Board-of-Directors level. CEOs must make infor-
mation-security  and  privacy-protection  practices  a  priority,  devot-
ing the necessary resources to the issue. 

Information  security  and  privacy  must  become  part  of  the  cor-
porate  or  organizational  culture.  In  today’s  world,  information  is 
currency. Businesses take great steps to protect their money. They 
need  to  treat  information  the  same  way.  It  is  their  responsibility, 
at the highest levels of authority. 

New  or  refined  laws  may  be  necessary.  New  technologies  cer-
tainly  will  help.  But  we  must  remember  that  poorly  thought-out 
legislation  can  have  unintended  and,  often,  adverse  consequences. 
Neither  new  laws,  nor  new  technologies,  will  provide  perfect  solu-
tions.  Consumers  and  businesses  must  properly  use  the  available 
technical  tools  and  employ  responsible  information  security  prac-
tices. This, alone, could significantly reduce breaches. 

Information security is a complex problem. We all must recognize 
that  achieving  good  information  security  is  a  journey,  not  a  des-
tination.  This  will  be  a  challenge  for  all  of  us  for  many  years  to 
come. 

And,  in  the  immediate  future,  I  look  forward  to  answering  your 

questions. Thank you very much, again. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you, Commissioner Swindle. 
Mr. Leary? 

STATEMENT OF HON. THOMAS B. LEARY, COMMISSIONER, 

FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION 

Commissioner LEARY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman and Members of 

the Committee. 

I’m  pleased  to  testify  here  today  with  my  fellow  Commissioners 
on these important issues. I endorse the collective views expressed 
in the Commission’s written testimony, and will, here, add some in-
dividual views on Social Security numbers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

As  explained  in  our  written  testimony,  Social  Security  numbers 
have  many  important  legitimate  uses.  Instant  access  to  credit, 
which  we  all  rely  on  for  both  large  and  small  transactions,  would 
be  compromised  if  Social  Security  numbers  could  not  be  used  to 
match  consumers  to  their  financial  information.  Social-Security- 
number databases are also used for other worthwhile purposes. For 
example,  to  locate  lost  beneficiaries,  potential  witnesses  and  law 
violators, and to collect child support and other judgments. 

At the same time, we all recognize that Social Security numbers 
are sensitive. There is no question that identity thieves can use So-
cial Security numbers as a key to access other people’s financial re-
sources.  The  challenge  is  to  find  the  proper  balance  between  the 
need  to  keep  Social  Security  numbers  out  of  the  hands  of  identity 
thieves  and  the  ability  of  businesses  to  have  sufficient  information 
to spot fraud and attribute information to the correct person. 

The Federal Trade Commission, as you know, has done consider-
able research on the overall scope of the identity theft problem. In 
all candor, however, I personally do not think that we will ever be 
able to estimate with precision the extent to which misuse of Social 
Security numbers contributes to this problem or the downside costs 
of any particular effort to revamp the way Social Security numbers 
are  handled.  Congress,  itself,  will  have  to  make  some  tough  policy 
decisions. 

I also personally believe that the most promising approach would 
be  to  consider  an  extension  of  the  Gramm-Leach-Bliley  Act’s  safe-
guards rule beyond financial institutions and focus on the way sen-
sitive  information  is  handled,  rather  than  to  pass  laws  that  would 
prohibit  myriad  private  agencies  from  collecting  and  preserving 
sensitive  information  in  the  first  place.  You  still  have  to  recognize 
that  a  principal  source  of  Social  Security  numbers  today  is  public 
records  on  file  with  every  court  and  country  clerk  across  the  Na-
tion.  Restriction  of  access  to  this  information  would  raise  particu-
larly difficult issues. 

We should, however, consider ways to discourage the routine col-
lection of Social Security numbers in circumstances where it is not 
essential to have such a unique identifier. This might be a very dif-
ficult matter to legislate, but, at the very least, we might start with 
the  more  active  encouragement  of  private  business  initiatives  and 
prudent actions by consumers, themselves. 

Thank you very much. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Commissioner Leary. 
Commissioner Harbour? 

STATEMENT OF HON. PAMELA JONES HARBOUR, 
COMMISSIONER, FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION 

Commissioner  HARBOUR.  Mr.  Chairman,  Senators,  I  am  pleased 
to  address  a  topic  of  great  importance  to  the  American  people,  the 
privacy and security of their most proprietary information. 

Almost  weekly,  it  seems,  a  new  story  emerges  about  a  company 
or  institution  where  files  containing  sensitive  information  have 
been  compromised,  lost,  or  stolen.  These  data  breaches  have  been 
particularly  frightening  for  consumers  who  fear  identity  theft. 
Their  apprehension  is  justified.  Our  2003  survey  showed  that  ten 
million  victims  had  experienced  some  form  of  identity  fraud  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

2002,  with  an  out-of-pocket  cost  of  roughly  $5  billion.  Our  survey 
also showed that victims of identity theft believed they would have 
been  helped  by  greater  consumer  awareness  and  vigilance  about 
how  to  safeguard  their  personal  information.  Victims  also  wanted 
more responsive local law enforcers and stiffer penalties for offend-
ers. 

Under  Congressional  mandate,  the  Commission  has  established 
an  extensive  program  to  educate  consumers  and  law  enforcers 
about identity theft, and to assist identity-theft victims. 

Consumers  may  face  the  greatest  risk  from  security  breaches  or 
poor practices by data brokers, because information kept by brokers 
can  be  easily  used  to  create  new  accounts.  Accordingly,  I  believe 
that data brokers should not be allowed to buy, sell, or transfer So-
cial Security numbers, driver’s licenses, and other sensitive person-
ally  identifiable  information,  except  for  specific  permissible  pur-
poses,  such  as  law  enforcement,  anti-fraud  measures,  and  certain 
legal requirements. 

As  consumers  gain  awareness  that  their  personal  information  is 
being  bought  and  sold  by  data  brokers,  it  might  be  useful  to  con-
sider whether the fair information practice principles of notice, con-
sent, access, security, and enforcement, could be considered or used 
to  elucidate  this  area.  It  is  also  worth  considering  that  inaccurate 
data,  as  well  as  data  that  is  stolen  or  misused,  can  have  serious 
consequences for consumers. Perhaps those who use such data can 
improve its accuracy by way of best practices. 

Finally,  nationwide  notification  to  potential  victims  in  the  event 
of  a  security  breach  is  a  necessity.  Notification  is  not  just  good 
business  guidance;  it  should  be  the  law  whenever  there  is  a  risk 
of harm to consumers due to a security breach. If consumers know 
as soon as possible that it is reasonably likely their sensitive infor-
mation  has  been  compromised,  they  can  take  steps  immediately  to 
mitigate any possible damage, such as monitoring their accounts or 
availing themselves of the benefits FACTA provides. 

And, in conclusion, our national economy increasingly depends on 
transactions  that  require  the  provision  of  sensitive  data.  Our  chal-
lenge  in  this  electronic  era  is  to  strike  the  right  balance  between 
the  right  to  information  and  the  right  to  privacy.  To  protect  sen-
sitive  data,  we  must  develop  strong  policies  that  nurture  and  en-
able  the  Information  Age  by  encouraging  good  use  of  technology 
while  also  raising  consumer  awareness.  I’m  pleased  to  work  with 
Members of Congress to address this solution. 

Thank you. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you very much, Commissioner Harbour. 
Commissioner Leibowitz? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JON LEIBOWITZ, COMMISSIONER, 

FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION 

Commissioner  LEIBOWITZ.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and 
members of the Committee. It’s always great to be back here, espe-
cially when it’s not my nomination hearing. 

We  were  all  stunned  to  learn  about  Citigroup’s  computer  tapes 
that  were  lost  during  UPS  transit.  Senator  Nelson,  you  mentioned 
that  earlier.  Senator  Feinstein  did,  too.  But  what  struck  me  the 
most  was  a  remark  by  one  privacy  advocate  in  a  New  York  Times 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

story  on  the  breach.  She  said,  and  I’ll  just  read  it  to  you,  ‘‘Your 
every  day  dumpster  diver  may  not  know  what  to  do  with  these 
tapes,  but  if  these  tapes  ever  find  their  way  into  the  hands  of  an 
international crime ring, I think they’ll figure it out.’’ 

Let’s hope by now these tapes are either buried deeply in a land-
fill  or  that  they’re  soon  recovered  untouched,  but  the  truth  is  that 
consumers’  personal  information  is  being  compromised  every  day, 
and that the data-security problem is not confined to U.S. borders. 
Indeed,  American  consumers  routinely  divulge  personal  informa-
tion  to  foreign  websites,  they  routinely  share  credit-card  numbers 
with  telemarketers  from  around  the  world,  and  they  routinely  re-
ceive spam from the distant corners of the globe. 

Let me share just a few disturbing examples with you. A foreign 
website selling to U.S. consumers states that, ‘‘We take all reason-
able  steps  to  safeguard  your  personal  information.’’  In  fact,  they 
don’t. The company posts sensitive consumer data in a publicly ac-
cessible manner. 

Or,  thieves  from  Eastern  Europe  use  spyware  to  track  U.S.  con-

sumers’ keystrokes as they shop over the Internet. 

Or,  overseas  telemarketers  obtain  U.S.  consumers’  bank-account 
information  under  false  pretenses—we  call  that  pretexting—and 
use it to wipe out their accounts. 

Sadly,  these  scenarios  are  based  on  real  investigations,  many  of 
which, unfortunately, are difficult for us to pursue, because of lim-
its on our ability to exchange information with foreign law enforce-
ment partners. 

Mr.  Chairman,  the  Commission  expects  to  issue  a  report  later 
this  summer  that  details  the  harm  caused  by  transnational  fraud 
and  the  serious  challenges  we  face  in  investigating  these  inter-
national cases. Foreign law enforcement agencies may be unwilling 
to  share  information  with  the  FTC,  because  we  cannot  sufficiently 
guarantee  the  confidentiality  of  that  information.  And  we  are  pro-
hibited  from  sharing  certain  information  we  obtain  in  investiga-
tions  with  our  foreign  counterparts,  even  if  sharing  information 
would result in helping to stop fraud against U.S. consumers. 

To be sure, there is no panacea for the problems of international 
data-security  breaches,  but  legislation  allowing  us  to  exchange  in-
formation  with  foreign  law  enforcers  under  appropriate  cir-
cumstances would be a step forward. 

The bottom line is this: If you want the FTC to be more effective 
in stopping spam, spyware, and security breaches, you need to give 
us the tools to pursue data crooks across borders. 

Mr. Chairman, I won’t go into detail about the legislation. I know 
that  you’re  looking  at  a  draft  of  the  bill,  for  which  we  are  enor-
mously  grateful.  The  draft  is  almost  identical  to  the  noncontrover-
sial  measure  Senators  McCain  and  Hollings  moved  unanimously 
through  your  Committee  in  the  Senate  in  the  previous  Congress. 
It still includes those minor changes made last year to address the 
concerns of industry and privacy groups. 

Again,  though,  thank  you  for  your  willingness  to  listen  to  us 
today.  Along  with  my  colleagues,  I’d  be  happy  to  take  any  ques-
tions. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you all so very much. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

In  the  interest  of  order,  we’ll  have  questionings  in  the  order  ar-
rived. And I have that list in front of me. After my questions, Sen-
ator  Bill  Nelson,  Senator  Burns,  and  Senator  Ben  Nelson.  If  our 
other colleagues come back, we will insert them in as they had ar-
rived. 

To all of you, in your testimony you stated that companies should 
be required to notify consumers of a breach when the breach, ‘‘cre-
ates  a  significant  risk  of  identity  theft.’’  How  would  the  Commis-
sion define ‘‘significant risk?’’ 

Chairman MAJORAS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
You  raise  the  toughest  point  on  this  issue.  We  have  been  criti-
cized  at  times,  in  fact,  by  those  who  think  significant  risk  it  not 
the  right  standard.  The  key  here  is  completely  definitional.  What 
we  need  to  do  is,  we  need  to  look  at  instances  in  which  we  most 
certainly  would  want  to  have  notice  given  to  consumers,  and  in-
stances in which we haven’t. 

If you look, for example, at what the State of California has done, 
the  standard  looks  broad,  but  then  if  you  look  at  what  the  Office 
of  Privacy  in  California  has  done,  it  accepts  a  long  list  of  types  of 
breaches that, in general, do not present risks of identity theft. 

So,  what  we  would  do,  for  example,  in  a  rulemaking,  or,  obvi-
ously,  in  working  with  the  Committee  on  a  piece  of  legislation,  is 
try  to  define  those  instances  in  which  we  believe  consumers  would 
most be at risk, or perhaps even except those where they would not 
be so—for example, if data were encrypted. 

Senator  SMITH.  And  would  that  definition,  whatever  we  ulti-
mately  arrive  at  its  meaning,  would  that  then  trigger  notification 
to the consumer? 

Chairman MAJORAS. Yes, it would. 
Senator SMITH. Some forms of security-related breaches may not 
pose  a  threat  to  having  one’s  identity  stolen,  but  might  be  defined 
as  such.  We  need  to  find  a  sensible  solution  to  determining  when 
individuals  should  be  notified  that  their  personal  information  may 
be  at  risk.  What  do  you  all  believe  is  the  appropriate  standard  for 
determining whether to notify consumers that their identity has, or 
may have, been stolen? 

Chairman  MAJORAS.  Well,  it  really  just  goes  back  to  what  I 

was—— 

Senator SMITH. Back to the list. 
Chairman MAJORAS. I’m sorry. I think you would have to go back 
to  the  list.  And  one  of  the  advantages,  Senator,  in  doing  it  in  a 
rulemaking context, as opposed to trying to do all specific instances 
in  the  statute,  is  that  then  we  have  the  freedom  to  change  it  as 
we  perceive  changes  in  the  marketplace  and  new  threats  to  con-
sumers. 

Senator  SMITH.  To  the  issue  of  preemption  of  states—you’ve 
heard  that  talked  a  lot  about—should  it  be  a  floor  or  a  ceiling? 
Should  we  preempt  the  states?  Should  we  have  a  national  stand-
ard? 

Chairman  MAJORAS.  Well,  I  think—are  you  asking  specifically 

about notice? 

Senator SMITH. Yes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

Chairman  MAJORAS.  Because  there  could  be  other  parts  of  the 
bill  where  preemption—where  we  might  answer  the  question  dif-
ferently. 

This is a difficult question. No one ever likes to have to preempt 
the states. What I would offer to you is that, if you provide a Fed-
eral standard that is defined as a floor, as opposed to a ceiling, I’m 
not  sure  why  you  would  spend  time  imposing  it  at  all,  because  I 
do  think  that  businesses  are  going  to  have  to  respond  to  the  very 
highest standard. They can’t—I don’t think they can chop up their 
customer  lists  into  50  different  standards,  for  example.  And  so, 
that’s just a reality, and it’s something to think about, if you want 
to have a Federal standard at all. 

Senator  SMITH.  To  the  issue  of  Social  Security  numbers,  you 
know Senator Burns and I were talking about how broadly we use 
them. They were created for one purpose; and that was your Social 
Security account. But now I understand they’re even using them on 
dog  tags  in  the  military.  We  give  them  out  whenever  we’re  asked 
to—in various circumstances. 

In your opinion, where do you think the use in sharing of Social 
Security numbers ought to be accessible, or should we begin trying 
to limit their use for other—for non-Social-Security purposes? 

Commissioner  LEARY.  Well,  Senator,  I’ll  jump  in  on  that  one.  I 
certainly agree with you, 100 percent, that Social Security numbers 
evolved very quickly away from their original purpose. 

I’ll  just  give  you  a  personal  example.  When  I  got  my  first  Social 
Security number, almost 60 years ago, we were instructed to carry 
our  Social  Security  card  around  with  us  at  all  times.  If  you  lost 
your wallet, you would lose your Social Security card. The Internal 
Revenue Service asked us to put our Social Security number on the 
envelope  when  we  were  mailing  in  a  check,  in  order  to  facilitate 
their filing of it. 

So, for people my age, the ship has sailed, as a practical matter. 
I  am  certain  that  my  Social  Security  number  is  out  there  in  so 
many places that anyone could find it in 3 minutes. 

You  have  however,  a  new  generation  coming  in,  and  you  also 
have  I  think,  a  very  interesting  interim  period  before  we  may  be 
able  to  have  even  more  rigorous  individual  identifiers,  which  will 
enable people to figure out who you are a lot more accurately even 
than the Social Security number will. 

So,  the  question  is,  what  is  worth  doing  during  this  interim  pe-
riod of time? And it is a very, very difficult issue. One of the things 
I wanted to make clear to you, is that this is not arithmetic, where 
you  can  figure  out  what  the  costs  and  benefits  are  of  doing  it. 
You’re going to have to make these tough value judgments. 

I  am  encouraged  by  the  fact  that  there  is  a  growing  awareness 
of  the  problem  that  you’ve  addressed,  and  that  we  now  have  op-
tions.  For  example,  you  can  now  get  a  driver’s  license—or  you  cer-
tainly  can  in  the  District  of  Columbia  and,  I  expect,  in  most 
states—that  no  longer  have  your  Social  Security  number  on  them. 
That’s a useful first step. We are cautioned not to give away Social 
Security  numbers  to  people  who  have  no  legitimate  reasons  for 
them.  I  would  hope  that  universities  would  not  cease  the  routine 
use  of  Social  Security  numbers  to  identify  their  students  who  are 
making purchases in their stores. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

All  of  these  things,  I  think,  show  a  growing  awareness  of  this 
issue.  But  to  try  to  put  the  cork  in  the  bottle  retroactively,  I  sug-
gest to you, is a very difficult thing to do legislatively. 

Senator SMITH. My time on that first round is up. 
Senator Bill Nelson? 
Senator BILL NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  want  to  thank  each  of  you  for  your  public  service.  And,  Mr. 
Swindle, thank you for your exceptional service to our country. And 
godspeed on your—the next chapter of your life. 

Commissioner SWINDLE. Thank you. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  I  want  to  ask  each  of  you  to  respond  to 
a  series  of  goals  which  I  think  is  in  legislation  that  is  before  this 
Committee.  And  I  think  it  will  help  the  Committee  as  we  develop 
a  composite  piece  of  legislation.  And  I’ll  go  right  down  the  line  in 
the  order  in  which  you  have  used—first  with  Madam  Chairman. 
And  if  you  all  could  keep  your  answers  short  so  that  I  can  get  all 
of  this  information—please  respond  whether  you  support  the  fol-
lowing goals. 

Requiring  all  businesses  to  take  reasonable  steps  to  safeguard 

sensitive personal information. 

Chairman MAJORAS. Yes. 
Senator BILL NELSON. Mr. Swindle? 
Commissioner SWINDLE. Yes. 
Senator BILL NELSON. Mr. Leary? 
Commissioner LEARY. Yes. 
Senator BILL NELSON. Ms. Harbour? 
Commissioner HARBOUR. Yes. 
Senator BILL NELSON. Mr. Leibowitz? 
Commissioner LEIBOWITZ. Yes. 
Senator BILL NELSON. OK. 
The next goal. Requiring all businesses to notify customers when 
their  sensitive  personal  information  was,  or  reasonably  believed  to 
have been, acquired by an unauthorized person? 

Madam Chairman? 
Chairman  MAJORAS.  It  depends  on  the  risk  to  consumers,  for 

identity theft. If there’s a significant risk, then yes. 

Commissioner SWINDLE. I agree with the Chairman. 
Commissioner LEARY. I agree with the Chairman. 
Commissioner HARBOUR. I believe that if there is a risk present, 
yes,  then  they  should  be  notified.  And,  again,  I  do  agree  with  the 
Chairman, that it is a definitional question. 

Senator BILL NELSON. Mr. Leibowitz? 
Commissioner LEIBOWITZ. I agree with notification if there is sig-
nificant  risk  or  material  risk—there  needs  to  be  some  sort  of  trig-
ger. 

Senator BILL NELSON. Thank you. 
Next goal. Requiring that all data brokers register with the FTC 
so that consumers can find out who has their sensitive information. 

Chairman MAJORAS. No, not as stated. 
Commissioner  SWINDLE.  I  don’t  think  we  can  answer  that  ques-
tion,  because  it  involves  establishing  a  new  regulatory  regime  for 
something that we don’t really know the details on. 

Commissioner LEARY. No. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

Commissioner HARBOUR. I think it’s a complex issue, and I would 
like to continue to discuss it with staff, but I’m really not ready to 
give you my opinion on it, at this point. 

Senator BILL NELSON. Thank you. 
Commissioner  LEIBOWITZ.  Can  I  get  back  to  you  in  a  few  days? 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  OK,  the  next  goal.  Ensuring  that  con-
sumers  are  given  rights  regarding  their  information  held  by  the 
data brokers, similar to the consumers rights that now exist under 
the Fair Credit Reporting Act. For example, the right to correct er-
rors in that information. 

Madam Chairman? 
Chairman  MAJORAS.  It  depends  on  the  information  in  the  par-
ticular database that the data broker is maintaining. So, for exam-
ple,  today,  if  the  data  broker  is  maintaining  a  database  that  con-
tains consumer-reporting agencies’ information used for credit eligi-
bility  or  employment,  for  example,  then,  even  today,  yes,  a  data 
broker  would  be  required  to  give  that  access.  If  it’s  a  fraud  data-
base, on the other hand, giving a fraudster access to his or her in-
formation would defeat the purpose of the fraud database. 
Commissioner SWINDLE. I could not have said it better. 
Commissioner LEARY. I agree with the Chairman. 
Commissioner HARBOUR. Like you, Senator, I am very concerned 
about  the  accuracy  of  information  provided  by  the  data  brokers.  I 
think that data brokers should adhere to best practices, possibly for 
accuracy,  and  it  would  be  extremely  worthwhile  for  leading  indus-
try  and  consumer  groups  to  suggest  possible  best  practices  in  this 
area. 

Commissioner  LEIBOWITZ.  I  agree  with  my  colleagues.  And  I 

think you should think seriously about it. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  We’ve  already  discussed,  I  think,  the  So-
cial  Security  situation.  So,  two  more  goals.  Creating  a  blue-ribbon 
panel  made  up  of  industry  and  consumers  to  help  develop  best 
practices for safeguarding sensitive consumer information. 

Madam Chairman? 
Chairman  MAJORAS.  I  confess,  Senator,  that  I  have  not  spent  a 
lot  of  time  thinking  that  through,  but,  in  general,  I  am  very  sup-
portive  of  self-regulatory-type  efforts,  and  I’m  very  supportive  of 
having  the  consumer  groups  and  the  industry  groups  talking  to 
each other. 

Commissioner SWINDLE. I cannot attest, with certainty, that they 
exist,  but  safe  computing  practices  are  everywhere.  Devices,  tools, 
technologies  to  protect  data  is  everywhere.  The  problem  is  not  so 
much the lack of it; it’s the lack of implementation and deployment 
of it. As we all know, and several have reflected, people give away 
their  Social  Security  number  at  just  the  drop  of  a  hat.  So,  to  get 
back  to  my  point  of  a  culture  of  security,  we’ve  got  to  change  the 
way  we  think.  It’s  not  a  lack  of  tools  that  is  hurting  us.  It’s  not 
employing and thinking about those tools. 

Commissioner LEARY. Senator, I think it’s an ingenious idea, be-
cause  it  recognizes  that  what  is  adequate  security  is  an  ever-mov-
ing target, and technology is moving a lot faster than, at least, my 
ability  to  comprehend  it.  So,  I  think  that  having  some  people  who 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

are really adept at this, with various backgrounds, might be a very 
useful thing to do. 

Commissioner  HARBOUR.  Senator,  I  think  it’s  an  excellent  idea. 
Having industry, the privacy groups, the consumer groups come to-
gether  and  talk  about  this  very  complex  issue  would  be  an  excel-
lent way to proceed. 

Commissioner LEIBOWITZ. I agree with my colleagues. It could be 

very, very useful. 

Senator BILL NELSON. OK. And the final goal, fully funding a ro-
bust  Office  of  Identity  Theft  within  the  FTC,  with  adequate  re-
sources to assist victims of identity theft. 

Madam Chairman? 
Chairman  MAJORAS.  Well,  I’ve  been  known  to  say,  Senator,  that 
I  don’t  think,  in  my  10-month  tenure,  I’ve  ever  turned  down  addi-
tional resources, so I thank you for that. But I will say, if the goal 
of  that  is—well,  first  of  all,  the  FTC  assists  identity-theft  victims 
today,  and  we  will  continue  to  do  that.  If  what  the  legislation  pro-
poses,  however,  is  that  we  would  individually  help  each  of  the  ten 
million  identity-theft  victims,  that,  I  think,  would  be  too  much  for 
any  one  agency  to  handle,  particularly  for  ours,  simply  because 
identity  theft  is  a  crime,  and  we  don’t  have  criminal  enforcement 
authority, so we’re not involved in that aspect of prosecution. 

Commissioner  SWINDLE.  Senator,  I  agree,  certainly,  with  the 
Chairman’s point about the crime being the issue here, but if I may 
run  some  numbers  by  us  here  today  very  quickly.  We  received 
roughly  250,000  identity-theft  complaints  in  our  complaint  center 
this past 12 months, and I think it has been a fairly consistent fig-
ure. If we discounted half of those and said that, only 120,000 were 
really  identity-theft  problems,  and  if  we  took  Senator  Schumer’s 
numbers—and  I  think  he  was  referring  to  some  survey,  as  I  re-
call—of  175  hours  to  resolve  that  on  the  part  of  any  individual— 
so,  let’s  say  it  takes  a  month,  and  we  have  120,000  legitimate 
claims—it  takes  a  month  to  do  this—that’s  one  month’s  work  out 
of one employee. The FTC, right now—I think we have about 1,100 
or 1,200 employees—— 

Chairman MAJORAS. Eleven hundred. 
Commissioner SWINDLE.—we would be required to have at least, 
using those numbers, another thousand employees. The FTC would 
then  start  to  lose—well,  well  beyond  losing  its  identity  in  its  in-
volvement  with  antitrust.  We  would  become  a  completely  trans-
formed agency. 

Now,  I  used  half  of  the  complaints  to  make  the  illustration  here 
of  what  we’re  talking  about  when  we  throw  this  out,  but  there’s  a 
lot more to it than meets the eye. Remember, in the last 12 months 
there were approximately ten million people, supposedly, who were 
victims of identity theft. I’m talking about 120,000 resulting in the 
need  to  add  1,000  people  in  the  agency.  It’s  a  very  complex  issue. 
And, again, I will repeat it until I am blue in the face, even when 
I’m  not  a  commissioner,  that  the  first  line  of  defense  for  everyone 
is  the  individual,  himself,  using  good  thinking  about  how  he  han-
dles his financial and personal information. 

Commissioner  LEARY.  Senator,  I  agree  with  my  colleagues  who 
have  spoken  thus  far,  and  I  just  want  to  add  a  couple  of  thoughts 
for your consideration. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

The skill set, if you will, and the capabilities to deal with identity 
theft  vary  tremendously.  For  example,  a  prosecutorial  function 
aimed at getting the people who may have committed identity theft 
or facilitated it through negligence, one way or the other, is a very 
different  function  than  counseling  individual  consumers  as  to  how 
best  to  deal  with  their  problem.  And  I  think  that,  ultimately,  this 
has  to  be  handled  on  a  decentralized  basis,  under  common  stand-
ards, to the extent possible. 

Commissioner  HARBOUR.  I  agree  with  the  comments  of  my  col-

leagues, but I would like to add a few other things. 

The  functions  of  the  Office  of  Identity  Theft,  in  my  view,  are  al-
ready  being  fulfilled  by  the  Federal  Trade  Commission.  Currently, 
much  of  what  you’re  seeking,  as  I  said,  I  believe  we’re  doing.  We 
have victim assistance and counseling, we have a hotline, we have 
a  toll-free  number,  we  have  extensive  consumer  education,  we’re 
the  clearinghouse  for  all  of  the  ID-theft  victims,  and  we  report  on 
trends.  As  the  Chairman  indicated,  individual  representation 
would  be  extremely  difficult.  As  I  said,  the  Commission  currently 
assists  consumers.  And  what  we  do  is,  we  educate  them  and  we 
empower  them.  So,  one  of  the  best  lines  of  defense,  as  Commis-
sioner  Swindle  indicated,  is  educating  them  so  that  they  will  not 
become  a  victim  of  identity  theft.  And,  also,  if  they  are,  then  they 
know what steps to take to rectify it. 

Commissioner LEIBOWITZ. Yes, I agree with the collective wisdom 
of  my  colleagues.  I  think,  in  your  bill,  you  have  a  $60  million  au-
thorization.  I  think  you’d  probably  have  to  put  at  least  one  more 
zero  after  that  to  make  it  actually  work—to  make  it  function  and 
to not detract from the other missions of our agency. 

The  one  other  thing  I  wanted  to  mention,  which  is  a  common 
thread  in  all  of  the  bills  I’ve  seen  introduced,  is  civil  penalties  or 
fines.  I  think  we  all  agree,  on  the  Commission,  that  it  is  very  im-
portant.  It’s  a  very  useful  deterrent.  It’ll  make  companies  think 
twice before they violate the law. 

Senator BILL NELSON. Thank you all. 
Senator SMITH. Senator Burns? 
Senator BURNS. When you go out and—and I would say that the 
collaboration  of  the  industry  coming  together  and  using  best  prac-
tices for this, you—like Mr. Leary brought up—does bring up some 
of our own laws that, sort of, prevent that, because of antitrust and 
other  exchange  of  information  on  the  best  practices,  and  all  this. 
I’m  wondering—and  I’m  coming  down  on  the  side  of  that  anybody 
that collects information that doesn’t have a license to do so is out-
side  the  law  and  should  be  shut  down.  I’m—maybe  that’s  the  only 
way we’ve got to doing it, but I think they have to have some rea-
sonable  license  that  gives  them  the  guidelines  to  do  business  in 
this arena. And so, I’m coming down that—— 

But  let’s  say  that  you  go  out,  and  you  dealt  with  Microsoft  and 
the other companies that you mentioned a little while ago for inad-
equate security systems. In other words, advertising, I would imag-
ine,  a  system  that  assured  the  public  that  their  privacy  couldn’t 
be—their information couldn’t be breached, but then it didn’t work. 
Is that a correct assumption on my part? 

Chairman  MAJORAS.  On  most  of  the  cases  we’ve  brought,  that  is 

exactly what happened, yes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

Senator  BURNS.  OK.  Now,  when  a  person—say,  you’ve  got  a 
breach here in some of these firms. Do you go out—do you actually 
ask them to explain their systems to you, and what actions they’ve 
taken,  in  order  to  protect  the  information  that  they  might  have 
stored? 

Chairman  MAJORAS.  Absolutely.  When  we  open  an  investigation 
under  section  5,  or  under  our  Safeguards  Rule,  we  do—we  abso-
lutely  get  behind  what  it  is  that  a  company  has  done  to  safeguard 
the information, and—— 

Senator BURNS. Would that be like Citicorp in this last—— 
Chairman MAJORAS. Well, we don’t have jurisdiction over banks. 
That,  obviously,  is  with  the  OCC  and  other  banking  agencies.  So, 
we don’t—we aren’t—we do not investigate all of the breaches that 
you’ve heard about. We are investigating some. 

Senator  BURNS.  Well,  where  I’m  going  here—and,  Mr.  Swindle, 
I  think  we’ve  had  this  discussion  before—do  you  have  the  people 
and the expertise to go out to a commercial organization and collect 
the information on the system that they use, and make a judgment 
whether it’s adequate or not? 

Commissioner SWINDLE. Yes, sir. We have highly qualified inves-
tigators. I think the limitation that the Chairman was referring to 
is,  we  just  don’t  have  jurisdiction  over  the  banking  industry;  it’s 
covered under a different jurisdiction. But we have incredibly com-
petent  investigators  that  have  got,  literally,  years  of  experience, 
and we know how to do this. 

Senator BURNS. Are you looking at these organizations that were 
in  our  briefing  here?  And  did  you  look  at  their  systems  and  deter-
mine that they had adequate security systems? 

Chairman  MAJORAS.  It  depends  on  which  ones  you’re  talking 
about.  I  mentioned  a  couple  in  which  we  actually  did  bring  cases, 
and we did—— 

Senator  BURNS.  Well,  let’s  go—let’s  go—here,  we’ve  got  Boston 

College. 

ment on—— 

Chairman  MAJORAS.  I’m  sorry,  Senator,  I’m  afraid  I  can’t  com-

Senator BURNS. OK. Well, I—— 
Chairman MAJORAS.—non-public investigations. 
Senator BURNS.—and we shouldn’t—— 
Chairman MAJORAS. So, I apologize. 
Senator BURNS.—do that, either. 
Chairman MAJORAS. Right. 
Senator  BURNS.  We  don’t  do  that,  either.  But  I  guess  that’s 
where  I’m  going,  that—and  are  we  looking  at  them  before  some-
thing  happens,  or  after  something  happens?  Do  you  have  the  au-
thority  to  monitor  and  advise  that  their  system  might  not  be  ade-
quate for information protection? 

Chairman  MAJORAS.  We  don’t  have  regulatory  authority  in  the 
same  way,  for  example,  that  the  banking  agencies  closely  regulate 
the  banks.  So,  we  don’t  have  an  ongoing  dialogue,  for  example, 
with  various  industries  on  what  their  security  measures  are  that 
they have in place. 

Obviously,  yes,  we  can  enforce,  if  we  learn  that  they  don’t  have 
adequate security in place. And, unfortunately, sometimes the way 
we  learn  it  is  when  there  has  been  a  breach.  But  we  don’t  need  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

breach in order to find that reasonable security measures have not 
been taken, in violation of section 5 or GLB. 

Commissioner  SWINDLE.  Senator,  if  I  may  interject,  we’ve  had  a 
couple of cases, in which we’ve been told by others who watch, per-
haps, more carefully than we do, because it’s their primary focus— 
we  do  a  lot  of  antitrust  work  and  other  things—but  where  we  re-
ceive  complaints,  it  has  caused  us  to  go  make  inquiries.  We  don’t, 
as  a  routine  matter,  audit  anybody,  in  the  sense  that  the  banking 
regulators might conduct, if that’s the right word, an audit. But we 
do look at things. 

And,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  hate  to  leave  this  discussion—because,  as 
I said, I have a passion for all of this—but, as I mentioned to you, 
I have a plane to catch. And I would just say to you all, once again, 
it  has  been  an  absolute  honor  to  work  with  you.  And  I  bid  you 
adieu, and I’ll probably be around somewhere. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you so much. 
Senator  BURNS.  Keep  your  name  in  the  phone  book—we  may 

need you one of these days—would you? 

Commissioner  SWINDLE.  I’m  putting  everything  on  the  Do  Not 

Call List, sir. 
[Laughter.] 
[Applause.] 
Senator  BURNS.  I  guess  in  that  line  of  questioning,  I’m  driving 
toward  prevention,  actions  that  we  can  take.  And  I  think  Senator 
Nelson  is,  kind  of,  on  target  that  it’s  going  to  take  an  industry— 
the industry has to drive this, rather than any kind of a regulatory 
regime that we could put in place. Am I not correct on that? 

Chairman  MAJORAS.  Well,  I  mean,  I  do  think—I  do  think  it 
would  be—it’s  extremely  helpful  for  industry  and—to  help  drive 
this,  Senator,  because  we  can’t  be  the  eyes  and  ears  within 
every—— 

Senator BURNS. Yes. 
Chairman  MAJORAS.—company,  in  terms  of  what  they’re  doing. 
And that’s why we like our flexible and broad Safeguards Rule, be-
cause  it  says  to  companies,  hey,  you  have  to  put  in  place  appro-
priate procedures, depending on the kinds of information you have 
and  the  kinds  of  business  you  have,  and  so  forth,  and  depending 
on  what  technology,  for  example,  is  available  to  you  today—and 
fives years from now, it’s different—in order to not run afoul of the 
law. 

Senator  BURNS.  The  way  technology’s  moving,  next  week  it’s 

Chairman MAJORAS. Absolutely. And we want companies to take 

going to be different. 

that into account. 

Senator BURNS. But it’s kind of like trying to put your thumb on 
JELL–O;  I  mean,  it  just  moves,  but  that’s  the  direction  I’m  going, 
I think, is prevention more than anything else, and then very strict 
fines. I agree with Mr. Leibowitz, I don’t think you can make a fine 
too high for this kind of activity. 

I  thank  the  Chairman.  I’m  sorry  I  ran  over  my  time.  And  thank 

you for coming today. We appreciate that very much. 

Senator SMITH. Senator Ben Nelson? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  I,  too, 
thank  the  witnesses  for  helping  enlighten  us  as  we  work  our  way 
through this challenging issue. 

I  asked  Attorney  General  Sorrell  if  he  thought  that  there  was  a 
way  to  square  the  challenge  that  you  have  of  dealing  with  states 
interested in this area, together with the Federal interest. Is there 
a  way  to  harmonize  it?  Recognizing  that  the  states  do  a  great  job 
at  consumer  protection,  dealing  at  the  closest  level  with  the  resi-
dents is an important factor for us to all consider. The closer it gets 
to  Washington,  except  for  people  in  the  area,  the  more  removed  it 
is from folks out in the Midwest and on the West Coast. 

Recognizing  all  that,  in  trying  to—are  you  suggesting,  Ms. 
Majoras, that it’s an either/or situation? Either—as it relates to the 
standard?  Either  the  Federal  Government  does  it  or  the  states  do 
it;  otherwise,  you  get  the  patchwork  quilt  problem,  compliance,  or 
companies  will  ignore  whatever  the  Federal  standard  is,  if  it’s  a 
floor, and go to the highest level established by the states, because 
they don’t want to have to deal with individual differences between 
and among the various states? 

Chairman MAJORAS. Thank you, Senator. 
First,  I  want  to  make  sure  I  make  absolutely  clear  that  I  agree 
with  you  wholeheartedly  that  the  states  are  tremendous  enforcers 
of  consumer-protection  laws,  and  we  do—we  do  need  their  help, 
and  we  work  effectively  with  them.  And,  in  this  space,  we  do  be-
lieve that state AGs must be able to enforce. 

My only point was a practical one. It’s not philosophical; it’s sim-
ply  practical.  You  could  work  very,  very  hard  on  a  standard,  and 
try to come up with the perfect standard, but if you say it’s a floor, 
I’m  just  not  sure  that—and  perhaps  my  colleagues  would  like  to 
comment—I’m  not  sure  that  it  will  be  meaningful,  in  the  end,  if 
other states enact higher standards. States will automatically have 
to  go  to  the  higher  standard,  in  running  their  business.  So,  it  just 
depends on how you feel about that. 

Commissioner  LEIBOWITZ.  I’d  just  say  that,  for  some  things,  like 
a  standard  for  notification,  preemption  seems  to  make  a  lot  of 
sense. On the other hand—— 

Senator BEN NELSON. That’s what I was thinking—— 
Commissioner LEIBOWITZ.—on the other hand, states are wonder-
ful  laboratories  for  experimentation.  They  have  been  for  as  long 
as—as  long  as  there  have  been  states.  And  so,  for  something  like 
a  credit  freeze,  which  California 
is  experimenting  with,  or 
Vermont’s experimenting with, it may make sense to let them con-
tinue to do so. You wouldn’t have to preempt in that area. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Well,  that—you’re  anticipating  where  I 
was  going  with  the  laboratories  of  democracy.  I  think  Jefferson 
was,  in  fact,  right;  and,  in  fact,  we  have  seen  great  things  come 
from  the  states.  Am  I  right  to  say  that  the  states  moved  on  this 
before the Federal Government did? 

Chairman MAJORAS. On the notice requirement—— 
Senator BEN NELSON. On the—— 
Chairman MAJORAS.—they did. 
Senator BEN NELSON.—notice requirement, yes. 
Chairman MAJORAS. Yes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  So,  there  is  a  concern,  I  would  have,  that 
we  not  put  into  place  a  standard  that  would  become,  if  you  will, 
a fixed standard, where there’s no further experimentation. It’s one 
of  the  concerns  I  have  when  we  take  the  best  practices  of  the 
states,  and  we  put  them  into  place  at  the  Federal  level,  and  say, 
‘‘OK, we’ve solved that.’’ But, when we do that, we tend to stop ex-
perimentation,  and  things  remain  static,  rather  than  dynamic.  I’m 
hopeful  that  there  would  be  a  way  to  work  through  this,  to  where 
we  permit  the  states  to  continue  to  do  the  experimentation.  We 
don’t  stop  commerce.  We  don’t  in  any  way  impede  the  ability  of 
commerce  to  move  forward  on  this,  but  yet  we  protect  the  public. 
With  the  former  Attorney  General  sitting  next  to  me,  I  can  say 
that many of the Attorney Generals don’t think that AG stands for 
Aspiring Governor. And so, they—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator BEN NELSON.—so, they take—they take great care—as a 

former Governor, I used to have to be concerned about that. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  BEN NELSON.  As  they  continue  to  work  to  bring  about 
protections  of  the  consumers  at  the  local  level,  they  continue  to  do 
a great job, and I would hate to see anything that would get in the 
way,  block,  or  would  in  any  way  impede  their  ability  to  continue 
to do that. I’d like to get your thoughts about that. 

Commissioner HARBOUR. Senator, we’ve had this discussion with-
in  the  Commission.  And  I  know  the  Chairman  says  she  takes  a 
practical view. We’ve also discussed the philosophical view. And ev-
eryone does love the dissenting opinion of Brandeis, where he said 
one  of  the  happy  incidents  of  state—the  Federal  system  was  that 
states may serve as a laboratory and try novel social and economic 
experiments  without  risk  to  the  rest  of  the  country.  But  I  think 
whatever  approach  is  chosen  by  Congress,  I  believe  that  state  at-
torney-general enforcement is essential. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  I  don’t  think  we’re—this  isn’t  a  challenge. 
It’s  the  equivalent  of  squaring  a  circle.  But  it’s  going  to  be  a  very 
delicate  area  to  carve  out  the  relationship  so  that  we  get  the  best 
of  both,  so  that  we  end  up  with  the  best  practices;  because,  after 
all,  that’s  what  the  consumers  are  expecting,  and  that’s  what  they 
need; and they deserve it, as well. 

Well, thank you, Mr. Chairman, for the hearing. 
Thank you very much. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Senator Nelson. 
Senator Pryor? 
Senator  PRYOR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Was  Senator  Allen 

next? 

Senator SMITH. On my list, you got here before he did. 
Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  I  want  to 
thank  you,  again,  for  this  hearing.  I  know  a  number  of  our  col-
leagues  have  thanked  you,  as  well,  but  we  really  appreciate  your 
leadership on this and other issues. 

Ms.  Harbour,  let  me  start  with  you,  if  I  may,  and  that  is,  you 
mentioned,  in  your  opening  statement,  Social  Security  numbers. 
And,  as  I  understand  what  you  said—maybe  I  misunderstood  it, 
but  as  I  understand  what  you  said,  you  said  that,  basically,  data 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

brokers should not be allowed to share Social Security numbers, ex-
cept within fairly narrow parameters. Do I have that right? 

Commissioner  HARBOUR.  Well,  what  I  had  in  mind,  Senator—I 
think  Congress  should  consider  imposing  stricter  controls  on  the 
sale,  distribution,  and  use  of  Social  Security  numbers,  and  that 
perhaps  Congress  should  consider  breaking  the  habit  of  industry 
using Social Security numbers as authenticators. But I also appre-
ciate  all  of  the  very  thoughtful  comments  that  my  colleague,  Com-
missioner  Leary,  indicated,  as  well.  It’s  a  very  complex  area,  and 
it’s  going  to  take  a  very  delicate  balance  between  the  right  to  pri-
vacy and the right to information and the economic factors that go 
into the importance of Social Security numbers. 

Senator PRYOR. I agree, it’s complicated, and it’s not an easy fix, 

just a one—one simple solution isn’t there, probably. 

Let me ask this, while I have you, on the subject of Social Secu-
rity numbers. Is it your view that Congress needs to act to restrict 
Social Security numbers, or does the FTC have the authority right 
now to implement a regulation? 

Commissioner  LEARY.  Well,  Senator,  the  FTC  has  the  essential 
authority  to  attack  people  for  unfairness  or  deception  if  they  mis-
represent what they are going to do with information that they col-
lect,  or  if  they  misrepresent  the  security  with  which  they  would 
treat it. But, in general, we do not have the authority to say to any 
particular  institution  that,  ‘‘You  shall  not  transmit  it,’’  other  than 
authority  specifically  granted  to  us  under  Gramm-Leach-Bliley  or 
Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act.  We  do  not  have  a  free-roving  authority 
to regulate it—— 

Senator PRYOR. That’s my sense—— 
Commissioner LEARY.—in that area. 
Senator PRYOR.—of it, as well. 
Chairman MAJORAS. Right. 
Senator PRYOR. Yes. 
Chairman  MAJORAS.  Right.  I  was  just  going  to  add  that,  under 
Gramm-Leach-Bliley  today,  if  a  Social  Security  number  has  come 
from a financial institution, then there are some restrictions on the 
transfer of that Social Security number. And to the extent that we 
have  jurisdiction  to  enforce  GLB,  we  do  have  that  piece.  But  we 
don’t  have  a  general—we  don’t  have  general  rulemaking  authority 
in this area. 

Senator  PRYOR.  While  we’re  on  the  subject  of  Gramm-Leach-Bli-
ley,  I’m  curious  for  your  thoughts—and,  Ms.  Majoras,  maybe  we’ll 
start with you—on how Gramm-Leach-Bliley is working, from your 
standpoint  and  given  the  focus  you  have  on  it.  How’s  it  working? 
And,  also,  I  know  that  there  has  been  some  ideas  floated  here 
about  the  Safeguard  Rules  in  Gramm-Leach-Bliley,  and  how  that 
interfaces with privacy, and how we should proceed into the future, 
and whether maybe we should expand a little bit on Gramm-Leach- 
Bliley, et cetera. So, I’d just like to get your thoughts on that. 

Chairman MAJORAS. Thank you. 
Gramm-Leach-Bliley,  of  course,  is  enforced  by  several  different 
agencies in the FTC. You know, the banking agencies, for example, 
enforce  against  those  financial  institutions  and  the  like,  and  the 
FTC  has  whatever’s  left  when  you  take  those  regulatory  agencies 
out of it. We do think that the Safeguards Rules under it are work-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

ing  appropriately.  There  have  been  questions  raised  about  wheth-
er—under  the  privacy  provisions,  whether  the  notice  to  consumers 
has been working very well. We don’t have exact numbers, but un-
derstand  that  consumers  have  not  responded  well  to  those  notices, 
that  most  have  gone  into  the  trash  can,  as  opposed  to  being  read. 
And  we  are  actually  working  now  with  industry  to  see  whether 
there’s  something  that  could  be  done  with  those  notices  to  make 
them more consumer-friendly, if you will. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Let  me  interrupt  just  right  there.  So,  do  you 
have  the  empirical  data  on  that?  Or  is  that  what  you’re  trying  to 
collect? 

Chairman  MAJORAS.  We  don’t  have  empirical  data  today.  I  don’t 

have exact numbers for you. 

With  respect  to  extending  the  Safeguards  Rule,  the  Safeguards 
Rule is broad and flexible enough, I think, to be applied beyond fi-
nancial  institutions,  in  GLB,  to  other  businesses  that  collect  and 
hold sensitive consumer information. And we think that would be— 
that that is a good extension, that rule, if Congress sees fit. 

Commissioner LEIBOWITZ. I agree with the Chairman. 
Commissioner  LEARY.  Senator,  I  agree  with  the  Chairman.  I’d 
just  add,  if  it’s  not  obvious,  that  Gramm-Leach-Bliley  is  a  classic 
illustration  of  the  risks  that  you  might  encounter  with  excessive 
notification.  We’re  all  bombarded  with  notices  and  documents  of 
various  kinds,  and,  if  there  are  just  too  many,  the  message  gets 
lost.  For  example,  there  might  be  some  theoretical  compromise  of 
your  data,  however  limited.  If  every  time  you  automatically  get  a 
notice—eventually, it’s like the boy who cried wolf, in the old fairy-
tale, you stop paying attention. 

Senator PRYOR. My sense is that there are a lot of people in this 
country  that  are  just  tuning  them  out.  You  know,  maybe  the  first 
couple  of  times  they  got  a  notice  they  got  read.  And,  you  just  get 
enough of them, you just start to tune it out, they start to lose—— 

Commissioner LEARY. Yes. 
Senator PRYOR.—their impact. 
Commissioner LEARY. Right. 
Senator PRYOR. Mr. Chairman, that’s all I have. Thank you. 
Senator SMITH. Thanks, Senator Pryor. 
Senator Allen? 
Senator ALLEN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Let  me  just  make  some  prefacing  remarks  before  I  ask  for  your 

insight. 

The  states  are  laboratories.  Having  been  Governor,  I  think  the 
states  come  up  with  better  ideas  and  are  more  responsive  to  the 
needs  and  values  of  the  people  than  is  the  Federal  Government. 
However,  the  states  did  create  the  Federal  Government,  and  our 
present Constitution is one in which we wanted to make sure that 
there was a free flow of interstate commerce. And if the states are 
doing  something  that  is  harmful  to  interstate  commerce,  we  don’t 
want to be allowing that. 

I  look  at  this  situation  as  akin  to  other  areas,  where,  actually, 
the states and the attorney generals are partners, we’re not in com-
petition.  But  we—it’s  a  national  security  standard  that  we’re  con-
cerned with. A lot—we get into privacy, but this is more of a secu-
rity  issue,  of  information,  data,  and  identity,  than  it  is  a  privacy 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

issue. But the way it ought to work—like in many other areas, ev-
erything  from  OSHA  to  mining  laws  to  even  bank  robbery—those 
are  all  tried  in  Federal  court,  but  most  of  the  time  it’s  local  law 
enforcement,  or  maybe  a  state  police  officer,  who  has  apprehended 
the bank robber. So, I think the FTC, obviously, is preeminent, but 
I  think,  as  the  Chairman  said,  Chairman  Majoras,  this  is  one 
where we do want to work with the states. 

My view of this is that we should have uniform national security 
standards.  We  do  need  to  make  sure  information  of  consumers  is 
protected.  If  there’s  a  breach,  we’ve  got  to  figure  out  what  cir-
cumstances  should  a  custodian  notify  the  affected  citizen  where 
they reside. 

Now,  since  we  have  all  of  you  here,  if—the  question  really,  for 
me,  is,  if  the  FTC—and  you  do  have  authority  to  bring  actions 
against  these  companies  that  fail  to  adequately  safeguard  con-
sumer  information.  In  your  testimony,  you  said  you  have  the  Fed-
eral laws. Now, as a follow-up on this, if the FTC has sufficient au-
thority  to  bring  enforcement  actions  against  so  many  companies, 
can you identify any gaps—any gaps in your authority—where you 
would  recommend—not  just  saying,  ‘‘Well,  it’s  financial  institu-
tions,’’  and  so  forth—but  are  there  any  gaps  where  you  would  rec-
ommend  that  we,  as  a  Congress,  grant  you  all,  with  the  Federal 
Trade Commission, further enforcement authority? 

Chairman MAJORAS. Thank you, Senator Allen. 
One  gap  that  could  be  filled  is  the  extension  of  our  GLB  Safe-
guards  Rule  to  other  businesses.  It’s  a  fair  question  to  ask  why— 
if we can already bring these cases under section 5, why would we 
need that? But if you take, for example, the BJ’s case, and our un-
fairness  standard  that  we  used  in  bringing  this  case,  today,  that 
requires,  first  and  foremost,  that  we  prove  substantial  consumer 
harm.  And,  of  course,  what  we  would  prefer  is  not  to  have  to  wait 
until  substantial  consumer  harm  is  shown  all  the  time;  in  other 
words, to have companies recognizing that putting in place reason-
able security measures is what they should be doing under the law, 
because  what  we  most  want  to  do  is  prevent  the  breaches.  And 
then, of course, you’ve pointed out the notice provisions; and, as of 
today, of course, there is no Federal notice law, Senator. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Restate  that  again.  Extension  of  what,  specifi-

cally? I want to make this very—— 

Chairman MAJORAS. OK. 
Senator ALLEN.—clear—— 
Chairman MAJORAS. OK. 
Senator ALLEN.—for all of us. 
Chairman  MAJORAS.  All  right.  The  FTC’s  Gramm-Leach-Bliley 

Safeguards Rule. 

Senator  ALLEN.  All  right.  Now,  if  you  had  had  such  additional 
enforcement  authority—and  you  mentioned  one  particular  case 
which  you  can’t  talk  about—if  you  had  this  enforcement  authority 
at  the  beginning  of  this  year,  would  you  have  prevented  the 
breaches  that  we’ve  seen  since  January  of  this  year?  And,  if  not, 
are  we  merely  talking  about  how  much  we  can  fine  a  company  for 
failure to act responsibly? 

Chairman MAJORAS. Well, I’m not sure that, with respect to any 
specific  breach,  we  could  have  prevented  it.  And,  of  course,  we’re 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

investigating  some  of  them;  and  so,  we’ll  learn  more  information. 
But I do absolutely agree with Commissioner Swindle that what we 
need  to  do  is  create  a  culture  of  security  in  business.  Businesses 
would  not,  of  course,  treat  packages  with  cash  in  them  in  a  way 
in which that cash could be stolen easily. And so, I think if the law 
is in place, and it is adaptable to all manner of businesses, the in-
dustry  will  likely  respond  to  that.  And  there  is  no  such  thing  as 
perfect security, Senator. We know that with respect to national se-
curity,  and  in  all  instances.  But  I  do  think  that  it  will  get  compa-
nies,  who  have  not  brought  up  to  date  their  security  procedures, 
thinking, ‘‘Gosh, now it’s law, and we must do this.’’ 

Commissioner  LEARY.  Senator,  let  me  just  expand  on  that  a 

minute—— 

Senator ALLEN. Yes, Commissioner Leary. 
Commissioner  LEARY.—because  I  agree  with  it  completely.  The 
mere  fact  that  businesses  are  on  notice,  that  they  are  now  subject 
to  a  specific  legal  requirement  that  they  were  not  specifically  sub-
ject to before, will induce a level of compliance, because most busi-
nesses are law compliant. The prime enforcers of law in the United 
States  are  not  people  sitting  on  this  side  of  the  table,  but  people 
who  are  counselors  to  businesses,  who  say  to  them—to  their  cli-
ents—that, ‘‘Now we have a legal requirement, and we’d better set 
up procedures to be in compliance with this, because you might get 
sued someday down the road.’’ 
Senator ALLEN. Thank you. 
Commissioner  LEIBOWITZ.  I  agree  with  my  colleagues.  Let  me 
just  add  one  point,  which  is:  a  useful  gap  that  could  be  plugged 
would be in the cross-border fraud area. We just don’t have the au-
thority,  often,  to  receive  information  from  our  foreign  law  enforce-
ment  counterparts.  And  if  we  can  get  that  ability,  we’ll  be  able  to 
more  effectively  go  after  malefactors  who  are  doing  bad  things  to 
Americans  from  abroad.  By  the  way,  that’s  not  just  in  the  context 
of  data  security;  it’s  also  in  the  context  of  spam,  spyware  and—— 

Senator ALLEN. Right. 
Commissioner LEIBOWITZ.—various other problems. 
Senator  ALLEN.  Well,  Mr.  Chairman,  we  were  actually  working 

on that. That was one of the key components, on the spyware. 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Leibowitz.  We’ll  make  sure  any  legislation  gives 

whatever assistance in that regard to you all. Thank you. 

Ms. Harbour? 
Commissioner  HARBOUR.  And  just  to  put  a  fine  point  on  what 
Commissioner Leibowitz said, with the ChoicePoint data breach, as 
I recall, the information was given out to a Nigerian national. And 
had  we  had  the  cross-border  legislation,  that  might  have  enabled 
us to share information with other countries, and perhaps have fa-
cilitated an investigation, or perhaps prevented something like that 
from happening in the future. 

Commissioner  LEIBOWITZ.  One  more  thing  to  add,  which  is,  civil 

penalties or fines would be useful, too, in the context of—— 

Senator ALLEN. Additional civil—— 
Commissioner LEIBOWITZ.—this legislation. 
Senator ALLEN.—higher civil fines and penalties. 
Mr. Chairman, thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

Thank  you  all.  In  the  event  that  we  craft  legislation,  as  far  as 
I’m  concerned,  you  gave  me  the  good  framework  for  it,  and  I  very 
much appreciate it. And we want to make sure that you all can do 
your  job  protecting  our  consumers  in  this  country,  and,  obviously, 
working with international counterparts, as well. But thank you. 

And thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator SMITH. Any more questions? 
Senator ALLEN. No, I don’t have anything further. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Senator Allen. 
Commissioners,  the  FTC,  itself,  has  documented  the  difficulty 
that  peer-to-peer  users  have  when  they  use  software  programs. 
They  can  unwittingly  share  their  tax  returns,  bank  account  num-
bers,  credit  cards,  medical  records,  resumes,  e-mail  in-boxes,  and 
legal  documents  of  all  kinds,  with  literally  millions  of  people.  The 
question I have is, Do you have any suggestions on how we can bet-
ter educate consumers about the ongoing risks of identity theft and 
fraud on P2P networks? 

Chairman  MAJORAS.  Well,  thank  you,  Senator.  It’s  an  excellent 
question, and it’s something that we, at the FTC, have been work-
ing  on.  We  have  materials  designed  to  educate  consumers.  But 
what  we  are—what  we  have  been  doing  is  working  with  the  peer- 
to-peer  file-sharing  industry,  because  we  think  that,  to  the  extent 
that  consumers  need  to  be  warned  of  risks,  if  they  can  be  warned 
the minute they pull up the—download the software or begin work-
ing  on  the  P2P  file-sharing  program,  that  really  is  the  best  place. 
And  in—when  we  first  started  this,  last  year,  after  we  had  our 
peer-to-peer  file-sharing  workshop—at  which  we  were  pleased  to 
have  you  as  a  speaker,  Senator—really,  almost  none  of  the  file- 
sharing companies had disclosures and warnings on their software. 
And,  today,  that  has  changed  a  great  deal.  I  can’t  tell  you  that 
that’s  absolutely  going  to  be  enough,  but  we  have  been  focusing  a 
lot of efforts in that area. 

Senator  SMITH.  If  it  isn’t  enough,  do  you  need  more  tools  from 

us? 

Chairman  MAJORAS.  We  are—I  think,  Senator,  we’d  like  the  op-
portunity to finish what we’re doing now, and then have the oppor-
tunity to come back to you and talk to you, if we think further tools 
are needed. 

Senator SMITH. OK. 
Chairman  MAJORAS.  And,  of  course,  the  Supreme  Court’s  deci-

sion in Grokster may also give us some guidance. 

Senator ALLEN. Yes. 
Commissioner  HARBOUR.  If  I  might  just  add  to  what  the  Chair-
man indicated, the Commission staff intends to continue to encour-
age the development of best practices with regard to the risk disclo-
sures, but also the risk of inadvertent file sharing appears to have 
decreased,  due  to  technological  measures  adopted  by  some  of  the 
peer-to-peer applications, although the risk of inadvertent file shar-
ing  may  vary,  depending  on  what  the  application  is.  I  think  there 
are new technological developments that are coming onto the mar-
ket that are protecting consumers. 

Senator  SMITH.  Is  the  European  Union—or  Japan  or  other  na-
tions, are they running into these issues, as well? And do you have 
any—do you do any work with them across the ocean? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

Chairman MAJORAS. We do, Senator. In fact, a great deal of work 
with  them  across  the  ocean.  The  EU  has  a  much  broader  privacy 
and  security  scheme  in  place,  as  opposed  to  going  after  areas  in 
which  there’s  harm.  It’s  a  very  broad,  comprehensive—indeed,  it’s 
so  broad  that,  when  I  recently,  on  behalf  of  the  Commission,  at-
tended  the  annual  meeting  of  the  International  Competition  Net-
work,  we  weren’t  allowed  to  have  a  list  of  who  was  attending,  be-
cause  that  might  violate  the  privacy  rights  of  the  folks  who  were 
actually  in  attendance.  In  Japan,  I’ve  had  folks  go  to  conferences, 
where they’re not—no one is given a name tag, because, if someone 
wore  a  name  tag,  that  might  violate  privacy  rights—so,  in  fact, 
there  are  broader  schemes  out  there  with  other  countries.  We  do 
work very closely, through several international organizations, and 
on  a  bilateral  basis,  to  share  what  has  worked  and  what  has  not 
worked. 

Senator SMITH. Do you need any more tools in dealing with these 

other nations? Do you have what you need now? 

Chairman MAJORAS. Well, we have, in the cross-border fraud leg-
islation  that  we  have  promoted,  there  is  some  language  in  there 
that  would  give  us  some  more  funding  to  be  able  to  work  more 
closely  with  our  counterparts  in  this  space,  which  is  becoming  so 
important to our work, as you know. 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  it’s  clearly  a  problem  that  doesn’t  know 
borders,  so  I  want  to  say  that  for  the  record.  And  we  appreciate 
what you’re doing internationally. 

I want to bring to your attention a constituent’s problem of mine. 
A  constituent  in  Eugene,  Oregon,  contacted  the  Oregon  Depart-
ment of Justice, filed a fraud report. Last year, she had been a vic-
tim  of  identity  theft,  after  which  she  filed  a  fraud  alert  with  her 
credit  union,  filed  a  police  report,  put  a  fraud  alert  on  her  credit 
report, yet this same individual was revictimized a year later. And 
I’m  wondering,  What  do  you  say  to  consumers  who  do  everything 
right to protect themselves, and yet still fall prey to identity theft? 
Chairman  MAJORAS.  Well,  we  say  we’re  working  as  hard  as  we 
possibly  can  to  make  sure  that  that  doesn’t  happen  again,  and  to 
make sure that it doesn’t happen to additional consumers. 

One of the things that we do—I commented on the fact, Senator, 
that identity theft is a crime. And that means that it’s prosecuted, 
most  often,  except  in  very  large  national  or  international  rings,  at 
the  very  local  level.  And  so,  one  of  the  things  that  we  try  to  do  is 
train local police officers. We have a very big program with the As-
sociation  of  Police  Chiefs  to  try  to  train  those  who  are  on  the 
ground  dealing  with  these  consumers  at  the  time.  And  I’ll  let  my 
colleagues weigh in here, as well, if they wish. 

Commissioner LEIBOWITZ. We’re a consensus-driven organization. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  SMITH.  I  want  to  highlight  a  comment  I  made  earlier, 
and  I  do  this  in  conclusion  to  our  hearing  today.  I  have  in  front 
of  me  an  article  from  the  MSNBC.com  website,  and  it  highlights 
the  connection  between  ID  theft  and  methamphetamines.  There 
was,  in  Eugene,  Oregon,  again,  an  ID-theft  ring  that—their  ring 
bosses  use  meth  addiction  to  keep  their  runners  in  line  and  to  get 
new  recruits.  In  the  case  of  Steven  Massey,  convicted  for  his  role 
as a ringleader of an ID-theft gang in 2000, methamphetamine was 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

the  glue  that  kept  this  guy’s  ring  together.  Massey  knew  where  to 
find  meth  addicts,  and  he  made  them  a  simple  proposal.  Said  he, 
‘‘I’ll  trade  mail  for  meth.’’  Soon,  he  had  an  army  of  meth  addicts 
prowling the neighborhoods near Eugene, stealing mail out of hun-
dreds  of  mailboxes,  and  raiding  the  local  recycling  center,  for  pre- 
approved  credit-card  applications.  Others  in  the  ring  broke  into 
cars  to  steal  purses  and  wallets,  not  for  money,  but  for  ID  papers. 
By  the  time  Massey  was  arrested,  investigators  say  he  had  gained 
access  to  over  400  credit-card  accounts  and  netted  close  to 
$400,000.  He  eventually  pleaded  guilty  to  conspiracy  to  commit 
computer  fraud,  and  to  mail  theft.  It’s  a  typical  case  in  Oregon. 
‘‘Ninety  percent  of  our  ID-theft  cases  deal  with  drugs,’’  said  the 
local policemen, ‘‘and it’s usually methamphetamine, which is easy 
and cheap to produce in mass quantities.’’ 

I  highlight  this,  not  to  bring  attention  to  my  state,  because  I 
think it’s a problem being experienced very broadly in this country, 
but  I  do  this  only  to  let  people  know  just  how  dangerous  this  is. 
These  are  very  dangerous  people,  and,  obviously,  one  of  the  most 
unsurly of trades in illegal drugs. 

I  don’t  know  whether  you  would  care  to  respond  to  that—yes, 

Ms. Harbour? 

Commissioner HARBOUR. I know that crystal meth is a very seri-
ous and complicated problem. I do know that Senator Cantwell was 
concerned  that  the  use  of  crystal  meth  in  the  State  of  Washington 
was fueling identity theft, as well. And I know that she had worked 
very  hard  to  get  local  law  enforcers  in  her  state  to  take  the  issue 
very  seriously;  and,  in  fact,  had  involved  Representative  David 
Reichert,  the  former  King  County  Sheriff,  who,  by  the  way,  cap-
tured  the  Green  River  serial  killer.  But,  anyway,  local  law  enforc-
ers  are  on  the  front  lines,  and  I  know  that  they’re  dealing  with 
problems related to both drug use and identity-theft victims. At the 
Federal Trade Commission, obviously, we have no criminal law en-
forcement  jurisdiction.  The  expertise  of  dedicated  on-the-ground 
local  law  enforcers  is  irreplaceable.  So,  I  suppose  I  would  urge  all 
of  the  Senators  and  the  Congressmen  to  use  some—to  convince 
your  state  and  local  enforcers  to  really  take  a  look  at  this  issue, 
and to take this seriously and step up to the plate. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you very much. 
I’m  going  to  ask  unanimous  consent—I  guess  I’m  alone,  so  I 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  SMITH.—to  include  in  the  Senate  record  a  statement 
from  Oregon’s  Attorney  General,  Hardy  Myers,  that  it  speaks  to 
this  whole  issue  and  the  connection  of  identity  theft  and  drugs, 
specifically methamphetamine. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

agree—— 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. HARDY MYERS, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF OREGON 
Police  investigating  identity  theft  crimes  are  becoming  increasingly  aware  that 
the perpetrators are almost always users of methamphetamines. Oregon has an es-
pecially  high  rate  of  Identity  Theft  (9th  in  the  Nation)  and  has  the  largest  number 
of  citizens  in  meth  treatment  programs  of  any  state  in  the  country.  Both  of  these 
dubious distinctions lend themselves to one another. Meth users are many times re-
cruited by leaders of ID theft rings to steal personal information from their victims. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

The  meth  users,  in  turn,  are  given  drugs  as  payment  by  the  leader  of  the  ID-theft 
ring. 

IDs  are  especially  easy  to  get  in  Oregon—in  fact,  Oregon  ranks  48th  out  of  50 
states  in  the  ease  of  acquiring  identification.  Currently,  for  example,  the  DMV  has 
approximately  6  million  active  Oregon  driver’s  licenses  on  file,  yet  there  are  only 
3.5 million residents in Oregon. In once instance, the Marion County Sheriff’s Office 
shared  one  case  in  which  an  individual  secured  20  DMV  issued  licenses  within  a 
5-hour period. 

There are many reasons that identity theft seems to be so inexorably tied to meth 
use. Meth users, by virtue of their addiction, go on binges in which they are awake 
and focused for days at a time. Consequently, they must spend days at a time sleep-
ing off the consequences of their actions. This means that part-time jobs are difficult 
to  hold.  As  meth  is  an  expensive  habit  to  maintain,  sources  of  income  are  needed 
to  obtain  the  drug.  Furthermore,  according  to  a  professor  at  SJSU  in  San  Jose, 
meth’s  ‘‘unique  psychopharmacological  properties  would  assist  ID  theft—the  whole 
detail-oriented aspect of it, the obsessive-compulsive aspect of it.’’ 

Identity theft lends itself well to this because it can reap large monetary benefits, 
with  relatively  smaller  punishments.  As  a  police  detective  in  Eugene  put  it,  ‘‘they 
(meth  users)  can  make  more  money  in  a  fraud  crime  than  they  can  sticking  a  gun 
in  someone’s  face.  If  you  bring  a  gun  in  a  bank,  you  can  face  life  in  prison.  Or  you 
can  write  a  series  of  bad  checks  and  score  10  times  that  amount  and  just  get  pa-
role.’’ 

There  seems  to  be  no  official  data  that  states  the  percentage  of  ID-theft  crimes 
that  are  connected  to  meth.  The  estimations  vary—but  typically  officials  say  be-
tween  85–95  percent  of  all  ID  theft  crimes  are  in  some  way  connected  to  meth-
amphetamine.  In  2003,  100  percent  of  identity  theft  case  worked  by  the  Fraud  and 
Identify  Theft  Enforcement  Team  investigators  in  Washington  County,  Oregon  had 
a methamphetamine nexus. 

There have been many documented cases in which a meth users has been caught 
with a number of identifications, financial records, and Social Security numbers. In 
one example in Tualatin Oregon, officers located 340 separate probable victim iden-
tities in a storage unit along with a boxed up meth lab that only needed a few com-
ponents  to  start  cooking  again.  Of  the  1,240  separate  identities,  there  was  identify 
information  in  the  form  of  full  profiles  of  persons,  checks,  ID  cards,  credit  applica-
tions, W2’s tax information, and much more. 

Oregon, by virtue of being among the most ravaged of states by both identity theft 
and methamphetamine, can be a unique example of the connection between the two. 
ID theft affects thousands of Oregonians every year, and it is being perpetuated by 
users of methamphetamine. 

Senator  SMITH.  Let  me  just  say  how  appreciative  we  are  of  your 
presence here today, the contribution you’ve made. We look forward 
to  working  with  you  to  make  sure  you  have  the  powers  and  au-
thorities  necessary  to  get  ahead  of  what  is  a  burgeoning  problem 
in  our  country.  We’ve  got  to  protect  our  consumers  from  this;  and, 
clearly, new tools are called for. And your input is valued, and will 
be included. And we look forward to working with you as this legis-
lation develops. And, most of all, thank you for your public service. 

Chairman MAJORAS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator SMITH. We’re adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 12:15 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

North  Dakota  is  first  in  the  Nation  in  many  good  respects.  But  I  am  happy  to 
say  that  North  Dakota  ranks  49th  in  the  Nation  in  the  number  of  ID  theft  cases, 
on a per-capita basis. There are almost five times as many cases of ID theft in Ari-
zona, on a per capita basis, than in North Dakota. 

Still,  even  though  we  have  had  relatively  few  cases  in  North  Dakota,  the  first- 
hand stories of North Dakota victims are certainly devastating ones. This is clearly 
a  national  epidemic.  And  I  am  particularly  worried  about  the  many  instances  in 
which  data  brokers  have  lost  the  sensitive  financial  records  of  hundreds  of  thou-
sands of Americans. 

I  am  a  co-sponsor  of  S.  768,  the  Comprehensive  Identity  Theft  Prevention  Act, 
which  my  colleague  Senator  Nelson  (along  with  Senator  Schumer)  has  introduced. 

This bill does a number of things: 
• It  bans  unregulated  commercial  trading  of  Social  Security  numbers,  and  pro-
hibits  commercial  entities  from  asking  individuals  for  their  Social  Security 
numbers, unless no other alternative identifier that can be used. 
• It  establishes  an  Office  of  Identity  Theft  within  the  Federal  Trade  Commission 
(FTC), as a ‘‘one stop shop’’ to help the millions of victims of identity theft each 
year  restore  their  identities.  This  office  would  also  be  responsible  for  passing 
regulations  to  protect  consumers’  sensitive  personal  information  that  is  col-
lected,  maintained,  sold,  or  transferred  by  commercial  entities.  It  would  have 
the authority to bring enforcement actions for violators of the regulations. 
• It  requires  safeguard  rules  for  all  commercial  entities:  companies  must  take 
‘‘reasonable  steps’’  to  protect  all  sensitive  personal  information  that  they  store. 
• It requires information brokers subject to full regulations by the FTC; and con-
sumers would be afforded the rights they have under the Fair Credit Reporting 
Act regarding credit bureaus. 
• It  requires  breach  notification:  all  commercial  entities  must  notify  individuals 
when there has been a breach of the individual’s sensitive personal information. 
I  am  particularly  concerned  about  the  pervasive  use  of  Social  Security  numbers 
by  businesses  as  a  means  of  identifying  potential  customers.  I  believe  that  the  use 
of misappropriated Social Security numbers is one of the main accelerants that fuels 
the  epidemic  of  ID  theft.  I  know  that  many  businesses  will  argue  that  they  need 
Social  Security  numbers  to  distinguish  one  customer  from  another.  But  the  Better 
Business  Bureau  estimates  that  there  were  9.3  million  victims  of  identity  theft  in 
2004. Clearly, there are competing interests here—and given the number of victims, 
I  think  we  need  to  provide  much  more  protection  for  the  confidentiality  of  Social 
Security numbers. 

When  a  company  like  LexisNexis  is  hacked  into,  and  thieves  steal  the  personal 
data  of  310,000  Americans—including  not  only  their  Social  Security  numbers,  but 
even  the  date  and  location  where  the  Social  Security  card  was  issued—it  is  clear 
that we have a serious problem on our hands. 

I have read through FTC testimony. It states that ‘‘private and public entities rou-
tinely have used Social Security numbers for many years to access their voluminous 
records,’’  and  suggests  that  the  solution  is  not  to  restrict  the  use  of  Social  Security 
numbers, but rather to go after those who use Social Security numbers for criminal 
purposes.  I  am  certainly  in  favor  of  going  after  the  bad  guys,  but  I  think  we  also 
need to restrict the use of Social Security numbers far beyond the status quo. 

So I look forward to discussing this point with the other commissioners today. 
I  am  also  interested  to  hear  from  Vermont  Attorney  General  William  Sorrell  on 
whether Federal legislation on the issue of ID theft should create a ceiling that pre-
empts  recently  enacted  state  laws  in  this  area.  North  Dakota  is  one  of  the  states 
that  has  recently  passed  legislation  requiring  notification  of  individuals  when  their 

(57) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

personal data has been compromised. I am not sure that we want to be capping the 
efforts  of  states  to  protect  individuals  from  ID  theft.  The  bill  that  I  have  co-spon-
sored with Senator Nelson does not do that. 

With that, I thank the witnesses for attending today. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER, U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 
Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  calling  this  hearing  on  the  vitally  important  issue 

of identity theft. I commend you for making this issue a top priority. 

As you know, I am a strong and vocal proponent of privacy protection—especially 
with regard to the distribution of personal information that can lead to the physical, 
financial,  or  psychological  harm  of  an  individual  if  the  information  falls  into  the 
wrong hands. 

In  1994,  after  an  actress  in  my  state  was  murdered  by  a  stalker  who  obtained 
personal  information  about  her  from  the  Department  of  Motor  Vehicles,  I  authored 
the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act to keep personal information held by a state De-
partment  of  Motor  Vehicles  from  being  released  without  the  consent  of  the  indi-
vidual. The Supreme Court upheld this law on a unanimous 9–0 vote. 

That  was  during  the  days  of  the  Internet’s  infancy.  While  the  Internet  has  done 
wonderful  things,  it—and  the  computerization  of  more  and  more  data—is  making 
it easier for identity thieves. 

The Privacy Rights Clearinghouse, a nonprofit group in San Diego, estimates that 
nearly  4  million  people’s  identities  have  been  compromised  through  means  such  as 
hacking,  dishonest  insiders,  and  computer  theft  since  mid-February.  This  number 
does  not  even  include  5  million  people  whose  sensitive  information  is  on  the  back- 
up tapes lost by Bank of America and CitiFinancial. 

According to a 2003 FTC study, over a period of 1 year, nearly 10 million Ameri-
cans  were  victims  of  identity  theft.  Losses  to  business  and  financial  institutions 
were  nearly  $48  billion  and  consumer  victims  reported  an  additional  $5  billion  in 
out-of-pocket expenses. 

Criminals  use  misappropriated  and  stolen  consumer  information  to  assume  the 
identity  of  innocent  individuals.  They  get  credit  cards  and  mortgages  in  someone 
else’s  name  and  even  use  an  assumed  identity  if  caught  committing  a  crime.  The 
identity  thieves  then  disappear  and  it  is  the  victim  who  is  left  answering  the  calls 
of debt collectors and the police. 

Data brokers are of particular concern when it comes to identity theft. These com-

panies actively collect and sell information about individuals. 

As  aggregators  of  sensitive  information,  data  brokers  are  attractive  targets  for 
identity thieves. And, unfortunately, the last few months have shown that criminals 
are succeeding in stealing information from them. 

Since  the  beginning  of  the  year,  we  have  learned  that  breaches  of  security  at 
ChoicePoint and LexisNexis have resulted in information on approximately 145,000 
individuals in ChoicePoint’s case and 300,000 records in LexisNexis’s case being ex-
posed. 

What  is  worse  is  if  this  had  happened  a  few  years  ago,  we  might  not  have  even 
known  about  them.  It  is  only  since  a  California  credit  law  went  into  effect  in  mid- 
2003 that companies have been forced to notify Californians when their confidential 
information  has  been  compromised.  That  required  notification  to  California’s  con-
sumers  has  resulted  in  the  whole  country  knowing  about  these  thefts.  But,  outside 
of California, people do not have a right to know when their own personal data may 
be compromised. 

This must change. People have a right to know when they are at risk. They have 
a right to know before they get turned down for a loan because someone else ruined 
their credit record. They have a right to know before they are arrested for someone 
else’s crime. We, however, should not focus solely on data brokers. Many other orga-
nizations  routinely  store  sensitive  personal  information.  In  April,  DSW—the  shoe 
store—admitted  that  its  computer  system  had  been  hacked  allowing  criminals  ac-
cess to the credit card and driver’s license numbers of approximately 1.4 million cus-
tomers. 

Identity  theft  also  raises  serious  homeland  security  concerns.  Terrorists,  too,  are 
able to use sensitive consumer information to assume false identities. Unlike crimi-
nals, however, terrorists will avoid the activities that normally alert a person to the 
fact  their  identity  was  stolen.  So  long  as  the  terrorist  pays  the  credit  card  bills,  it 
could be years before the deception is revealed. 

Legislation  is  needed  to  address  the  consumer  harm  and  security  threat  arising 
from identity theft. Therefore, I have cosponsored the Comprehensive Identity Theft 
Prevention Act (S. 768). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

The legislation would create and fund the Office of Identity Theft in the FTC and 
create  an  Assistant  Secretary  for  Cyber  Security  in  the  Department  of  Homeland 
Security. 

Moreover, it would regulate data brokers and ensure that companies maintaining 
sensitive personal information protect that data. A notice provision based on Califor-
nia’s  law  would  require  companies  to  inform  affected  individuals  of  security 
breaches and give those consumers additional rights to protect their sensitive infor-
mation. 

This  legislation  is  timely  and  necessary.  I  look  forward  to  working  with  my  col-

leagues on this Committee to move the bill forward. 

I thank you again, Mr. Chairman. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Mr. Chairman, 
Thank you for holding this important second hearing on the compilation, storage, 
and sale of sensitive personal information, and the American public’s increasing con-
cern and susceptibility to identity theft. 

Whereas  our  focus  in  May  was  to  look  at  the  actors  in  the  data  brokerage  indus-
try, today we focus on what the Federal Trade Commission is doing to help combat 
identity  theft  and  what  Congress  can  and  should  do  to  combat  this  increasing 
threat. 

Recent  security  breaches  at  the  Nation’s  largest  data  brokerage  firms  have  left 
millions of Americans vulnerable to identity theft and scams. Overall, some 10 mil-
lion Americans were victimized by identity thieves last year. 

And  the  situation  is  only  getting  worse.  The  year  2005  has  brought  news  of  one 
security  breach  after  another,  with  no  end  in  sight.  Some  of  these  breaches  have 
been  high-tech,  resulting  from  improperly  or  illegally  accessed  passwords.  Others 
have  been  caused  by  mere  carelessness,  sometimes  during  the  transport  of  files  or 
disks. 

Regardless of method, these breaches have exposed sensitive personal information 
about millions of Americans in the past year alone. This is simply unacceptable, and 
it warrants our attention. 

In  the  wrong  hands,  an  individual’s  private  data  can  wreak  havoc  on  a  victim’s 
life—ruining their finances and credit rating, their ability to obtain a mortgage, and 
often their good name. 

Victims  of  identity  theft  often  spend  years  and  large  amounts  of  money  to  repair 

the damage done by identity thieves. 

Advances in technology allow more information to be compiled faster and in fewer 
databases. The collection and storage of personal information is a big business, and 
now  is  the  time  to  exercise  better  oversight  of  this  problem  and  consider  how  we 
can play a role in protecting Americans from identity theft. 

Mr. Chairman, our laws must ensure that companies protect personal information 

We must work harder to protect Social Security numbers. Social Security numbers 
should  be  requested  and  given  based  on  need.  Furthermore,  we  must  make  sure 
Americans  are  aware  of  how  and  when  their  Social  Security  number  is  being  used. 
We must also notify consumers when a breach has occurred that puts them at risk 

with great care. 

of identity theft. 

I’m interested to hear from the Federal Trade Commissioners on what efforts the 
FTC  currently  employs  to  protect  Americans,  and  what  their  agency  is  prepared  to 
do moving forward to help combat identity theft. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 Nov 02, 2010 Jkt 061846 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61846.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

